<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88216-0137 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.2-16-88.f2.A1018</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 30 / Tuesday, February 16, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Part 372</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[OPTS-400002A; FRL 3298-2]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Toxic Chemical Release Reporting; Community Right-to-know</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This rule contains the uniform toxic chemical releasereporting form as required by section 313 of Title III of the SuperfundAmendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986. Section 313 requires that ownersand operators of certain facilities that manufacture, import, process,or otherwise use certain toxic chemicals report annually their releasesof those chemicals to each environmental medium. This rule also requirescertain suppliers of toxic chemicals to notify recipients of such chemicalsin mixtures and trade name products.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>This rule is effective March 17, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Sam K. Sasnett, Deputy ProjectCoordinator (TS-779), Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Hotline,Environmental Protection Agency, Room. WH 562A, 401 M Street. SW. (Washington,DC 20460, (800-535-0202), In Washington, DC and Alaska, 202-479-2449).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Authority</ITAG>The Agency is promulgating this rule pursuant to sections 313 and 328 ofTitle III of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986,Pub. L. 99-499 (42 U.S.C. 11013 and 11028). Title III is also titled ``TheEmergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986.'' Section 313of Title III requires owners and operators of covered facilities to reportannually their releases of listed toxic chemicals. Section 313 also specifiesthat EPA must publish a uniform toxic chemical release form. In addition,section 328 provides EPA with the authority to promulgate such regulationsas may be necessary to carry out the purposes of Title III.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background</ITAG>A. Regulatory History and Summary of Public ParticipationOn October 17, 1986, the President signed into law the Superfund Amendmentsand Reauthorization Act of 1986 (SARA), Pub. L. 99-499. The major functionof this legislation is to amend and reauthorize provisions of the ComprehensiveEnvironmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (CERCLA).However, Title III of SARA is a free-standing statute (not part of CERCLA)that is titled ``The Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Actof 1986.'' In general, Title III contains authorities relating to emergencyplanning, emergency notification, community right-to-know on chemicals,and a toxic chemical release inventory.The focus of this rule is the toxic chemical release inventory provisioncontained in section 313 of Title III of SARA. Section 313 requires ownersand operators of certain facilities that manufacture, process, or otherwiseuse a listed chemical to report annually their releases of such chemicalsto any environmental medium. The reports are to be sent to both EPA andthe State in which the facility is located. The basic purpose of this provisionis to make available to the public information about releases of certaintoxic chemicals that result from operations of certain facilities in theircommunity.EPA issued a proposed rule, published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of June 4, 1987 (52 FR 21152). The proposed rulecontained the toxic chemical release inventory reporting form and interpretiverequirements for reporting. The preamble of the proposed rule outlinedthe public participation activities that led up to the development of theproposal. After publication, EPA received over 100 written comments onthe proposed rule. In addition, EPA held public meetings in Washington,DC, Chicago, Il, and San Francisco, CA. Attendees at these meetings presentedoral comments representative of wide range of interests including the affectedindustry, environmental and other public interest groups, State and localgovernments, and individual citizens.In addition, EPA has held other meetings with, and received other communicationsfrom, interested parties.B. Overview of Final Rule RequirementsThe reporting requirements of this rule apply to owners and operators ofcovered facilities that manufacture, process, or otherwise use listed toxicchemicals. A covered facility is one that:Has 10 or more full-time employees.Is in SIC codes 20 through 39.Exceeds an applicable manufacture, process, or use threshold.EPA interprets ``in SIC codes 20 through 39'' to relate to the primarySIC code of the facility. If the facility is comprised of multiple establishments,facility coverage is based on a relative comparison of the value of productsshipped and/or produced at 20 through 39 establishments versus non-20 through39 establishments in that facility.EPA has included a definition of ``full-time employee'' and guidance ondetermining SIC coverage.EPA has not included a small business exemption in this rule differentfrom that provided by section 313. However, the Agency is allowing reportingin ranges for releases to an environmental medium and for off-site transfersof wastes that are below 1,000 pounds per year. EPA expects that smallbusinesses will benefit most from this provision. The range reporting isfor calendar years 1987, 1988, and 1989 only.The thresholds are those provided by the statute:For manufacturing or processing as defined_75,000 pounds for 1987, 50,000pounds for 1988, 25,000 pounds per year for 1989 and thereafter.For toxic chemicals otherwise used the threshold is 10,000 pounds per yearfor all years.Reports must be submitted annually on or before July 1 for the precedingyear's data.The chemicals subject to reporting initially are those chemicals as providedby section 313(c), with certain technical modifications.Additions or deletions of chemicals from the list may result from petitionsor EPA's own review of the list. Any such changes will be by notice andcomment rulemaking, and EPA will identify the reporting years which theyapply.Mixtures and trade name products imported, processed, or used at a facilitymust be evaluated for the presence of listed toxic chemicals. However,EPA has applied a <T3>de minimis </T3>concentration limitation of 1 percent (or 0.1 percentif the chemical is a carcinogen) consistent with the Occupational Safetyand Health Administration (OSHA) Hazard Communications Standard (HCS) in29 CFR 1910.1200. Toxic chemicals present in concentrations below the <T3>de minimis </T3>limit do not have to be factored into threshold andrelease reporting calculations.In relation to reporting on mixtures, EPA has developed a supplier requirement.Owners or operators of facilities in SIC codes 20 through 39 who supplymixtures or trade name products containing listed toxic chemicals mustnotify their customers about the presence and concentration of those chemicalsin their products. However, the <T3>de minimis </T3>limit as described above also applies to this requirement.The supplier notification requirement takes effect with the first productshipment in 1989.Certain definitions have been modifed. The definition of ``article'' hasbeen revised to more closely parallel the OSHA HCS article definition.In addition, article processing or use is exempt from threshold and releasedeterminations under this rule. However, respondents must pay careful attentionto the non-release criteria in this definition.The definition of ``manufacture'' retains the interpretation that coincidentallyproduced impurities and other byproducts must be accounted for. However,the consideration of an impurity is subject to the above-referenced <T3>de minimis</T3> limitation. This <T3>de minimis</T3> limitation does not apply to the byproducts producedcoincidentally as a result of manufacturing, processing, use, waste treatment,or disposal.EPA has attempted to clarify the differences between processing and use.Processing activities are basically those that incorporate a chemical intoa product for distribution in commerce. Use activities are primarily non-incorporativeactivities.A new part of the rule is an exemptions section. The major function ofthis section is to outline activities that are not subject to certain requirements.In particular, this section exempts activities in laboratories from thresholdand release determinations.There are a number of specific changes from the proposed rule in Form R,the Toxic Chemical Release Inventory Reporting Form. The form is more modularin design in order to reduce the frequency of the same information havingto be filled in for each chemical-specific submission. Other specific changesare as follows:1. The certification statement (Part I, Section 2) has been modified.2. The facility identification section of the form (Part 1, Section 3)contains the name and telephone number of a public contact person for thefacility. In the first reporting year, if this information is available,the facility must provide its latitude and longitude. In subsequent years,if this information is not readily available, the facility must developit and provide it.3. In the chemical identity section of the form (Part III, Section 1) onechange in the reporting requirements affects the generic chemical identityto be provided in cases where the specific chemical identity is claimedtrade secret. The respondent is to develop its own generic chemical namerather than using a predefined generic name as EPA had proposed. The genericname is to be structurally descriptive of the chemical.Reporting may also be based on a generically identified mixture or tradename product component. (See Part III, Section 2 of the form.) This reportingwould occur in cases where a user has information that a generically identifiedcomponent of a mixture or trade name product is a section 313 chemicalthat, by itself, exceeds a threshold but the user does not know the specificidentity.4. The release reporting section of the form (Part III, Section 5) containsseveral modifications. As mentioned above, for calendar years 1987, 1988,and 1989, facilities may take advantage of range reporting check boxesfor releases of a toxic chemical to an environmental medium of less than1,000 pounds per year. The releases to water portion of the form has beendisaggregated by stream and respondents must indicate what percentage ofthe release was contributed by stormwater runoff if they have monitoringdata. In addition, underground injection of wastes at a facility must beentered on a specific line in the release section.The proposed columns indicating section 304 releases or that a permit appliesto releases have been deleted from the final form.5. EPA has included the reporting of transfers of section 313 toxic chemicalsin waste to off-site locations. However, these transfers are to be reportedin a separate section of the form (Part III, Section 6).6. The waste treatment section of the form remains unchanged from the proposalexcept that EPA has provided for reporting sequential waste treatment.7. The optional section on waste minimization has been retained but thenarrative part of this section has been removed. A 3-year sunset provisionwill apply to this form section.8. The form also contains a preformatted supplemental information sheet(Part IV). <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Issues Relating to Facility coverage </ITAG><T3>A. Interpretation of SIC Code Coverage</T3> Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) code coverage is one of threecriteria specified in section 313(b) for determining whether a facilityis subject to reporting. The preamble of the proposed rule stated that``in SIC codes 20-39'' meant that the primary SIC code for the facilityis within the 20 through 39 designations. The proposed rule also includedfacilities that engage in one or more activities in SIC codes 20 through39 even if the primary SIC code for the facility itself is not SIC 20 through39. Many commenters argued against including ``secondary'' SIC activities.First, commenters stated that the definition of a facility is the wholecollection of buildings, not parts thereof. Second, they argued that SICcodes are used to define the primary purpose of an establishment, not allactivities. Therefore, including facilities that engage in activities inSIC code 20 through 39 but for which the primary SIC code for the facilityis outside SIC code 20 through 39 is in direct contradiction to the establishedassignment and usage of SIC codes. Third, commenters stated that it exceededthe intent of the legislation and stretched the capabilities of the industrialclassification system. Finally, the commenters stated that any increasein SIC code coverage should be through discrete and more focused rulemakings,as prescribed in section 313(b)(1)(B) and (b)(2), with substantial sector-by-sectorjustification to warrant increased reporting on non-manufacturing sectors.The SIC code system was developed to calssify establishments by type ofeconomic activity. A SIC code applies to an establishment, which was definedas an economic unit, generally at a single physical location, where businessis conducted or where services or industrial operations are performed.SIC codes are not directly applicable to facilities as defined in section329(4) of Title III and this rule. A ``facility'' is defined as all buildings,equipment, structures, and other stationary items which are located ona single site or adjacant contiguous sites owned or operated by the sameperson. Therefore, a facility can be a much larger, more complex operationthan an establishment. The definition of primary SIC code is generallyconsidered to be the code related to the types of products distributedfrom an establishment that have the highest dollar value added. Based on the public comments received on the proposed rule, the Agencyhas revised its interpretation of ``in SIC Codes 20 through 39.'' The revisionis designed to remove the confusion and ambiguity in the proposed rulecaused by linking the concepts of facility and primary SIC code. The finalrule provides that a facility is in SIC codes 20 through 39 based on theSIC codes for the one or more establishments that comprise the facility.EPA has identified the following three possible scenarios relating establishments,SIC codes, and facilities: 1. <T3>The establishment is the same as the facility. </T3>Where an establishmentis the same as a facility, given that the other eligibility criteria aremet, and the establishment's primary SIC code is in 20 through 39, thefacility is covered for purposes of reporting. Because there is no distinctionbetween the establishment and the facility, reporting of releases fromthe facility is straightforward. 2. <T3>The facility is comprised of two or more establishments, all of whichhave a primary SIC code of 20 through 39. </T3>For multi-establishmentfacilities, when all of the establishments' primary SIC codes are in 20through 39, given that the other eligibility criteria are met for the facility,the facility is covered for purposes of reporting. 3. <T3>The facility is comprised of two or more establishments, one or moreof which have a primary SIC code of 20 through 39. </T3>For multi-establishmentfacilities when one or more of the establishments' primary SIC codes arein 20 through 39, the facility is covered for purposes of reporting ifeither of the following criteria apply for the reporting year: a. The sum of the value of products shipped from and/or produced at allestablishments with primary SIC codes in 20 through 39 is greater than50 percent of the total value of products shipped from and/or producedat all establishments that comprise the facility. b. One establishment whose primary SIC code is in 20 through 39 has a valueof products shipped and/or produced that is larger than that of any otherestablishment in the facility.Facilities may refer to data they submitted to the U.S. Department of Commerce,Bureau of the Census, for the Annual Census of Manufacturers (Form MA-1000)to calculate the relative values of products shipped and/or produced.Once a facility is covered in either of the above cases, all releases oflisted toxic chemicals must be accounted for, even from individual establishmentsin the facility that fall outside of the 20 through 39 SIC codes.B. Reporting by Multi-Establishment FacilitiesSeveral commenters raised the concern that it will be difficult for facilitiesconsisting of more than one establishment to submit a single report coveringthe entire facility. Commenters noted that individual establishments, ownedby the same parent company, often have different management lines of authoritywithin the company. In these cases, commenters noted, it would be difficultto combine information into one reporting form.As explained in A. of this unit, the facility is the unit that is responsiblefor reporting. While EPA could continue to require a single submissionfor multi-establishment facilities, EPA has decided to require a compliancedetermination by the whole facility covering all its establishments, butto allow individual establishments or groups of establishments to reportseparately, provided all releases and waste treatment methods are accountedfor. However, if individual establishments or groups of establishmentsreport separately for one chemical they must continue to report separatelyfor all other chemicals at the facility.Under this approach the entire facility must determine compliance as asingle unit. Thus the Agency ensures no reporting will be missed becausecertain individual establishments do not meet thresholds for employeesor chemical activities. For example, a facility is comprised of two establishments,with combined employment totaling 60 full-time workers. Establishment Auses 5,000 pounds of benzene and establishment B uses 8,000 pounds of benzene.The facility as a whole exceeds 10 full-time employees and combined useby both establishments exceeds the 10,000 pound threshold for the use ofbenzene at the facility. Therefore this facility must report for benzene.It has two options. It can file a report that represents the combined dataassociated with all activities with benzene at both establishments. Alternatively,both establishments can file separate reports accounting for their individualreleases and other related data. If both establishments file separate reports,then they must submit separate reports for all chemicals subject to reporting.However, if, for example, a toxic chemical is used at one establishmentbut is not present at all at the other establishment, only the establishmentthat uses the chemical must report for that chemical.The form provides a way for users of the data to know whether all or onlypart of a facility is included in a specific report. Check boxes correspondto (1) the entire covered facility or (2) one or more establishments withina covered, multi-establishment facility.A second issue regarding multi-establishment facilities relates to therequirement that the owner or operator of a facility must report. EPA proposedthat if no report was filed, both the owner and operator (if different)would be liable. Commenters requested clarification on the liabilitiesand obligations of an owner of leased property, where the owner's interestis solely one of real estate. These commenters believe that such an ownershould not have obligations to report because it is not in a position whichwould allow it to determine compliance or report the required information.The owner would not be able to submit a report without the cooperationof the operator.EPA recognizes these difficulties. The final rule exempts certain ownersof leased property from reporting requirements. These exemptions applyonly to those owners of property who have no business interest in the propertyother than real estate. Owners who are part of the same business organizationas the operators would not be exempt, nor would owners of businesses thatcontract out the operations of a particular site. In these cases, the ownerhas a business interest beyond that of the real estate and has the abilityto exert some control over the operator.A commenter identified an additional problem that occurs when the establishmentsin a multi-establishment facility are operated by different persons whichhave no common corporate relationship, such as in an industrial park. EPAidentified two possible scenarios. In the first scenario, the owner ofthe facility operates an establishment in the facility but leases a portionof the facility to another person who operates another establishment. Theowner and this other operator do not have any business relationship otherthan landlord and tenant. Also, the owner does not know what chemicalsare manufactured, processed, or used in that operator's establishment.In the second scenario, the owner of the facility, having only a real estateinterest in the facility, does not operate any establishment in the facilityand leases all of the facility to two or more persons who operate establishmentsin the facility. Under the exemption discussion above, the owner wouldnot be subject to reporting. However, in both scenarios, the operatorswould be subject to reporting, but they have no common corporate or businessinterest and do not know what chemicals are manufactured, processed, orused in each other's establishments.In neither of these situations is one person in a position to know allof the information necessary to make a determination whether the facilityas a whole is a covered facility and whether a toxic chemical is manufactured,processed, or used at the facility in excess of an applicable threshold.Accordingly, EPA has decided that, in such a situation, each operator shouldtreat the establishments it operates as a facility for purposes of reporting.These operators must make the determinations under the rule for SIC codecoverage, number of full-time employees, and whether a toxic chemical ismanufactured, processed, or otherwise used in excess of an applicable threshold,but only for those establishments they operate. Appropriate provisionshave been added to the rule, form, and instructions to provide for thisapproach. To ensure that related companies do not avoid reporting for multi-establishmentfacilities, EPA has limited use of this approach to operators of separateestablishments in the same facility who do not have any common corporateor business interest, i.e. they are not engaged in partnerships, jointventures, ownership of a controlling interest in one by the other, or ownershipof a controlling interest in both by a third person.Another situation may arise where a person owns a parcel of land on whichit operates one or more establishments and also leases land immediatelyadjacent to it on which that same person operators one or more additionalestablishments. Section 329(4) of Title III defines ``facility'' to include``a single site or * * * contiguous or adjacent sites * * * which are ownedor operated by the same person * * *.'' Thus in this situation the ``facility''would be the total site including the land owned by the person and theadjacent land leased by the person. To make the SIC code determinationsand reporting threshold determinations, the person is required to considerthe activities at all the establishments he or she operates on the totalsite. Having made the determinations that the total facility is a coveredfacility and that an applicable reporting threshold has been met, the personmay submit separate reports for the establishments as described above.C. Auxiliary Facilities_Laboratory Activity ExemptionCommenters requested that EPA clarify whether auxiliary operations whichhave primary SIC codes within 20 through 39 (manufacturing) are coveredfor purposes of section 313 reporting.Auxiliary establishments are defined under the SIC code system as operationswhich primarily support other establishments. Common types of auxiliaryoperations are research and development laboratories, warehouses, storagefacilities, and waste treatment facilities. The SIC code system assignsthese facilities SIC codes according to the establishment they service;thus, auxiliary establishments tied to manufacturing establishments aregiven a manufacturing SIC code.Commenters argued that the statute did not contemplate including establishmentsthat do not engage in manufacturing. They stated further that EPA has thediscretion to modify the facility coverage criteria to correct such anomalies.1. <T3>Auxiliary facilities must make a compliance determination. </T3>EPAhas determined that the most consistent way to treat a stand-alone auxiliaryestablishment (i.e. one that is not a part of a larger facility) is torequire that it make a compliance determination. If such an establishmentis classified in SIC codes 20 through 39 because it supports a manufacturingactivity, it must review its chemical activities and the level of suchactivities to determine if it must report. It is possible that an establishmentsuch as a warehouse standing alone will not be subject to reporting. Ifno manufacture (including importation), processing (including repackaging),or use of covered toxic chemicals occurs, the facility is not subject.  Similarly, persons who own or operate auxiliary establishments that arewithin the defined boundaries of a larger multi-establishment facilitymust review the manufacture, processing, or use activities involving listedtoxic chemicals at all the establishments in the facility. Such auxiliaryestablishments must be factored into the ``value of shipments and/or production''calculation to the extent it is applicable, and must be counted towardthe employee threshold. The activity of manufacturing, processing, or usinga toxic chemical in the auxiliary establishment counts toward the chemicalthresholds for the facility.   2. <T3>Exemption of laboratory activities. </T3>Commenters stated that itwould be burdensome to require laboratories to determine whether they mustcomply because of the potentially large number of mixtures and chemicalson-site in small volumes and the relatively rapid turnover of such chemicalsand mixtures in the laboratory setting.   EPA agrees with comments that manufacturing, processing, or use of chemicalsin a laboratory under the supervision of a technically qualified individualshould be exempt from the provisions of this rule. This exemption is consistentwith the exemption provided in rules implementing sections 311 and 312of Title III, and the OSHA HCS. The exemption does not apply to specialtychemical production or pilot plant scale operations.   The Agency believes that this exemption provides a consistent and necessaryreduction in the reporting burden. For example a stand-alone laboratoryis classified in SIC codes 20 through 39 because it is an auxiliary facilitysupporting a manufacturing operation of a company. This laboratory is,in essence, exempt from the threshold determination and reporting requirementsof this rule. Also a covered facility will not have to review chemicalmanufacture, processing, or use in a laboratory within that facility, providedsuch operation is not conducting specialty chemical production or pilotplant scale activities.   If a toxic chemical is removed from such a laboratory for further processingor use in the facility, the facility must factor such amounts into thresholddeterminations and release reporting.   The Agency does retain certain concerns about releases of toxic chemicalsfrom laboratories. Therefore, EPA will review laboratories as part of itsoverall review of the types of facilities that should be covered by amendmentsto this rule.   <T3>D. The Rule Contains no Modification of Facility Coverage   </T3>EPA has discretionary authority to modify the coverage of facilities undersection 313(b)(1)(B). The report of the congressional conference committeefor Title III states that any such modifications are limited ``* * * toadding SIC codes for facilities which, like facilities within the manufacturingsectors SIC codes 20 through 39, manufacture, process or use toxic chemicalsin a manner such that reporting by these facilities is relevant to thepurposes of this section.'' (H.R. Rep. No. 962, 99th Cong., 2nd sess. 292_hereafterreferred to as the conference report.) The conference report further statesthat section 313(b)(1)(B) is given to provide EPA with the authority toadjust coverage but that ``it does not provide EPA the authority to changethe overall scope of the reporting program for Toxic Chemical Release Forms.''Id. at 293.   The Agency proposed that facilities within SIC codes 20 through 39 be requiredto report. Comments from trade associations, private companies, State agencies,public interest groups and academia requested that EPA use its authorityunder section 313(b)(1)(B) to include other facilities. These commentersnoted that other kinds of facilities beyond those in the manufacturingsector can have significant releases of toxic chemicals. They contend thatif the current scope of reporting is not expanded, the public will notrealize that manufacturing releases constitute only a part of the totalreleases of these chemicals into the environment.   Most commenters provided specific examples of facilities that they wouldlike to see added. They include: Commercial waste treatment facilities,transportation sites, federal facilities, municipal waste treatment facilitiesand publicly owned treatment works, disposal sites, petroleum and chemicalbulk stations and terminals, tank farms, electrical services, petroleumwholesalers, farm suppliers, paint and varnish suppliers, and industriallaunderers. Commenters suggested that SIC codes should not be a primarydeterminant of coverage and that EPA should consider the intent of thelaw to provide citizens information about releases from all important sourcesof emissions.   Modification of facility coverage could also involve deletions of certainindustries from the currently covered SIC codes. In deleting SIC codesthe Agency will consider to what extent certain manufacturing operationsproduce or use toxic chemicals in a manner more similar to operations outsidethe manufacturing sector. The conference report includes an example ofsuch an operation for facilities within SIC code 2875 that mix or blendfertilizer products for sale at the retail level. It is also possible thatcertain manufacturing operations, for example those that conduct simplearticle assembly, may not produce, import, process, use, or release significantamounts of covered toxic chemicals. If by the inherent nature of theiractivities such facilities are unlikely to otherwise be subject to reporting,then it would serve no purpose to continue to include them in the SIC codedesignations.The Agency is choosing not to modify the facility coverage of the ruleat this time. The issues raised in the comments are important ones forEPA to consider in exercising its authority to modify coverage. Such issuesshould be dealt with through full notice and comment rulemaking. The Agencymust carefully evaluate additional types of facilities that may be manufacturing,processing, or using listed toxic chemicals as well as facilities in SICcodes 20 through 39 that do not handle such chemicals. EPA is planningto initiate an evaluation of facility coverage in 1988. As part of thisanalysis, EPA will examine the predominant activities in SIC codes 20 through39. The results of this evaluation and any recommended additions or deletionsto the scope of covered facilities will be published as a proposed amendmentto this rule. As part of this analysis EPA will also look at the concept of value ofproducts shipped and/or produced from designated SIC code establishments.Another potentially more equitable approach of determining multi-establishmentfacility coverage is by using ``value added'' instead of the value of productsshipped and/or produced. The value-added approach may create less distortionand duplication when comparing the contribution by individual establishmentsfor purposes of the overall facility coverage determination. However, value-addedinformation may be less available and more burdensome to determine thanvalue of shipments and/or production. EPA will review the first few yearsof reported data and will attempt to evaluate how the value of shipmentsand/or products approach affects overall facility coverage. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Definitional Issues </ITAG>A. Definition of Manufacture  1. <T3>Coincidental production of toxic chemicals. </T3>EPA proposed to interpret``manufacture'' to include coincidental production of a listed toxic chemicalas a byproduct or impurity during the manufacture, processing, use, ordisposal of any other chemical substance or mixture. Congress adopted thedefinition of ``manufacture'' used in regulations under the Toxic SubstancesControl Act (TSCA) where such an approach is used. The proposed rule'sapproach was intended to cover those situations in which a listed toxicchemical is created (intentionally or unintentionally) and then passedon in commerce or disposed of, but never otherwise accounted for. Commenters objected to this interpretation of the manufacture definitionon grounds that it exceeded the statutory authority of Title III. Theyalso stated that having to make such determinations would require expensive,detailed monitoring that most facilities do not do and would not be requiredto do under section 313. Other commenters stated that, if such a determinationwere required, a <T3>de minimis </T3>cut-off should apply, consistent with OSHA HCS requirements,to reduce the burden on the facility. EPA believes that the definition of manufacture in section 313 includesthe coincidental production of toxic chemicals. Section 313(b)(1)(C) statesthat ``[t]he term `manufacture' means to produce, prepare, import, or compounda toxic chemical.'' There is no limitation in this definition that wouldexclude manufacture of a toxic chemical coincidental to the production,processing, use, or disposal of another chemical, nor is there any indicationin the legislative history of Title III that Congress intended to excludetoxic chemicals produced coincidentally. Accordingly, EPA believes thatsuch production is included in the definition of manufacture under section313. For purposes of the rule however, EPA has distinguished between toxicchemicals which are impurities that remain with another chemical that isprocessed, distributed, or used, from toxic chemicals that are byproductseither sent to disposal or processed, distributed, or used in their ownright. EPA also considers that it would be reasonable to apply a <T3>de minimis </T3>concentration limitation to toxic chemicals that areimpurities in another chemical or mixture. In essence, the <T3>de minimis</T3> cut-off adopted for mixtures (see Unit VI.) would applyto the presence of impurities created as a result of making that mixture,or a component of the mixture. Because the covered toxic chemical as animpurity ends up in a product, most producers of the product will frequentlyknow whether the chemical is present in concentrations that exceed the<T3>de minimis </T3>level, and, thus may be listed on the Material SafetyData Sheet (MSDS) for that product under the OSHA HCS. This final rule does not adopt a <T3>de minimis </T3>concentration limitation in connection with the productionof a byproduct. EPA believes that the facility should be able to quantifythe annual aggregate pounds of production of a byproduct which is not animpurity because the substance is separated from the production streamand used, sold, or disposed of, unlike an impurity which remains in theproduct. The major problem with applying a <T3>de minimis </T3>exemption to a toxic chemical produced as a resultof use or disposal of another chemical is the difficulty of determiningwhere and how to make a precentage determination. For example, there maybe various points in a treatment process at which a percentage determinationcould be taken. Also, those doing a better job of treatment could be unfairlypenalized because such treatment may concentrate the chemical in wasteprior to disposal. Therefore, the conscientious facility may exceed the<T3>de minimis </T3>concentration of the toxic chemical in a waste whereasanother facility having much more dilute waste would not be subject toreporting. Therefore, EPA believes that the estimation of a total annualmass quantity for such coincidental production during use or disposal isa fair approach.In any case, EPA wishes to emphasize that the determination of such coincidentalproduction should be based on the facility's existing production records,monitoring, or analytical data, and reasonable judgment on the part ofthe facility's management. No further monitoring or analysis of production,process, use, or disposal streams is required, consistent with section313.2. <T3>Import of toxic chemicals. </T3>Section 313(b)(1)(c) defines ``manufacture''to include import. Thus the owner or operator of a facility that manufacturesor imports a toxic chemical is potentially subject to the reporting andsupplier notification provisions of the final rule. If a toxic chemicalis both manufactured and imported at a facility, the total amount manufacturedand imported is aggregated for purposes of determining whether the reportingthreshold for manufacturing has been met. Thus it is important for a facilityto determine whether it is importing a toxic chemical, either in relativelypure form or as part of a mixture.The U.S. Customs Service defines an importer as a person who imports achemical into the customs territory of the United States and includes theperson primarily liable for the payment of any duties on the merchandiseor an authorized agent acting on that person's behalf, the consignee, theimporter of record, the actual owner if an actual owner's declaration andsuperseding bond has been filed in accordance with 19 CFR 141.20, and thetransferee, if the right to draw merchandise in a bonded warehouse hasbeen transferred in accordance with Subpart C of 19 CFR Part 144.Section 313 refers to a facility which manufactured (including imported)a toxic chemical. Section 313 does not define ``import'' or explain whena facility is considered to have imported a chemical. Given the broad Customsdefinition of who is an importer, several persons may be ``importers''for any given shipment of a toxic chemical brought into the customs territoryof the U.S. For example, a facility may conduct the entire import transactionusing its own personnel in which case it would be the only importer. Inother cases, facilities may act through import brokers or others who dothe paperwork and pay the duties but provide for direct shipment of thechemical to the facility.EPA determined that for a given imported shipment of a toxic chemical,only one facility should be considered to have imported the shipment. Otherwise,there could be double counting of each shipment. Thus for purposes of thefinal rule, EPA has defined ``import'' to mean to cause a chemical to beimported into the customs territory of the U.S. For purposes of the definitionof ``import,'' EPA has defined ``to cause'' in a way which designates theperson who in effect controls the importing of the chemical, i.e. the personwho intends that it be imported and controls the identity of the chemicaland the amount to be imported, not those who are merely involved in thetransaction.Accordingly, through this definition, a facility which completes the entireimport transaction for toxic chemical using its own personnel would beconsidered to have imported the chemical. Further, a facility that orderedthe import of a toxic chemical through an import broker, specifying theidentity, amount, and that it is to be imported, also would be consideredto have imported the chemical. However, if a facility ordered a toxic chemicalfrom a chemical supplier in the U.S., who in turn decided to import thechemical to fill the order or filled the order from a previously importedstock of the chemical, the chemical supplier's facility would be consideredto have imported the toxic chemical. The facility which ordered the chemicalwould not be considered to have imported the chemical because it did notcontrol the amount to be imported or specify that it was to be imported.In most cases, determining whether a facility caused the import of a toxicchemical will not be critical because a facility in SIC codes 20 through39 which receives such a toxic chemical from an import shipment is alsolikely to process or otherwise use the chemical. Since the thresholds formanufacturing and processing are the same and the use threshold is lowerthan the manufacturing threshold, EPA does not believe that defining ``import''in this way will result in any facility escaping the reporting requirementsof the final rule. In addition, EPA does not believe that facilities willevade supplier notification requirements under this approach.3. <T3>Toll Manufacturers of Toxic Chemicals. </T3>EPA recognizes that itis a practice in the chemical industry for one company to contract withanother company to produce a chemical exclusively for it. This may be doneto use available production facilites, to take advantage of cheaper productiontechniques, or to avoid building additional plant capacity. The companyinitiating the activity typically retains control over the identity ofthe chemical, the amount to be produced, and the production technology.The company actually producing the chemical in these situations is oftenreferred to as a ``toll manufacturer.''  Under TSCA, which authorizes EPA to apply certain requirements to personswho manufacture chemical substances and mixtures, EPA has sometimes treatedboth companies in a toll manufacturer relationship as ``manufacturers''subject to the requirements. However, for purposes of section 313 reporting,EPA interprets the definition of manufacture to apply only to a facilitythat actually produces a toxic chemical. Thus, in a toll manufacturer situation,the facility actually producing a toxic chemical would be subject to reporting,if it produced more than the threshold for manufacturing. The other company'sfacility would be subject to the reporting for that chemical only if italso actually manufactured the chemical in excess of the manufacturingthreshold, or if it processed or otherwise used the chemical in excessof an applicable threshold. EPA believes this interpretation is consistentwith congressional intent to capture releases associated with manufacturingactivities.  <T3>B. Clarifications Regarding Process and Otherwise Use; Exemption ofCertain Uses  </T3>EPA included the statutory definition of ``process'' in the proposed ruleand proposed a definition of ``otherwise use.'' The statute does not specificallydefine ``use'' or ``otherwise use'' yet there are different reporting thresholdsassociated with manufacturing and processing activities versus the ``otherwiseusing'' of a listed toxic chemical. Therefore, the basic purpose of includinga definition of ``otherwise use'' was to distinguish for the potentialrespondent what activities would be subject to the different thresholds.The proposed ``otherwise use'' definition was broad in scope, basicallyencompassing all uses of a chemical at a facility not covered by the definitionsof the terms ``manufacture'' or ``process.'' The preamble of the proposedrule contained one example of processing versus use of a chemical, andthe proposed instructions for the form gave examples of manufacturing,processing, and use activities.  Commenters from industry took issue with the proposed definition of otherwiseuse and requested further clarification of the differences between processingand use activities. Still other commenters recommended that certain usesbe exempted from the final rule reporting requirements.  1. <T3>Clarification of the terms ``process'' and ``otherwise use''. </T3>Inthe public meetings, workshops, and in a preliminary question and answerdocument on section 313 issues, EPA has made the following basic distinctionbetween processing and use activities.  a. <T3>Processing is an incorporative activity. </T3>The process definitionfocuses on the incorporation of a chemical into a product that is distributedin commerce. This incorporation can involve reactions that convert thechemical, actions that change the form or physical state of the chemical,the blending or mixing of the chemical with other chemicals, the inclusionof the chemical in an article, or the repackaging of the chemical. Whateverthe activity, a listed toxic chemical is processed if (after its manufacture)it is ultimately made part of some material or product distributed in commerce.Examples of the processing of chemicals include chemicals used as raw materialsor intermediates in the manufacture of other chemicals, the formulationof mixtures or other products where the incorporation of the chemical impartssome desired property to the product (e.g., a pigment, surfactant, or solvent),the preparation of a chemical for distribution in commerce in a desirableform, state, and/or quantity (i.e. repackaging), and incorporating thechemical into an article for industrial, trade, or consumer use.   b. <T3>Otherwise use is a non-incorporative activity. </T3>EPA is interpretingotherwise using a covered toxic chemical to be activities that support,promote, or contribute to the facility's activities, where the chemicaldoes not intentionally become part of a product distributed in commerce.Examples would be a chemical processing aid such as a catalyst, solvent,or reaction terminator. These chemicals may be integral parts of a reactionbut do not become part of a product. Other examples would be manufacturingaids such as lubricants, refrigerants, or metalworking fluids, or chemicalsused for other purposes at the facility such as cleaners, degreasers, orfuels.  2. <T3>Comments relating to EPA's interpretive distinction between processand use. </T3>One commenter disagreed with EPA's interpretation that anon-incorporative use of a solvent in chemical processing should be classifiedas otherwise using it. This commenter stated that the solvent can be integralto a reaction and that the solvent can be in the same equipment as otherprocessed chemicals, with the same low probability of release. Anothercommenter stated that a catalyst should not be classified as a processingaid (i.e. otherwise used) because it participates in a reaction. EPA disagreeswith these comments on the grounds that it is necessary and appropriateto distinguish processing from otherwise using based on the thrust of theprocess definition (i.e., whether the toxic chemical in question becomespart of some product distributed in commerce).  Another commenter raised the example of a paint that is applied duringthe manufacture of automobiles. Certain toxic chemical components of thepaint mixture would become part of the automobile and other toxic chemicalssuch as the solvents would evaporate as intended. Is the mixture processed,used, or both? EPA's interpretation is that the activity of each relevantcomponent of the mixture would have to be evaluated. The solvents wouldbe ``used.'' Therefore, they would be subject to the 10,000 pound threshold.The other components of the mixture such as the pigments, would be ``processed''because they are incorporated into the article. Therefore, those mixturecomponents would be subject to reporting based on the process threshold. 3. <T3>Exemptions of certain uses. </T3>Several commenters stated that theproposed definition of otherwise use was too broad. They stated that withoutsome limitations or exemptions the presence at the facility of a listedchemical in any form would have to be factored into threshold calculations.One example given was copper in copper pipes that are part of the facility.This can be interpreted as an ancillary use of copper. They claimed thatsuch a situation would be unreasonable, would place an unnecessary reportingburden on many facilities, and would result in many meaningless reports.One commenter suggested that the otherwise use definition be modified toinclude the concept of ``active'' uses at the facility.  Based on a review of the comments and questions received, EPA has determinedthat it is appropriate to place some limitations on the definition of ``otherwiseuse.'' EPA has developed (andSection;372.38 of the rule) a listing of certainexempt uses of toxic chemicals as follows:  (1) Use as a structural component of the facility.(2) Use of products for routine janitorial or facility grounds maintenance.Examples include use of janitorial cleaning supplies, fertilizers, andpesticides similar in type or concentration to consumer products.(3) Personal uses by employees or other persons at the facility of foods,drugs, cosmetics, or other personal items containing toxic chemicals, includingsupplies of such products within the facility such as in a facility operatedcafeteria, store, or infirmary.(4) Use of products containing toxic chemicals for the purpose of maintainingmotor vehicles operated by the facility.(5) Use of toxic chemicals present in process water and non-contact coolingwater as drawn from the environment or from municipal sources, or toxicchemicals present in air used either as compressed air or as part of combustion.(6) Use of articles.C. Full-Time EmployeeOne commenter requested that EPA define what it means to have 10 or morefull-time employees for compliance with section 313 reporting.The Bureau of the Census defines a full-time employee as a person working35 hours or more per week, persons who worked 1 to 34 hours for non-economicreasons and usually work full-time, and persons with a job but not at workwho usually work full-time. The Bureau of Labor Statistics has a very similardefinition. Their definition does not include contract employees. The abovetwo definitions are used in surveys conducted as of a particular week,not for an entire year.EPA considered two factors in the development of the employee thresholddetermination. First, the definition should reasonably apply to the annualbasis of the reporting. Many facilities may have large seasonal variationsin employment, and the standard must apply to those situations in an equitablemanner. Second, facilities with large numbers of contract employees shouldnot escape reporting because of different employment arrangements.EPA considered options for determining whether a facility meets the employeethreshold as follows. First, full-time employee determinations could bemade based on the highest number of full-time employees during any weekof the calendar year. This method would ensure that facilities with highlyvariable employment patterns would be covered for reporting if they metthe other requirements (SIC codes and chemical thresholds). Second, full-timeemployee counts could be determined by the number of employees as of aparticular date during the year. Such an option would limit the burdenof checking through employment records, but is arbitrary with respect tothe choice of a date. Third, the determination could be based on the conceptof full time equivalents. A generally accepted level of annual full timehours worked is 2,000 hours. The number of payroll hours for the year wouldbe divided by 2,000 to determine the equivalent number of full-time employees.Fourth, full-time employee counts could be determined by an average ofthe quarterly maximum number of full-time employees for the calendar year.This option would be the most burdensome to calculate.EPA decided to define full-time employee on the basis of a full-time equivalentcalculation. Total annual hours worked by all employees, including contractemployees, at the facility is divided by 2,000. In this way, a facilityis able to make an easy determination of whether it equals or exceeds a10 employee equivalent level by determining if the total hours worked atthe facility equals or exceeds 20,000 hours. EPA believes that this approachprovides a fair and consistent measure of employment.D. Definition of Article and Article ExemptionThese issues deal with the definition of article and whether articles shouldbe explicitly exempt for the purposes of threshold determinations and releasecalculations.1. <T3>Modification of the article definition. </T3>The definition of articlethat appeared in the proposed rule is the same definition used in regulationsunder TSCA. One commenter asserted that the definition of article thatappears in the OSHA HCS should be substituted for the proposed articledefinition. The commenter contended that the OSHA article definition ismore appropriate for section 313 because the language in the latter partof the OSHA definition relates to the potential for release and exposureduring normal end use. Also, it would be consistent with provisions ofthe Title III sections 311 and 312 rule (52 FR 38344). The instructionsfor the sections 311 and 312 reporting forms incorporate exemption languagefrom the OSHA HCS, part of which is the exemption of articles.The article definition in the proposed rule read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">``Article'' means a manufactured item which is formed to a specificshape or design during manufacture, which has end use function(s) dependentin whole or in part upon its shape or design during end use, and has eitherno change in chemical composition during its end use or only those changesof composition which have no commercial purpose separate from that of thearticle, or result mixtures or articles, except that fluids and particlesare not considered articles regardless of shape or design. The articledefinition in the OSHA HCS reads as follows: ``Article'' means a manufactureditem: (i) Which is formed to a specific shape or design during manufacture;(ii) which has end use function(s) dependent in whole or in part upon itsshape or design during end use; and (iii) which does not release, or otherwiseresult in exposure to a hazardous chemical under normal conditions of use.</ITAG>The first part of each definition are identical. The latter parts of thedefinitions differ significantly. The commenter pointed out that the OSHAHCS definition will function more appropriately because it will keep certainexposure-causing items from being considered articles whereas the proposeddefinition would not. The commenter also asserts that the exception atthe end of the proposed definition for fluids and particles is unnecessary.In its review of this issue EPA considered several options, including retainingthe article definition as proposed, retaining the proposed definition butclarifying the wording of the latter part, and adapting the OSHA HCS articledefinition for use in this rule. EPA has determined that it agrees withthe commenter and has adopted the OSHA HCS article definition with somemodifications because it is more appropriate for section 313 purposes thanthe TSCA definition. The TSCA article definition is worded primarily todistinguish ``chemical substances'' and ``mixtures'' from those manufactureditems that contain chemical substances and mixtures. The OSHA HCS definitionwas adapted from the TSCA regulatory definition, for the purpose of exemptingcertain items from the MSDS preparation requirements; the supposition beingthat the item's normal end use would not release or cause exposure to a``hazardous chemical'' in the article.The revised article definition in the final rule reads as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">``Article'' means a manufactured item: (i) Which is formed to a specificshape or design during manufacture; (ii) which has end use functions dependentin whole or in part upon its shape or design during end use; and (iii)which does not release a toxic chemical under normal conditions of processingor use of that item at the facility.</ITAG>EPA wishes to emphasize that under this definition an item will not qualifyas an article if there are releases of toxic chemicals from the normaluse or processing of that item. When attempting to apply this definitionto an item used or processed at a facility, the facility should keep thisrelease factor in mind. For example, under normal conditions the millingof metals (e.g. copper) can generate fume or dust containing listed toxicchemicals. Thus, the metal or plastic item being processed would not qualifyas an article in that manufacturing setting. However, if the only ``release''from processing an item is the disposal of solid scrap (e.g., pieces ofcloth or sections of pipe that are recognizable as having the same formas the item) then EPA considers that the processed item still qualifiesas an article.Toxic chemicals in an item that qualifies as an article are not subjectto reporting even if the facility disposes of the article after use. Forexample, the facility uses a battery that contains lead. Lead is not releasedfrom the battery during normal use at the facility. When the facility disposesof the battery, it does not have to factor the amount of lead in that articleinto a threshold or release calculation. 2. <T3>Articles exemption. </T3>The proposed rule covered the processing anduse of toxic chemicals and mixtures containing such toxic chemicals. EPAincluded a proposed definition of article but, as certain commenters pointedout, did not specifically exclude the use or processing of articles. Commentersencouraged EPA to specifically exempt the use and processing of articlesfrom the threshold determination and release reporting requirements ofthe rule. According to these comments, the normal end uses of such articlesby definition do not result in the release of toxic chemcials containedwithin such articles. Therefore, such an exemption will reduce the burdenon industry significantly because fewer materials will have to be evaluatedfor threshold and release determinations. The purpose of including an article definition in the rule was for theexpressed purpose of exempting such articles. The final rule contains anew exemption section (andSection; 372.38). This section exempts articlescontaining covered toxic chemicals as defined under section D above fromthreshold and release determinations. EPA cautions facilities to evaluatecarefully normal processing and use of an item to determine if releaseof a toxic chemical occurs (i.e., if indeed the item qualifies under thedefinition as an article). <ITAG tagnum="84">V. Threshold Issues </ITAG><T3>A. Comments Requesting Modification of Thresholds</T3> The thresholds for reporting that were presented in the proposed rule arethe thresholds mandated by section 313. The threshold for manufacturingor processing a toxic chemical is 75,000 pounds for 1987, 50,000 poundsfor 1988, and 25,000 pounds for 1989 and thereafter. The threshold forotherwise using a toxic chemical is 10,000 pounds for any year. EPA hasthe authority to modify these thresholds provided that such modificationobtains reporting of a substantial majority of total releases of each toxicchemical for all facilities subject to reporting. A wide range of comments was received regarding potential modificationsto the thresholds. Commenters from environmental and public interest groupsasserted that thresholds shoud be lowered to increase release reporting.One commenter stated that a 10,000 pound threshold, over 3 years shouldbe used rather than a graduated threshold. Commenters representing theindustry asserted that thresholds could be raised without affecting dataquality or reporting requirements. Other related comments stated that thresholdsshould be modified to include only larger facilities and that the ``user''threshold should be raised to the same level as thresholds for the manufacturingor processing of a toxic substance. Additionally, one company commentedthat the determination of a need to modify thresholds should be based onthe first few years' reporting levels. Comments from a professional society and a State government indicated thatthe proposed thresholds are valid and should not be raised. Additional comments presented alternatives to the type of thresholds presentedin the proposal. Two commenters indicated that toxic effects could be usedto determine threshold adjustments. One commenter recommended a differentseries of thresholds based on standard container sizes to make thresholddeterminations easier. Another commenter proposed that the statutory employeesize limitation of 10 or fewer employees be removed rather than reducingthreshold, amounts for reporting purposes. One commenter proposed an emissions-basedapproach to exclude small releases of toxic chemicals, regardless of thequantity manufactured, processed, or used. The final rule contains the statutory thresholds present in the proposedrule. EPA does not believe that it has received in the comments sufficientdata to support any overall modification of the statutory thresholds. Inaddition, EPA did not propose any such change. EPA agrees with commentsto the effect that the first few years' data should be evaluated to determinewhether modifications of the threshold would meet the statutory test ofobtaining reporting on a substantial majority of the releases (i.e., poundsreleased per year) of each chemical from subject facilities. EPA may considerchanging the reporting thresholds based on several years of data collection.Revising the threshold amount can be based on specific chemicals, classesof chemicals, or categories of facilities. EPA may consider a number offactors for threshold modification including exposure factors such as populationdensity, the distance of population from covered facilities, and the typesof releases. Threshold modifications could also take into account the relativepotency of the chemical or class of chemicals and the effects of concern.Another type of threshold modification the Agency will investigate relatesto the type of facility, either generally by size or by type of industry.<T3>B. Threshold Determination Issues</T3> Several issues arose as a result of comment on EPA's proposed approachesto determining whether a facility has exceeded a threshold. 1. <T3>Recycle and reuse. </T3>EPA proposed that a threshold determinationin connection with on-site recycle and reuse activities be calculated bydetermining the amount of the toxic chemical in the recycle/reuse operationat the beginning of the year and add to that any quantity of the chemicalbrought on site. Commenters reacted to this proposal with the following:a. The threshold should be based on the amount of the chemical ``actedupon.'' This would include the operating capacity of the recycle activityplus only the amount added during the year, not the total quantity broughton site. b. The amount calculated for the purpose of threshold determinations shouldonly be the quantity added to or actually consumed by the recycle operations.c. EPA should clarify that the threshold amount recycled should not counta pound of chemical more than once as it cycles through the activity.After a review of the comments, EPA has determined that the threshold determinationsshould be based on the amount of the material added to a recycle/reusesystem during the reporting year. This would fairly depict the amount ofa chemical ``consumed'' during a year in connection with this particularuse. During start-up of such a recycle/reuse operation or in the eventthat the contents of the whole recycle system had to be replaced, thistotal system quantity would have to be factored into the facility's thresholddetermination for that chemical. EPA believes that this approach is consistentwith the objectives of encouraging recycle/reuse activities.2. <T3>Amount brought on site versus amount processed or used.</T3> The previousissue points toward a more general problem of distinguishing whether thethreshold must be calculated based on the amount of a chemical broughton site during the year or the amount actually processed or used. One commentercited a situation in which a facility may have a running inventory of over10,000 pounds of toluene but actually uses only 9,000 pounds during theyear. Provided that this is the only use of toluene, the commenters contendedthat the threshold for use has not been met.EPA agrees with this comment. The final rule provides that the thresholdfor processing and use is based upon the total amount actually used orprocessed at the facility, not the total amount brought to the facilityduring the year. This would not apply, however, in cases where importationcontributes to a calculation of whether the facility exceeds a ``manufacture''threshold. The act of importing the chemical to the facility is withinthe definition of manufacture. Therefore, any quantity brought on sitedue to importation has to be counted along with any amount of the samechemical produced at that facility. However when a facility does exceeda threshold, any emissions from amounts of the chemical in the runninginventory (i.e. storage) would have to be factored into the emissions calculations.3. <T3>Exceeding any threshold captures the facility for all releases of thatchemical. </T3>A commenter objected to the interpretation that if a facilityexceeds any threshold for a listed chemical, it must report all emissionsof that chemical from the facility. The commenter claims that reportingshould be limited to the activity that triggers the threshold to be consistentwith Congressional intent because Congress set such thresholds to limitthe burden on industry and provide the public with useful and manageableinformation.EPA disagrees with this comment. Congress indicated that section 313 shouldcover releases from the facility to all environmental media. The thresholdsare provided as the means for determining facility coverage, not as a factorin determining which emissions from the facility must be reported.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Mixtures and Trade Name Products</ITAG>The proposed rule indicated that mixtures and trade name products thata facility imports, processes, or uses would be evaluated and any coveredtoxic chemicals in those products would be factored into threshold determinationsand release reporting. However, EPA recognizes that facilities may notalways have full information regarding mixture components. EPA provideddetailed guidance in the preamble of the proposed rule for making a reasonabledetermination of what is ``known to be present at the facility'' with respectto determining the presence and composition of covered toxic chemicalsin mixtures at the facility. The proposed instructions for the form alsooutlined a method for factoring mixtures into the threshold determinations.In addition, the proposal presented EPA's belief that suppliers of mixturesand trade name products have a responsibility to provide their customerswith information sufficient for them to comply with the requirements ofsection 313. EPA requested comment on several options for a supplier notificationrequirement in connection with, or in lieu of, a user determination requirement.EPA received a wide range of comment on the mixture issue.A. De Minimis Concentration LimitA predominant area of comment was the request for some type of <T3>de minimis</T3> concentration limitation for listed toxic chemicalsin mixtures. Commenters argued that many mixtures or trade name productsmay contain ``trace'' quantities of section 313 chemicals. They assertedthat it would be both unreasonable and extremely burdensome for processorsand users of such products to have to account for these quantities in developingthreshold determinations. In addition, commenters asserted that it wouldbe equally as burdensome for suppliers of these products to have to determineand disclose small percentages of section 313 chemicals in their productsbeyond that currently required under the OSHA HCS. Most commenters suggestedthat EPA adopt a <T3>de minimis</T3> concentration limitation consistent with the OSHA HCSrequirement. The HCS provides that a supplier does not have to list a ``hazardouschemical'' component in a mixture if that chemical comprises less than1 percent of the mixture or 0.1 percent where the chemical is a carcinogen(as defined in the HCS). Other commenters suggested <T3>de minimis</T3> levels ranging from 2 percent to 10 percent. Otherrelated concepts would exempt from consideration solutions containing greaterthan 75 percent water or would establish <T3>de minimis</T3> release standards.Based on the comments received, EPA has determined that it is reasonableand appropriate to adopt a <T3>de minimis</T3> concentration limitation for toxic chemicals in mixturesunder section 313. EPA believes that it is necessary to provide a <T3>de minimis</T3> limitation to help reduce the information developmentburden both on the part of the user and the supplier of such products.For the final rule EPA has adopted a <T3>de minimis</T3> limitation of 1 percent, or 0.1 percent in the caseof an OSHA HCS defined carcinogen. EPA believes that the <T3>de minimis</T3> level chosen is appropriate for two reasons. First,it is consistent with existing OSHA HCS requirements for development ofMSDS information and with other requirements under sections 311 and 312of Title III. Suppliers of products are familiar with these levels and,at least for the first two years of reporting, users of these mixturesare only likely to be able to rely on the product MSDS for informationabout the content and percentage composition of covered toxic chemicalsin these products. Second, EPA does not expect that the processing anduse of mixtures containing less than the <T3>de minimis</T3> concentration would, in most instances, contributesignificantly to the threshold determinations or releases of listed toxicchemicals from any given facility.Therefore, any listed toxic chemical that is present in a mixture belowthese <T3>de minimis</T3> concentrations does not have to be factored into thresholdor release determinations by the facility. This exemption applies to allmixtures or trade name products imported, processed, or otherwise usedat the facility.  EPA defined ``mixture'' in the final rule to cover combinations of chemicalsthat are mixed together, as well as relatively pure chemicals which haveimpurities present. Thus, if a toxic chemical were present as an impuritywith another chemical at a level less than 1 percent, or 0.1 percent inthe case of a carcinogen, the <T3>de minimis</T3> exemption would apply, and the person processing orusing the toxic chemical impurity would not be required to count the quantitypresent as an impurity toward the threshold determination. They would alsonot be required to consider that quantity when determining releases tothe environment.  The <T3>de minimis</T3> exemption applies only to the presence of the toxicchemical in the mixture. If a person formulates a mixture by mixing variouschemicals together, including a toxic chemical, the person is a processorof the toxic chemical. The person must consider the quantity of the toxicchemical added to the mixture, both for threshold determinations and releasereporting, including releases from the formulation activity. However, sucha person would not be required to consider releases of the toxic chemicalresulting from its presence in the mixture at less than 1 percent or 0.1percent, as appropriate.  If a person manufactures a chemical and in the process creates a toxicchemical impurity present at less than 1 percent or 0.1 percent, as appropriate,the person is not required to consider the amount of the toxic chemicalso manufactured for threshold determinations or release reporting (providedthat the impurity is not separated from the commercial product).  EPA plans to review this <T3>de minimis</T3> policy and the assumptions upon which it is based inlight of data that will be collected under this rule.  B. User Determination Versus Supplier Notification  As stated in the introduction to this unit, EPA proposed a detailed approachfor users to make a reasonable determination of the presence of section313 chemicals in products they use. In response to the proposed approach,one commenter stated that the standard in the statute is ``known to bepresent at the facility'' and asserted that a facility has no affirmativeobligation to seek information where there is no apparent information abouta section 313 chemical in a mixture beyond such readily available sourcesas the MSDS for that product.  Others commented on the options in the proposed rule preamble for suppliersto notify customers or EPA about the presence and percent composition ofcovered toxic chemicals in their products. A number of commenters statedthat a supplier should be required to notify its customers about the presenceand composition of listed toxic chemicals in the product. From an overallburden standpoint, these commenters stated that there are naturally fewersuppliers than users. Without a supplier notification provision, userswould have to contact each of their suppliers each year. These commentersstated that a supplier notification requirement would ultimately placeless burden on the suppliers themselves because their staffs would nothave to be constantly responding to user requests. Also, most supplierscould ``piggyback'' such notice with the OSHA HCS required MSDS for theproduct and thereby not incur a significant additional burden. Other commentersagreed with the supplier notification concept but preferred that EPA allowa voluntary customer/supplier interaction, not require such notificationas part of the rule. Other commenters stated that EPA does not have theauthority under section 313 to require this type of notification nor wouldit be appropriate to invoke the general rulemaking authority under section328 of Title III to authorize such requirement.  Other comments addressed trade secret related implications of a suppliernotification requirement as follows: The OSHA HCS allows mixture componentidentities to be claimed trade secret. In addition, the firm is not requiredto supply percentage composition data on the MSDS. Some firms do providecomposition data voluntarily in the form of a specific percentage, a range,or some upper bound. A supplier requirement may conflict with the MSDSrequirements because some composition information will have to be disclosed.In addition, the criteria for claiming and substantiating the protectionof specific chemical identity is more stringent under Title III than itis under the OSHA HCS requirements.  1. <T3>Supplier notification requirement.</T3> EPA has carefully consideredthe implications of a detailed user determination requirement versus asupplier notification requirement. EPA has determined that the most effectiveand least burdensome approach is a supplier notification requirement. EPAagrees with comments that a supplier notification system provides the mostefficient means of moving the information about the presence and compositionof listed toxic chemicals into the hands of the facilities that must report.Providing more complete information about mixture composition in particularwill give the facility the information it needs to make threshold and releasedeterminations.  Under the final rule persons who must develop and distribute the noticeare those who own or operate facilities in SIC codes 20 through 39 thatmanufacture or process listed toxic chemicals, and who distribute productscontaining such toxic chemicals to facilities in SIC codes 20 through 39,or to others who in turn distribute them to such facilities. Thereforethe types of products covered by these notices are products that will befurther processed or used by facilities potentially required to report.Notices are not required for products sold for individual consumer use.Exemptions similar to those found in the OSHA HCS and rule implementingsections 311 and 312 of Title III are incorporated into this supplier notificationprovision.  The supplier notification requirement in andSection;372.45 is structuredto give processors and users of mixtures and trade name products positiveinformation about the presence of listed toxic chemicals as follows:  a. If listed toxic chemicals are present in the mixture or trade name productabove the <T3>de minimis</T3> cut-off level, the notice must identify those specificcomponents as they appear in the list of toxic chemicals in andSection;372.65of the rule and provide their percent composition in the product.  b. If the supplier maintains that the identity of a toxic chemical is atrade secret under provisions of the OSHA HCS, the notice must identifythe chemcial as subject to section 313 and provide a generic identity thatis structurally descriptive of the chemical.  c. If the supplier contends that specific composition information for atoxic chemical in a mixture or trade name product represents a trade secret,the supplier must provide a maximum concentration level of that chemicalin the mixture or product. For example, the notice would indicate thattoluene constitutes not more than 15 percent of the product. The suppliermust choose a level that is only large enough to effectively mask the relevanttrade secret associated with the chemical component. A basis for the levelchosen must be placed in the supplier's records pertaining to this notice.This maximum concentration level is critical to users of the mixture becausethey will be using it as part of their threshold and release determinations.Gross over-representations of such maximum concentrations in a mixturemay result in unnecessary reporting by that customer or overestimationof releases of the chemical from the customer's facility.The notice must be in writing and must clearly indicate that it pertainsto the presence of chemicals covered by section 313 of SARA Title III.If a MSDS must be distributed with the product, EPA requires that the notificationbe attached to the MSDS and that it clearly indicate that the notice isnot to be detached from the MSDS. This requirement is included because the Agency is concerned about thenotification process breaking down when distributors not covered by thisrule are handling and redistributing the products. The OSHA HCS requiressuch distributors to pass along an MSDS for a product. Therefore, EPA determinedthat the most efficient and least burdensome approach of assuring thatthe notice would reach the intended recipient is to require that it beattached to or incorporated into the MSDS. The notice must be provided with at least the first shipment of the productto each recipient during the calendar year. When the supplier changes theformulation of the product to affect the composition of the toxic chemicalin the product, a revised notice must be sent with the first shipment ofthe changed product to each recipient. If the supplier determines thatthe product contains a section 313 chemical in excess of the <T3>de minimis </T3>concentration limit which was present previously butunknown, the supplier must modify the notification within 30 days and providethe revised notice with the first shipment after that 30 day period toeach recipient; this notice must identify prior shipments in that calendaryear to which it also applies. 2. <T3>Phase-in of the supplier notification requirement. </T3>One commentersuggested that if mixtures are to be factored into the reporting of listedchemicals that such requirement be phased-in over a 1- or 2-year period.According to the commenters, such a phase-in approach would allow timefor both suppliers and users to gear-up for mixture determinations. EPA does not agree that mixtures in total should be excluded for the 1987reporting year. Mixtures make up a large part of potential use of listedtoxic chemicals. Therefore, importers, processors, and users of mixturesmust use the best available information at hand to determine whether thecomponents of a mixture have to be factored into threshold and releasedeterminations under this rule. However, the concept of a phase-in for the related supplier notificationrequirement does have merit. In EPA's opinion, it would be both unreasonableand impractical for suppliers to develop modifications to their MSDS ordevelop additional notices and distribute such notices in 1988. Therefore,the supplier notification requirement does not take effect until the firstshipment of a product in 1989. However, as a practical matter, suppliersshould begin as soon as possible to develop the notice relevant to thoseproducts that contain covered toxic chemicals. Until the supplier notificationgoes into effect, users and processors of mixtures are only required touse readily available data regarding such mixtures. 3. <T3>Making threshold determinations and reporting for toxic chemical componentsof a mixture or trade name product. </T3>Until the supplier notificationunder this rule begins, EPA assumes that some suppliers have provided orwill provide information to customers about the presence of toxic chemicalsin their mixtures or trade name products. The information provided is likelyto vary from specifically identifying a toxic chemical and its concentrationto advising only that there is a section 313 toxic chemical present, butproviding no chemical identity or concentration information. Once supplier notification begins under the rule, most customers will atleast be told that a toxic chemical is present, its generic chemical identity,and its upper bound concentration in the mixture or trade name product.However, even after supplier notification begins, customers may receivesuch mixtures or trade name products from persons not in SIC codes 20 through39 or from foreign suppliers. Neither of these suppliers would be subjectto the supplier notification requirements. Therefore, customers might receiveless information about toxic chemicals in such mixtures and products. Accordingly,EPA has included in the final rule and instructions detailed provisionsfor reporting by owners and operators of covered facilities who import,process, or otherwise use toxic chemicals as part of mixtures or tradename products. All reporting by persons who import, process, or use mixtures or tradename products containing toxic chemicals is predicated on those personsknowing that toxic chemicals are present in the mixture or trade name product.If such a person receives a mixture or trade name product, the person mustdetermine whether it meets an applicable reporting threshold in eitherof the following situations: (i) The person was told, or had determinedthrough chemical analysis or otherwise, the specific identity or CAS RegistryNumber of a chemical in the mixture or trade name product and that chemicalappears in andSection; 372.65 of the rule; or (ii) the person was told thatthe mixture or trade name product contains a toxic chemical subject tosection 313. If either of these situations applies, the person is not requiredto inquire further about the mixture or trade name product. Section 313and the final rule do not impose any obligation to test a mixture or tradename product to determine whether it contains a toxic chemical. However,if a person has tested such a mixture or trade name product for its ownreasons, it must consider the results in determining whether to report.The final rule identifies six scenarios for persons making reporting determinationsfor toxic chemicals in mixtures or trade name products; 1. The person knows the specific chemical identity of the toxic chemicalin the mixture or trade name product, and a. The person know its specific concentration in the mixture or product;b. The person knows only its upper bound concentration in the mixture orproduct; or c. The person has no information about its concentration in the mixtureor product. 2. The person does not know the specific chemical identity of the toxicchemical in the mixture or trade name product, and a. The person knows its specific concentration in the mixture or product;b. The person knows only its upper bound concentration in the mixture orproduct; or c. The person has no information about its concentration in the mixtureor product. When the person knows the specific chemical identity of the toxic chemicalin the mixture or trade name product, making the threshold determinationwill involve combining the amount of the chemical in that mixture or productwith amounts of the same chemical also manufactured, processed, or otherwiseused at the facility. However, the person is only required to considerthe weight of the toxic chemical in the mixture or trade name product,not the total weight of the mixture or trade name product. Determining the weight of the toxic chemical in the mixture or trade nameproduct depends on the information the person has about the percentagecomposition of the chemical in the mixture or product. If the person knowsthe specific concentration, determining the weight of the chemical is straightforward.However, if the person knows only the upper bound concentration, the personis required to assume that the toxic chemical is present at that concentrationand calculate the weight accordingly. In the event that the person doesnot know the specific concentration or the upper bound concentration thenthe person is not required to further estimate or otherwise factor thatchemical in that mixture or product into threshold or release calculations.Where the person does not know the specific chemical identity of the toxicchemical in the mixture or trade name product, the person is required onlyto consider the quantity of that chemical component in that mixture orproduct in making a threshold determination. Since the person does notknow the specific identity of the chemical, the person cannot combine theweight of the chemical in the mixture with any other toxic chemicals manufactured,processed, or otherwise used at the facility because the person cannotdetermine that they are the same chemical. Accordingly, the threshold determinationsand the reporting, if any, will be specific to the toxic chemical in themixture or product. Determining the weight of the toxic chemical in the mixture or productin this case is the same as for determining the weight when the specificchemical identity is known. Determining the weight of the toxic chemical in the mixture or productin this case is the same as for determining the weight when the specificchemical identity is known. Once the applicable threshold is met, reporting the chemical identity varieswith the degree of knowledge. If the specific identity is known, the personmust report the identity and CAS Registry Number, if any, in Part III,Section 1 of Form R. If only a generic chemical name is known, that namemust be reported in Part III, Section 2 of Form R. If no generic name isknown, the trade name or other name applied to the chemical, or to themixture or product of which it is a component, must be reported in PartIII, Section 2 of Form R. With respect to estimating releases, such estimates must be based on theconcentration of the toxic chemical in the mixture or trade name product.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Form Specific Issues </ITAG>A. Certification Statement Section 313 requires that a senior management official sign a certificationstatement for submitted forms. The proposed statement would have requiredthat the person certify that the submitted information is true, accurate,and complete based upon his or her personal examination of the completedforms. The Agency received several comments on certification relating to threeissues: (1) The definition of a senior management official, (2) the requirementthat the certifier has ``personally examined and is familiar with'' thesubmitted information, and (3) the requirement that the company must certifythat the submitted information is true, accurate, and complete. 1. <T3>Senior management official. </T3>Section 313(g)(1)(B) defines a seniormanagement official as ``a senior official with management responsibilityfor the person or persons completing the report.'' In the preamble to the proposed rule, EPA stated that a senior managementofficial could be an officer of a company, a facility manager (rather thana corporate officer), or the manager of environmental programs (for thefacility or for the corporation) responsible for certifying similar reportsunder other environmental regulatory requirements. Commenters were concerned that neither definition appeared in EPA's regulationsor in the instructions to the proposed form. Also, commenters wanted tomaintain flexibility of having either a facility management officer orcorporate manager sign the certification statement by allowing signatureby a manager of the persons preparing the report or by the manager of environmentalprograms for either the facility or the corporation. The Agency has added a definition of senior management official to andSection;372.3of the rule. The definition gives facilities appropriate flexibility indetermining who may sign the form while retaining the emphasis that theperson have management responsibility over the persons preparing the form.2. <T3>Review of prepared form. </T3>The proposed rule required that the personcertify that ``I have personally examined and am familiar with the information* * *.'' Commenters stated that this statement was too stringent becauseit would require that the senior management official duplicate all thecalculations performed in the preparation of the form. A few commenterssuggested that EPA adopt the certification statement used in the NationalPollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) regulations. Those regulationsrequire a certification that the information was prepared under a systemdesigned to assure that qualified personnel property gathered and evaluatedthe information submitted, and that the certifying official has queriedthose persons responsible for the system. Commenters noted that the NPDEScertification has already received full notice and comment and has beentested in court. However, the conference report states that ``[t]he purpose of the certificationrequirement is to assure that a senior management official reviews thereport for accuracy and completeness.'' The Agency believes that the NPDEScertification, because it does not require the certifying official to reviewthe form, does not meet the intent of Congress. However, the proposed certificationstatement could be interpreted to require more than a view of the submittedinformation. Therefore, the certification statement was modified and nowrequires a review by the official, which EPA believes fulfills the intentof Congress. 3. <T3>Submissions that are ``true, accurate, and complete.'' </T3>The proposedcertification statement would have required the certifying official tostate that the submitted information is true, accurate, and complete. Commentersobjected to this statement, stating that it is unreasonable because muchof the information, particularly release estimates, can be subject to considerableuncertainty. They point to section 313(g)(2), which allows facilities touse available data collected under other provisions of law or to provide``reasonable estimates of the amounts involved.'' Because estimates areallowed, these commenters stated that ``accuracy'' must be set in contextof the estimating procedures used. Commenters further noted that a facilitymay choose to use emissions factors developed by EPA for the purposes ofreporting, even though the facility does not believe the estimates areaccurate.  Commenters suggested a variety of changes to the certification statementto correct the problem. Several commenters suggested that the burden ofthe accuracy of reports be placed on the Agency's instructions to the form.Another proposed approach would provide a certification that the informationis ``substantially accurate and complete.''   The Agency has decided to modify the certification statement to tie theconcept of accuracy with reasonable estimates of amounts and values reported.Such estimates must be based on the information available to the preparerof the report. This revision addresses the commenters' concerns and setsaccuracy of reporting within the context set forth by Congress. The revisedcertification statement reads as follows:   ``I hereby certify that I have reviewed the attached documents and, tothe best of my knowledge and belief, that the submitted information istrue and complete and that the amounts and values in this report reportare accurate based on reasonable estimates using data available to thepreparers of this report.''B. Facility Identification   1. <T3>Technical contact, addition of a public contact. </T3>In the proposedrule EPA asked for a technical contact to be listed. The primary purposefor including a technical contact on the proposed form was to allow EPAto follow up reporting with questions pertaining to the completeness andtechnical integrity of the data. Commenters stated that only EPA or Stateofficials should be designated to contact the ``technical contact'' ofa facility. In addition, commenters recommended that they be allowed toprovide a public contact different from the technical contact.   EPA has done two things regarding the technical contact. First, for clarification,it should be noted that the technical contact does not have to work atthe geographic location for which the report is submitted. The technicalcontact can be: (a) Someone at the facility; (b) someone at the same company,but at a different location; or, (c) a consultant. The name and telephonenumber of the technical contact must be provided on the form. The technicalcontact information will not be included in the public data base.   Second, in addition to the technical contact, EPA is requiring facilitiesto provide the name and telephone number of a public contact for the facility.The public contact may be the same as the technical contact, or someonedifferent. EPA added a public contact to provide firms within the flexibilityof designating types of personnel most appropriate to the task of handlingtechnical inquiries about the submission versus general information inquiriesfrom the public. The public contact information will be included in thepublic data base.   2. <T3>Latitude/longitude. </T3>EPA did not propose to require companies tosubmit the latitude and longitude of their facilities in the proposed form.Several commenters expressed great interest in having this data includedas a facility identifier. The primary reason for asking for this informationis its importance for geographic information systems. These computer-basedsystems enable EPA and other ogranizations to model exposures resultingfrom chemical releases and produce graphic representations of such exposures.  In addition, these coordinates help to verify the location of facilitiesand will help EPA and other users of the section 313 data base interfacewith other data bases containing such geographic coordinates.Therefore, EPA has added latitude and longitude as a reporting elementfor identifying the facility. However, EPA is adopting a phase-in approachfor providing this data. For reports due by July 1, 1988 (covering 1987),EPA is requiring firms that have the information readily available to reportit. For example, certain environmental permits held by a facility may alreadycontain this information. Also, county property records or facility plansor blueprints may show the latitude and longitude coordinates. Latitudeand longitude information for all facilities is required on the forms dueby July 1, 1989 (covering the 1988 calendar year). EPA believes that theapproach adopted serves two basic purposes: (1) Latitude and longitudeinformation is provided, which is important to geographic information systems;and (2) there is a low burden of developing the data.   3. <T3>EPA I.D. Number, NPDES permit, and receiving streams.</T3> In the proposedrule, EPA provided a single line each for listing the EPA IdentificationNumber (the identification number assigned to a facility in connectionwith hazardous waste generation and disposal activities under the ResourceConservation and Recovery Act (RCRA)), the NPDES permit numbers, and thereceiving stream or body of water for the facility. Commenters pointedout that some multi-establishment facilities can have more than one ofthese identifiers or permits, or may discharge a reported toxic chemicalinto two or more streams or bodies or water. Therefore, the Agency hasprovide additional lines on the form for these reporting elements.   C. <T3>Releases to the Environment   </T3>1. <T3>Total release. </T3>EPA proposed that reporting under section 313 accountfor the total amount of toxic chemicals entering each environmental mediumfrom the facility. EPA based this interpretation on the statutory provisions.  The definition of ``releases'' contained in section 329 of Title III coversall types of releases, both intentional as well as unintentional. Section313 requires reporting of ``the annual quantity of the toxic chemical enteringeach environmental medium'' This led EPA to ask for information on totalreleases from the facility. Commenters cited the conference report to supporttheir claim that Congress did not intend for facilities to include accidentialor unintentional type of releases in the quantities reported under section313. In discussing section 313 the conference report begins by saying that:<ITAG tagnum="21">This section establishes requirements for annual reporting on releasesof certain toxic chemicals to the environment. This reporting covers releasesthat occur as a result of normal business operations, as distinct fromabnormal, emergency releases which must be reported under section 304.</ITAG>Thus, commenters would argue, the statutory definition of release is modifiedby the conference report.   EPA believes that the above-quoted conference report language was providedfor the purpose of clarifying differences between the basic types of reportingthat occur under section 313 versus section 304 of Title III. A section313 report is an annual report involving annual aggregate estimates ofreleases to all environmental media. A report under section 304 is an emergencynotification. EPA does not find language in section 313 or any other conferencereport language that precludes the quantity of a toxic chemical releasedduring an ``abnormal, emergency release'' from being included in the totalannual amount reportable under section 313.   One of the purposes of section 313 is assessment of cumulative exposureto toxic chemicals. EPA believes that the best way to accomplish this assessmentis to include all releases of toxic chemicals over the reporting year regardlessof the mode of release. EPA also believes that most facilities will calculatetheir releases based on a total release concept. Therefore, it could bemore burdensome to require a facility to ``back-out'' the section 304 releasesand other ``accidential'' type releases than to just leave them as partof the total. Also, if the quantities of section 304 releases were excludedfrom the annual aggregate total, most data users would not have ready accessto this additional data. This is because section 304 releases quantitieswill not be entered into a nationally accessible computer data base aswill section 313 data. Thus the public can do no automated cross-matchingof facilities in order to obtain this additional release data for exposureanalysis purposes. Therefore, EPA is retaining its interpretation of totalreleases for the purpose of section 313 reporting.2. <T3>Removing the section 304 release indicator.</T3> EPA proposed thatcompanies indicate by checking a box whether or not any part of the reportedrelease was an accidental release reported under section 304 of Title III.Section 304 releases are certain accidental releases of specific chemicalslisted under section 302 of Title III as well as section 103 of CERCLA(RQ chemicals). The purpose of asking about section 304 releases on thesection 313 form was to provide the public with an additional means ofobtaining information about total releases (both routine and accidental)of chemicals subject to reporting under section 313. Several commentersprotested that asking for information about section 304 was not in keepingwith congressional intent and created trade secret problems.Concerning trade secrets, commenters were concerned about linkages thatcould be made between the section 313 report and the section 304 report.Under section 304, companies are not allowed to claim chemical identityas trade secret; under section 313, chemical identity is the only informationelement that can be claimed as a trade secret. The situation could arisewhere the release of a particular chemical reported under section 304 wasthe only release of that chemical during the calendar year. By checkingthe section 304 box on the section 313 form, commenters asserted that competitorscould find the chemical identity by referring to the section 304 report.EPA believes that the section 304 check-box would create unnecessary reportingcomplications. Therefore, EPA has decided to delete the check-box.3. <T3>Deletion of the permit indication. </T3>EPA proposed that for eachaggregate release, facilities would indicate whether the toxic chemicalis specifically cited in a permit by checking a ``yes'' or ``no'' box.The intent of the permit indication was to provide a starting point forthe public to obtain relevant permit information on the specific chemicalreleased. It was also a way of providing some kind of information on airpermits without requiring facilities to list numerous air permit numbers.Most of the comments on this issue were negative. There was strong concernthat this check-box would be misleading and confusing to the public. Commentersasserted that a ``no'' answer may lead the public to believe the releaseis unpermitted or ``unallowed'' and thereby imply that a facility is inviolation of the law. The permit indication also does not reveal how muchof the release is covered by permits. Some commenters noted that confusionis bound to result on the part of the reporting facilities as to when thepermit indication should apply since most permits do not cite or limitreleases by specific chemical. For example, most air permits apply to categoriesof chemicals, such as volatile organic compounds (VOCs) and particulates.In addition, many permits may limit the release of a chemical by specifyingthat a control device or particular type of treatment be employed. Therefore,many permitted releases would not be allowed to be checked under the proposedrule's approach. Certain commenters believed that EPA should broaden thepermit indication to include most other types of permitted releases ordrop it altogether.Because the permit indication has a high potential to provide misinformationto the public, EPA has decided not to include the permit check box in thefinal form. EPA believes that it would inevitably lead to misunderstandingand confusion, not only on the part of the public, but also by the reportingcommunity. EPA chose not to broaden the interpretation of which releaseswould be covered by a permit because this would no longer serve the originalpurpose of providing a link to chemical-specific permit data. Additionally,it would be difficult in some situations to give a clear indication ofwhen a permit actually controls the release of a specific chemical versusother components in the wastestream. EPA requires the listing of specificpermit numbers in the facility identification part of the form. EPA believesthat these permit numbers provide a useful link between the release informationand any relevant permit data.4. <T3>Accuracy of reporting.</T3> EPA proposed that the annual release databe estimated as accurately as possible and that figures be rounded offto the nearest pound. Recognizing, however, the aggregate nature of thedata and potential error in the estimates, EPA asked for comment on otherreporting alternatives. EPA received comment on three proposed alternativereporting options.(1) Report in ranges.(2) Report to 1 to 2 significant figures.(3) Report to a specified degree of precision.Many commenters on this issue were in favor of either option 1 or 2, becausethey believed that the data will not be exact due to the error involvedin measurements and estimates, and that these options would not misrepresentthe accuracy of the data. Several commenters expressed concerns about theliabilities involved for verifying the accuracy of the data and the potentialfor public misperception of the data accuracy.Certain disadvantages of reporting in ranges were noted by some commenters.Use of ranges could misrepresent data accuracy because the low or highend range numbers may not really be that close to the estimated value,even taking into account its inherent error. For example, a release of11,000 pounds/year with a 50 percent error could be misinterpreted as 100,000pounds/year if reported as a range of 10,000 to 100,000 pounds/year. Reportingin ranges may not only misconstrue the data accuracy, it would also makeanalysis and use of the data more difficult according to these commenters.Because facilities are not required to do additional monitoring and areallowed to provide ``reasonable estimates,'' it would be infeasible todictate that they report to a specified degree of precision that cannotbe attained given the range of error inherent in the estimates.Therefore, EPA is requiring that estimates of releases and transfers oftoxic chemicals to off-site locations be expressed as a figure roundedto a degree of accuracy no greater than two significant digits.As noted in the discussion in Unit XV.B. EPA has adopted an optional rangereporting concept for releases to an environmental medium of less than1,000 pounds. Where the facility believes that it has no release in relationto a particular line item it could check a box for ``0''. If the releaseis estimated to be between 1 and 499 pounds, or 500 to 999 pounds, thefacility has the option of checking a range box or entering a specificfigure. For releases of 1,000 pounds or more the facility is required toprovide a figure rounded to no more than two significant digits. This rangereporting is for calendar years 1987, 1988, and 1989 only.5. <T3>Peak release.</T3> Several commenters raised the issue of having therelease data reported in terms of its frequency, duration, or peak valuein addition to the annual release amounts. EPA did not discuss this issuein the proposed rule. Commenters from environmental and public interestgroups stated that the annual release data may not give enough informationto assess some risks accurately. Knowing how often and/or how long thereleases occur, and the maximum (peak) amount of chemical released perday would allow a better evaluation of exposure and risk to the publicaccording to these commenters. One commenter stated that the annual estimatesmay be appropriate for evaluating potential cancer risks but that hourlyor daily emission estimates are useful for assessing risks for chemicalswith acute effects, other short-term exposure effects, and environmentaleffects.Some industry commenters maintained that more detailed information aboutthe frequency, duration, and peaks of releases will be difficult or impossibleto provide. They stated that many facilities have numerous operations orprocesses involving a chemical. They claim that peak data would be misusedand misinterpreted. They fear that users of the data would assume thatsuch peaks occur every day. They also state that the annual data shouldbe used as a screening tool and that further studies should then be undertakento gather the information needed to fully characterize exposure.EPA considers the need for more detailed release information to be validand considered the following options for possible inclusion in the finalrule:(1) Days of release.(2) Indication of intermittent versus continuous release.(3) Peak data (maximum daily amount).(4) Days of operation.In reviewing the options, EPA considered how the data would be used ina screening for levels of risk with the currently used exposure models.Days of release is not currently used for modeling exposure in ambientair to carcinogens or chemicals with chronic (long-term) health effects.Current air dispersion models for these types of effects use the totalannual release for estimating exposure. The number of days of release isused for estimating drinking water exposure for chemicals with non-carcinogenichealth effects and environmental effects. EPA considered that facilitiesmay have difficulty in providing the number of days per year over whichthe chemical is released into the environment. Facilities may not havethis information available, especially for the first year's reporting andmay find it difficult to provide in some cases. Also this data may notbe meaningful in cases of multiple releases of different magnitude anddurations.Reporting whether the release is largely continuous or intermittent maybe less burdensome for facilities to do, but it may not be as useful asother potential indicators. This is because it does not provide quantitativeinformation needed for a risk assessment and may be meaningless for anaggregate release amount that is compiled for all releases from many typesof processes or sources at one facility.Peak release data in the form of maximum daily amounts is useful for analysisof risks from chemicals released to air or water with acute or chronicnon-carcinogenic effects, and also for chemicals with environmental effects.Peak release data can be used to model the highest one-day acute exposureto human and environmental receptors on a worst-case basis to determineif a more detailed investigation is warranted. EPA is uncertain about possibledifficulties that facilities may have in providing this datum, given thatseveral release sources and several activities at the facility may contributeto a single daily release amount. It may not be possible to estimate themaximum daily release using some estimation techniques, such as overallmass balance or emission factors, which are available for estimating theannual release data.The number of days of operations involving the chemical may be easier forfacilities to provide than other types of indicators. It could be usedto estimate an average daily release using the annual data, but there areweaknesses for using this data in modeling because the releases may notactually occur during all the days of operation.EPA has not included an additional peak release type reporting elementin the final rule. Such an additional reporting element would require asignificant change to the form. The Agency believes that it will be necessaryto further analyze the above options and to investigate additional options.In its analysis the Agency will determine what type of data is needed tobetter characterize exposure and risk, and determine how this data canbest be reported by facilities. Because of the need for further analysisand input from the public and regulated community, EPA plans to proposean amendment to this rule dealing with this issue within the second quarterof 1988. At that time, EPA will seek comment on this issue in order todevelop the most appropriate way of obtaining this data.6. <T3>Disaggregation of air emissions.</T3> EPA proposed that fugitive ornon-point air emissions be reported separately from stack or point sourceair emissions. Facilities would include all emissions to air of a listedchemical and separate such emissions quantities into fugitive or stacktype emissions. The instructions gave clarification as to how to differentiatebetween the two types of sources. EPA proposed to distinguish between thesetwo source categories for two reasons. First, estimates of stack emissionsare likely to be more accurate than estimates of fugitive emissions becausestack emissions can be directly measured. Better overall information onair releases can be obtained if fugitive emissions are reported separatelyand the accuracy of the data on stack emissions is preserved. Second, separatereporting of fugitive and stack emissions will enable regulatory agenciesand other users of the data to judge the relative significance of the twosources of releases.Many commenters thought EPA should not require this disaggregation. Twocommenters agreed with the proposal while one commenter stated that theform should collect five categories of release on air emissions: Process,fugitive, storage, transfer operations, and waste treatment emissions.Some commenters thought EPA should require only reporting of point sourcereleases because fugitive emissions are too difficult to estimate accurately.EPA has retained the reporting of air emissions as proposed. This issuereceived much discussion and review before the rule was proposed and thereasons for not further disaggregating air emissions still remain the same.First, further disaggregation would not be consistent with EPA's approachof not requiring specific information on the sources of releases to minimizetrade secret claims. Second, the burden on facilities would increase tremendouslyif further disaggregation were required. For example, a facility will beable to estimate an aggregate non-point air release using a mass balanceapproach, but it would be very difficult for it to further divide thisamount into releases from transfer operations, leaks, and waste treatmentemissions. Because the majority of measured data available will be on stackemissions, this is one mechanism available to facilities to distinguishbetween two types of air emissions. EPA believes that requiring disaggregationonly into point and non-point source categories is the best balance ofdata usefulness and industry burden for this reporting requirement.7. <T3>Releases to water</T3>_a. <T3>Disaggregation of releases by receiving stream.</T3> For direct discharges,the issue of how to report multiple receiving streams for one facilitywas raised by one commenter. The proposed form allowed only one line onpage 1 of the form to report a stream or body of water that receives afacility's wastewater flow. EPA has revised the form to allow reportingof up to three receiving streams. These streams are to be numbered andthe applicable stream numbers reported in connection with the direct dischargerelease amount to that stream.b. <T3>Inclusion of stormwater releases.</T3> EPA proposed that the totalreleases of a chemical to surface waters include the contribution fromstormwater if the facility's permit included stormwater sources. Giventhe potential difficulty in estimating the contribution of stormwater tothe total release of a chemical, EPA specifically asked for comment onthe inclusion of stormwater discharges and how these releases should beestimated and reported.Many commenters thought that EPA should not require reporting on releasein stormwater because it is very difficult to estimate amounts of toxicchemicals present and intermittent flowrates without monitoring and measurement.Without such information, it would be virtually impossible to estimatethese types of releases to any degree of accuracy. Several commenters pointedout that EPA has not yet developed final stormwater regulations or guidelinesunder the Clean Water Act because of the technical problems involved. Twocommenters believed that facilities should be required to include stormwaterreleases to surface waters and publicly owned treatment works (POTWs) andthat these should be reported separately on the form.Some facilities have submitted permit applications relative to stormwaterdischarges. As a result of passage of the Clean Water Act Amendments inFebruary 1987, EPA is currently drafting new stormwater regulations. Somefacilities may have stormwater discharges permitted under NPDES industrysubcategory effluent limitations or through the discretion of the permitwriter. Even if a facility's stormwater is covered by a permit, however,it may not have any specific chemical monitoring data depending on whenthe permit was issued. Also, most permitted stormwater releases are requiredto be monitored for conventional pollutants such as biological oxygen demand(BOD), total organic carbon (TOC), etc., rather than specific chemicals.Therefore, EPA is requiring facilities to indicate the stormwater contributionto surface water releases only if the facility has monitoring data on thesection 313 chemicals in such stormwater and a measurement or estimateof flowrate. If so, the facility must enter the percent of the releasethat is attributable to stormwater in Part III, Section 5.3C of the form.If the facility does not have periodic measurements of the chemical releasesbut has submitted chemical-specific monitoring data in its permit application,it should use these data as a basis for its estimate. Flowrate data caneither be data submitted in a permit application or measurements as requiredby the permit (either periodic or continuous), or can be estimated by multiplyingthe annual rainfall times the land area times the degree of imperviousnessor by another appropriate method. Appropriate responses to be entered on the form include: (1) A numericalfigure representing the percent contribution to the total release, (2)``O'' if the facility has monitored but not detected the chemical in stormwaterdischarges, and (3) ``N/D'' if the facility has no monitoring informationrelative to the chemical in stormwater discharges. 8. <T3>Specific line for reporting underground injection release. </T3>Onecommenter raised the issue of how releases to groundwater are reportedon the form. The commenter stated that EPA should break out reporting ofdirect and indirect groundwater discharges as a category distinct fromreleases to land. By looking at the form only, it is not clear how andwhere facilities would report releases via underground injection discharges.On the proposed form, these releases were to be reported in the ReleaseTo Land section by entering a disposal code for underground injection nextto the annual amount. To further clarify releases by underground injectionof listed toxic chemicals, EPA has included a separate sub-section in thefinal reporting form entitled Underground Injection (Part III, Section5.4). 9. <T3>Basis of estimate. </T3>For each aggregate release, EPA proposed torequire an indication of the basis used to account for the estimation ofthe largest portion of the release quantity. The basis of estimates providedin the instructions were:(1) Based on monitored or measured data. (2) Based on mass balance calculations. (3) Based on published emission factors. (4) Based on other approaches (engineering judgment, etc.) Each methodwould be indicated on the form by the use of a code. The basis of estimate provides some indication of data quality and willidentify situations in which monitoring data might be obtained in follow-upactivities by EPA or the States. This indication would also allow EPA toidentify facilities and industries that may be having difficulty estimatingreleases so that further guidance may be developed for them. Several commenters thought that EPA should require more detailed informationon how the releases were estimated, such as the percentage of the releasefor each method, the emission factors used, or a brief explanation forhow other approaches were applied. Most of the commenters representingindustry supported the use of the proposed basis of estimate. One commenterwanted clarification on whether indicating the use of emission factorsapplied only to the use of EPA emission factors. Requiring reporting of the emission factors could result in revealing productionvolume or throughput amount of the chemical; information that many companiesconsider trade secret. Also, requiring reporting of the specifics of thecalculations used to develop the estimates would be similar to collectinginformation on each source of release, as opposed to the aggregate release.Such data could involve information on quantities of process streams, alsooften considered proprietary. EPA wishes to minimize trade secret claimsso that most of the data on the specific chemicals will be available anduseful to the public. Collecting this sort of detailed information wouldbe more of a ``mass balance'' reporting approach, and EPA does not havethe authority to collect mass balance information from facilities undersection 313. Such an approach will undergo study by the National Academyof Sciences as required by section 313(l) to determine the feasibilityof its use for future toxic chemical release inventory reporting. The final rule requires the basis of estimation as proposed. Any reasonableemission factor may be used to estimate releases. It is not EPA's intentthat facilities be constrained or limited to the use of any one estimationmethod. The burden is on the facilities to provide the most accurate and``reasonable'' estimate of releases, and they should use all availabledata and means to provide these estimates. The data or methods used mustbe documented in the facility's records and made available for review uponrequest by EPA inspectors. EPA will use the basis of estimate providedon the form as a tool to ascertain data quality, availability of information,and reporting problems for facilities. <T3>D. Off-Site Transport</T3> EPA proposed that facilities report the amount of the toxic chemical inwaste transferred to the off-site treatment and disposal facilities (includingPOTWs), the name and address of the off-site location, whether the off-sitelocation is under the control of the reporting facility, and the treatment/disposalmethods used off-site, if known. The rationale for inclusion of the off-sitewaste transfers was to complete the picture of chemical waste generatedfrom a facility and enhance the public's understanding of the locationsof toxic chemicals in their community. Off-site locations would also includewaste brokers, storage facilities, privately or publicly owned wastewatertreatment works, and off-site underground injection wells. Most industry commenters objected to the reporting of off-site waste transfersfor several reasons. First, commenters stated that such information isnot required by the statute, was not intended by Congress, and is duplicativebecause of RCRA reporting requirements for hazardous waste. The strongestobjection, however, was that the off-site chemical, transfers do not constitute``a release into the environment'' by the reporting facility and shouldnot be reported as such on the form. Other comments focused on whether reporting of off-site treatment/disposalmethods is required or not and how to report recycling and reuse of thechemical waste off-site. A few commenters suggested that EPA should requirethe EPA Identification Number of the off-site facility because these numberswould help provide a better identification of the off-site facility andwould aid in access to related information in other data bases. EPA has interpreted the statute to require reporting on wastes sent off-sitebecause the conference report states that reportable releases shall alsoinclude releases ``to waste treatment and storage facilities.'' Also, EPAbelieves that reporting wastes sent off-site is important because the absenceof this information regarding the generation of chemical wastes by a facilitycould be misleading to the public. Many facilities transfer a significantportion of their chemical wastes to off-site locations. The information to be collected on off-site waste transfers is differentfrom that required under RCRA because this information is chemical-specificand makes no distinction between wastestreams which are hazardous and non-hazardous.This type of chemical-specific information is not currently available tothe public or EPA for many chemical wastes. Facilities are to report theamount of the listed toxic chemical in waste transferred off-site. Facilitiesare not to report the total amount of the waste containing the chemical.EPA has retained the requirement to report transfers of a chemical in wasteto off-site locations. However, EPA has revised the form so that off-sitetransfers are distinguished from direct facility releases to the environment,because the disposal fate is not always known and the off-site treatmentmay reduce the amount of chemical ultimately released into the environment.The off-site transfers of chemicals are to be reported in a separate section(Part III, Section 6) of the form. Reporting of treatment/disposal methodsis required only if this information is readily available to the reportingfacility. Transfers to a reprocessor or recycler of chemical waste are not reportableas off-site transfers under the final rule. First, the material being sentis not bound for ultimate disposal. Second, these types of facilities maythemselves be covered as manufacturers or processors of the chemical and,thus, would be accounting for any releases to the environment.EPA agrees with the comment that an EPA Identification Number should beincluded in connection with the name and address of off-site locations(to be reported in Part II, Section 2 of the form). If the chemical ispart of a hazardous waste, this information element should be readily availablefrom information that the facility must supply on the Uniform NationalHazardous Waste Manifest Form. If the facility does not know the EPA IdentificationNumber of this off-site location, it would enter N/A in this space on theform. E. Waste Treatment Information 1. <T3>Wastestream and treatment methods. </T3>Section 313(g)(i)(c)(iii) statesthat facilities must report ``for each wastestream, the waste treatmentor disposal methods employed, and an estimate of the treatment efficiencytypically achieved * * *.'' EPA proposed that a wastestream be consideredas the aggregate wastes treated in a particular manner or the influentstream to a single treatment method. For example, aggregate waste goingto secondary wastewater treatment on site would be considered as a wastestreamand reporting would not be required for each of the numerous waters fromvarious process points that are combined for treatment. EPA proposed thatthe wastestream be characterized as gaseous emissions, wastewater, non-aqueousliquid waste, and solid waste (includes sludge and slurries). In the proposed rule EPA also requested comment on a more detailed wastestreamcharacterization approach. The example used would have required each individualwastestream containing the reported toxic chemical to be identified byan appropriate RCRA waste code. Where a wastestream did not have a RCRAwaste code, other source codes would have to be developed. Commenters representing industry trade groups and individual companiessupported EPA's proposed aggregate wastestream approach. Commenters representingenvironmental or public interest groups disagreed with the proposal andurged EPA to adopt a source-specific wastestream characterization system,such as requiring individual wastestreams to be identified by the RCRAcodes. These commenters claimed that an aggregate wastestream approachwould severely reduce the utility of the data and that EPA will lose theability to identify particularly efficient means of treatment. EPA has determined that it will retain the aggregate wastestream characterizationapproach as proposed. EPA was not convinced by comments received that asource-specific wastestream characterization would add materially to thedata received or to understanding more about relative efficiencies of particulartreatment methods applied to those wastestreams. EPA remains concernedthat a very specific wastestream approach would add a significant degreeof complexity to the form. It would also increase the burden associatedwith completing the form without a commensurate increase in benefits. Forexample, in larger facilities several different individually coded wastestreams,containing the same chemical, may be sent to one type of treatment. Theform would have to provide for multiple entries for each of these wastestreams.Yet, the type of treatment and the relative efficiency of removal of thechemical would be the same. There also remains the concern about disclosureof trade secret information if facilities were required to identify source-specificwastestreams. For example, many of the RCRA waste codes are themselvesspecific toxic chemicals as listed in section 313. If a facility can substantiatethat the manufacture, processing, or use of a toxic chemical at their facilityis a trade secret and they must then identify a treated wastestream asthat same chemical, then trade secret protection is effectively negated.Furthermore, to the degree that process specific wastestream informationcould reveal sensitive process related trade secret information, companiesthat might otherwise not claim the chemical identity as a trade secretmay have more reason to do so in order to protect the linkage to processdetail This result would adversely affect the public's access to information.Finally, in many cases where more detailed wastestream information maybe of use, such information would be of use only in conjunction with otherdetailed information, such as the characterization of the wastestream.It is EPA's belief that such detailed information is more appropriatelygathered in followup activities after the reports under this rule havebeen screened to identify particular facilities or classes of facilitiesof greatest interest. EPA believes that the level of detail in the finalform will satisfy the needs for such screening.EPA proposed a list of treatment codes in the instructions from which facilitiescould specify the treatment methods used for each wastestream. This listhas been revised slightly to be more consistent with treatment methodsand codes that will be used for future RCRA annual/biennial reporting.Such consistency will result in less confusion and burden for many facilitieswho will be reporting waste treatment information under two different EPArules. Treatment methods are to be reported for all wastestreams containingreportable chemicals whether this treatment actually removes the specificchemical or not.2. <T3>Treatment efficiency.</T3> EPA proposed that treatment efficiency,expressed as percent removal, would represent any destruction, biologicaldegradation, chemical reaction or conversion, or physical removal of thelisted chemical in the wastestream being treated. A few commenters notedthat some of the treatment methods, such as encapsulation and fuel blending,could be reported as 100 percent efficient from the standpoint of protectionof health and the environment. EPA proposed that these treatment methodsbe reported with a 0 percent efficiency because they do not remove thechemical by any of the previously mentioned mechanisms. For the final rule,EPA does not believe that ``removal efficiency'' should be stretched toinclude wastes rendered ``safe,'' ``harmless,'' or ``non-toxic'' to healthand the environment without being removed from the wastestream becausesuch determinations are abstract and subjective, and would result in inconsistentand confused reporting, and would be misleading to the public. Knowledgeof the treatment method used should be sufficient to indicate to data usersthe mechanism of the ``treatment'' employed and how it works.Several commenters were confused about how to report the efficiency ofneutralization processes because this type of treatment involves a changein pH and they believed that the concept of percent removal would not apply.Neutralization does involve a chemical reaction or conversion, such asan acid reacting with a base to form a salt or vice versa. Therefore, percentremoval would apply to the percent of acid (or base) in the wastestreamthat was reacted during treatment. Neutralization also involves pH adjustmentbecause pH is just a measure of the acid or base concentration in the wastestream.A pH of 7 or above after neutralization would indicate 100 percent treatmentefficiency of an acidic influent wastestream while conversely, a post-treatmentpH of 7 or below would indicate 100 percent efficiency for a basic influentwastestream.3. <T3>Sequential treatment.</T3> In the proposed rule, the reporting formdid not allow tracking of sequential treatment processes, and an efficiencywas to be reported for each treatment method. Several commenters pointedout that for sequential treatments, an overall efficiency for the processwould be more useful data than a separate efficiency for each treatmentwithout an indication that they are part of a sequence. EPA also realizesthat, in many cases, facilities may not know the individual treatment stepefficiencies for a sequential process, but would have a good estimate ofthe efficiency of the overall treatment process.EPA has revised the waste treatment section of the form to allow the optionof reporting sequential treatment methods and an overall treatment efficiencyif the individual treatment step efficiencies are not known. The sequentialtreatment steps would be linked together by checking a box next to eachstep to indicate that it is part of a sequence. See Part III, Section 7,column D of the form. This revision will allow facilities to report moreaccurate and relevant (in the case of sequential treatment) data, willreduce their reporting burden, and will increase the usefulness and understandingof the treatment data reported. For sequential treatments, facilities areto list the individual treatment codes for the various steps in the process,report the influent concentration for the entire process by entering thecode next to the first treatment step, and report the overall sequentialtreatment efficiency next to the last treatment step in the sequence.4. <T3>Influent concentration.</T3> EPA proposed that facilities report thepre-treatment concentration of the chemical in the wastestream for eachtreatment method. Submitters would enter a code corresponding to one offive ranges of concentration. Each range covers 2 to 3 orders of magnitude,relieving facilities of the burden of having to report the exact concentrationwhich may not be measured and may fluctuate. Influent concentration datawill enhance the evaluation and comparison of waste treatment methods byhelping users of the data determine the effectiveness of treatment methodsfor wastestreams containing different amounts of a given chemical.Most commenters on this issue stated that this information should not berequired because it was not specified in the statute, but little commentwas received on the burden or technical difficulties of supplying thisdata. EPA has retained the reporting of the influent concentration foreach treatment method in the final rule. The influent concentration willaid in the evaluation of treatment methods used throughout industry byputting the treatment efficiency data into better perspective. This requirementshould not significantly increase a facility's reporting burden becauseit can report the data in fairly broad ranges. For sequential treatments,the influent concentration will be required only for the first treatmentstep in the overall treatment sequence.F. Optional Reporting on Waste Minimization The proposed form included an optional section to allow the respondentto indicate any action taken in the past year (other than the waste treatmentmethods specified in Part III, Section 8 of the form) to minimize the generationof waste related to the chemical being reported. This section was madeoptional because the reporting of this type of information is not requiredin section 313. However, the information that would be provided about wastereduction is considered by EPA to be an important indicator of how industryis responding to the Agency's emphasis on better waste management throughwaste reduction.In comments on the proposed rule, the regulated community stated that thisrequest went beyond the scope of the statute and that the Agency was notauthorized to collect such information under Title III. Reporting on wasteminimization puts an additional burden and cost on the regulated community.One commenter noted that if a facility chooses not to report on waste minimization,readers of the report may conclude that no emission reduction is in placeat that facility. On the other hand, public interest groups stated thatinformation on waste minimization would be very useful to the public andrequested that this reporting element be made mandatory.The Agency has decided to retain the optional section on waste minimization.EPA has no coercive intent in requesting this optional information. Onthe contrary, EPA believes that this section will provide respondents witha positive way to demonstrate to the public the beneficial waste reductionactivities they have undertaken. EPA believes that the information providedby industry can indicate longer-term trends in waste reduction activities.However, the Agency has attached a 3 year sunset to this optional section.EPA intends to study the benefits of this section and will review the potentialoverlap between this reporting question and reporting on waste minimizationunder RCRA regulations.The proposed optional reporting section also included space for providinga narrative description of waste minimization activities. The Agency hasdecided to drop the narrative space because it will be difficult for thecomputerized data base to accommodate such textual data.  <ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Chemical List Issues  </ITAG><T3>A. Modifications to the List</T3>  EPA received many comments suggesting modifications to the list of chemicalssubject to section 313 reporting. Among these comments were suggested additionsto the list corresponding to other regulated chemicals such as the 47 toxicpollutants regulated under the Clean Water Act. Another comment reflectedthat all known carcinogens should be on the list. Many other comments weremade suggesting specific chemical deletions from the list of section 313chemicals. EPA realizes that some of these recommendations may be valid.However, the Agency chose not to use this initial rulemaking as means tomodify the list of covered toxic chemicals. EPA plans to begin an in-depthreview of the list of chemicals currently subject to reporting and an evaluationof chemicals that should be added to the initial list beginning in thefirst quarter of 1988. The comments which the Agency has received willbe useful in helping the Agency develop its methodology for this list review.Any changes to the section 313 list of chemicals that appear appropriatebased upon this review will be proposed for public comment.  <T3>B. Nomenclature  </T3>1. <T3>CAS preferred name versus common trade name. </T3>The list of chemicalsmandated by section 313 contained certain entries identified by trade names,not chemical names. For example, Parathion is a trade name. The chemicalname with the corresponding CAS registry number is Phosphoric acid, O,O-dimethyl-O-(4-nitrophenyl)ester.EPA stated in the proposed rule that reporting facilities should not haveto use a competitor's trade name for reporting purposes and so, in thecase of a listed trade name, an alternative CAS preferred name was offeredin solid brackets. The Agency intends to use the CAS registry number asthe unique identifier for all chemicals except for the 20 chemical categories.Therefore, reporting facilities can use either the trade name or the CASpreferred name that appears in andSection;372.65 (a) and (b) of the ruleas long as the corresponding CAS registry number appears on the form. 2. <T3>Cyanide compounds. </T3>Although cyanide compounds are described witha CAS registry number, cyanide compounds are considered a chemical categoryas defined in andSection;372.65(c) of the rule. The CAS registry number refersto the cyanide anion (CN_), which is not a discrete reportable chemicalwithout a counterion. Therefore the CAS registry number listing for cyanidecompounds in andSection;372.65 (a) and (b) of the rule has been removed. 3. <T3>Metal and metal compounds. </T3>The original committee print of thelist of chemicals subject to reporting under section 313 listed metalsand their compounds with the CAS registry number which corresponded tothe metal only. In its proposal, EPA sought to separate the metal frommetal compounds. The distinct metal appears with its CAS registry numberin andSection;372.65 (a) and (b), and the corresponding metal compounds categoryappears in andSection;372.65(c) because it is a chemical category.  4. <T3>Dyes and Color Index names. </T3>EPA received comment that some dyechemicals are listed by a common name whereas others are listed by a ColorIndex (C.I.) name. For example, Auramine (CAS No. 492-80-8) has the ColorIndex name of C.I. Solvent Yellow 34. It was suggested that the list wouldbe much clearer if all of the dye chemicals were listed by their ColorIndex names. Furthermore, the chemicals Direct Black 38, Direct Blue 6,and Direct Brown 95 should also be listed with the ``C.I.'' prefix. TheAgency agrees with these suggestions. Listing these chemicals using theColor Index name makes the list consistent. In andSection;372.65(a) of therule all of these dye chemicals are listed together. EPA has included thecommon name in brackets in the case of Auramine.  5. <T3>Glycol ethers. </T3>Commenters suggested that the Agency should includespecific glycol ethers in the chemical specific listings of andSection;372.65(a) and (b) of the rule and remove it as a category from andSection;372.65(c).EPA considers this an amendment or modification to the list of chemicalsand is not changing the list in this rulemaking.  <T3>C. Reporting Substances of a Certain Form  </T3>Certain of the chemicals listed in the Committee Print have parentheticqualifiers listed next to them. EPA attempted to clarify these qualifiersin its proposal. A chemical that is listed without a qualifier is subjectto reporting in all forms in which it is manufactured, processed, and used. 1. <T3>Fume or dust. </T3>Three of the metals on the list (aluminum, vanadium,and zinc) contain the qualifier ``fume or dust.'' EPA interprets this qualifierto mean that a facility is manufacturing, processing, or using the metalin the form of fume or dust. Fume or dust does not refer to ``wet'' forms,solutions, or slurries, for example, but only dry or anhydrous forms ofthese metals. As explained in Unit IV.A. of this preamble, the term manufactureincludes the generation of a chemical as a byproduct or impurity. In suchcases, a facility should determine if, for example, it generated more thanthe 1987 threshold of 75,000 pounds per year of aluminum fume or dust asa byproduct of its activities. If so then the facility must report thatit manufactures aluminum (fume or dust). Similarly, there may be certaintechnologies in which one of these metals is processed in the form of afume or dust to make other chemicals or other products for distributionin commerce. In reporting releases, the facility would only report releasesof the fume or dust.  2. <T3>Manufacturing qualifiers. </T3>Two of the entries contain a qualifierrelating to manufacture. For isopropyl alcohol the qualifier read ``mfg._strongacid process.'' For saccharin, the qualifier simply reads ``manufacturing.''In the case of isopropyl alcohol, EPA interprets the qualifier to meanthat only persons who manufacture isopropyl alcohol by the strong acidprocess are required to report. In the case of saccharin, only manufacturersof saccharin are required to be reported. A facility that processes orotherwise uses either chemical would not be required to report for thosechemicals. In both of these cases, supplier notification does not apply. 3. <T3>Solutions. </T3>Four substances on the list are qualified by the term``solution.'' These substances are ammonium nitrate, ammonium sulfate,sodium hydroxide, and sodium sulfate. EPA interprets the term ``solution''to refer to the physical state of these chemicals. Only facilities thatmanufacture, process, or use these chemicals in the form of a solutionwould be required to report these chemicals. See D. of this Unit for afurther discussion of solutions. In these cases supplier notification appliesonly if the chemical is distributed as a solution.4. <T3>Phosphorus (yellow or white).</T3> The listing for phosphorus is qualifiedby the term ``yellow or white.'' This refers to a chemical state of phosphorusmeaning that only manufacturing, processing, or use of phosphorus in theyellow or white states triggers reporting. Conversely, manufacturing, processing,or use of ``black'' or ``red'' phosphorus would not trigger reporting.Supplier notification applies to distribution of yellow or white phosphorus.5. <T3>Asbestos (friable).</T3> The listing for asbestos is qualified by theterm ``friable.'' This term refers to a physical characteristic of asbestos.EPA interprets ``friable'' as being crumbled, pulverized, or reducibleto a powder with hand pressure. Again, only manufacturing, processing,or use of asbestos in the friable form triggers reporting. Similarly, suppliernotification applies only to distribution of friable asbestos. EPA receivedcomment to include other forms of asbestos. As noted above, the Agencyhas chosen not to use this rulemaking as a vehicle for modifying the initiallist of chemicals.D. Reporting Chemical Solutions1. <T3>De minimis cut-off for chemical solutions.</T3> The list of chemicalsin andSection;andSection; 372.65 (a) and (b) contain the qualifier ``solution''for some entries such as sodium sulfate (solution). This qualifier is definedin C.3. of this Unit. Technically, a solution is a mixture or formulation.Certain commenters suggested that a <T3>de minimis</T3> cut-off be applied to the reporting of chemical solutionsconsistent with the concept of a <T3>de minimis</T3> limitation for mixtures. EPA agrees with this suggestionbecause reporting on these four substances is consistent with mixture reporting.Chemicals with the qualifier ``solution,'' such as sodium sulfate thatare manufactured, processed, or otherwise used in excess of the <T3>de minimis</T3> levels must be factored into threshold and releasereporting requirements of this rule.2. <T3>Neutralizations and pH adjustments.</T3> EPA received comment regardingneutralization of solutions such as dye baths and pH adjustments of wastewater.Neutralization is interpreted by EPA as a chemical reaction. For example,sodium hydroxide solution is used to neutralize a dye bath and a solutionof sodium sulfate is formed. Assuming that other reporting requirementsare met, this facility is viewed by EPA as a user of sodium hydroxide (solution),and a manufacturer of sodium sulfate (solution), even if the sodium sulfateis destined for disposal. Releases of sodium hydroxide (solution) and ofsodium sulfate (solution) would be reported.Adjustments of the pH of a solution present a more complex circumstancein establishing reporting with respect to threshold requirements. The inputof a chemical such as sodium hydroxide (solution) into wastewater for pHadjustment constitutes a use of that chemical and is reportable. ThereforeEPA is requiring facilities that use section 313 chemicals for pH adjustmentsand neutralizations to report if they meet an applicable threshold, evenif these chemicals are consumed and no releases result. However, EPA realizesthat there may be many situations where pH adjustments are made to complexmixtures such as wastewater, where it may be very difficult to determinewhether a section 313 chemical is being ``manufactured'' during this neutralization.Furthermore, quantifying these chemicals for the purposes of meeting reportingthresholds may be just as difficult. The facility must report if it knowsthat a listed toxic chemical is generated as a result of such neutralizationand has data that allows for a reasonable estimate of the quantity generated.<ITAG tagnum="84">IX. Trade Secret Provisions</ITAG>A. General Trade Secret IssuesThe Agency received a number of comments relating to the trade secrecyimplications of certain proposed form elements. Many of these commentshave been addressed in the applicable units of this preamble. EPA alsoreceived a number of other general comments on trade secrecy as they relateto claims under section 313.EPA proposed a rule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of October 15, 1987 (52 FR 38312). Part of thisproposed rule contains procedures for claims of trade secrecy under TitleIII, including a proposed trade secret claim substantiation form. Generalcomments on trade secrecy under the proposed section 313 rule will be reviewedand considered as part of the above-referenced proposed rule.Until such time as the trade secret rule is finalized, persons subjectto this final rule are required to comply with section 322. Accordingly,to do so persons who claim the chemical identity of a toxic chemical asa trade secret should follow the provisions of the proposed trade secretrule. (One exception is noted in B. of this unit regarding the genericchemical name which is required to be provided in the section 313 submission.)Persons should also use the proposed trade secret claim substantiationform until a final form is published.B. Identifying Adverse Health and Environmental Effects Information inthe Data BaseSection 322(h)(2) of Title III requires EPA to identify the adverse healthand environmental effects associated with a toxic chemical that is claimedtrade secret and assure that such information is included in the computerdata base. The conference report further explains that ``[t]he adverseeffects identified should be described in general terms so as not to providea unique identifier of a particular trade secret chemical.''EPA identified several options in its proposed rule for meeting this requirementof providing adverse effects information relating to trade secret claims.One option would be to develop a cumulative, worst-case effects characterizationfor the predefined generic class of the chemical.A second option discussed was a modified generic identification approachwhere companies would be required to develop and submit a generic identityfor the chemical, and the EPA would develop the associated adverse healtheffects description that relates to the general class or category of thechemical.A third approach mentioned in the proposed rule would be to attempt todevelop individual adverse effect profiles that would be substance-specificbut would mask any particular effect that is unique and that could divulgeits chemical identity.EPA received comments on the above options. Comments generally pointedtowards the obvious difficulty of maintaining chemical identity as tradesecret while providing adverse health and environmental effects information.It is the EPA's intention to provide the public with as much detailed informationas possible on adverse effects. However, the Agency is also obligated toprotect the chemical identity from disclosure through the data base whena legitimate trade secret claim is made.EPA approached this issue by developing a matrix of the 309 listed chemicalsagainst the 10 health and environmental effects specifically mentionedin section 313(d). Toxicity data were accumulated from standard literaturesources and, where applicable, interpreted using Agency guidelines. Theresults showed that there were approximately 70 chemicals that exhibitedunique toxicity patterns within the 10 effects. EPA proceeded with thisanalysis by collapsing the 10 adverse effects categories to attempt toarrive at a point where there were no chemicals that exhibited a uniquetoxicity pattern. To reach the ``no unique'' result, it was necessary tocollapse the categories to the following 4 general categories: Carcinogenicity,acute toxicity, other human health effects, and environmental toxicity.EPA was surprised by the results of this analysis. EPA believes that Congressdid not anticipate that its mandate to balance trade secret protectionwith the ready availability of effects information would lead to such alow degree of specificity for the effects information. EPA will continueto explore alternatives for providing the public with more specific effectsinformation in connection with chemicals claimed trade secret. The Agencyplans to publish the analysis mentioned above for comment sometime in thesecond quarter of 1988 before making any final decisions on the adverseeffects identified in the data base.The only impact of this analysis on the final rule is that EPA will notuse the predefined generic classes as originally proposed. The analysisindicated that even the four-effects matrix, when put in the context ofthese generic classifications, created unique patterns for certain chemicals.As a result the Agency has decided to require the reporting facility toprovide a suitable generic chemical name that is structurally descriptiveof the chemical that is claimed trade secret.<ITAG tagnum="84">X. Recordkeeping  </ITAG>EPA proposed a 5-year recordkeeping period. Several commenters objectedto this proposed provision. They asserted that 5 years was an excessivelylong period of time to require facilities to maintain records relativeto the reports under section 313. They asserted that a 3-year recordkeepingperiod would be sufficient and would be consistent with the 3-year recordkeepingperiod in other EPA regulations relative to air, solid waste, and water. One reason EPA proposed a 5-year recordkeeping period for section 313 submissionsis the expected high number of facilities potentially subject to reporting.A 5-year period would allow EPA to inspect a larger number of facilities.However, after a review of the issue EPA believes that a 3-year recordkeepingperiod will be sufficient given that EPA will be receiving submissionsannually from covered facilities. Therefore, the recordkeeping period is3 years from the date of submission of a report for all information relativeto the preparation of that report.  In addition to persons who must submit reports under the final rule, asupplier of a mixture or trade name product must keep records of the factthat they provided the required notification relative to the presence andcomposition of covered toxic chemicals in products they distribute in commerce.Such records must, where applicable, include an explanation of why thespecific chemical identity was determined to be a trade secret and theappropriateness of the generic chemical name provided in the notificationrelative to that chemical. If the supplier provides an upper bound concentrationvalue instead of a specific concentration, the supplier must provide inits records an explanation of why the specific concentration is deemeda trade secret and the basis for the upper bound concentration limit. <ITAG tagnum="84">XI. Economic Impact  </ITAG>EPA has prepared a Regulatory Impact Analysis (RIA) in connection withthis final rule. The RIA assesses the economic impact of the final regulationon the affected industry (manufacturing, SIC codes 20 through 39) and Stateand Federal governments. The following cost results are presented in theanalysis document titled, ``Regulatory Impact Analysis in Support of FinalRulemaking Under Section 313 of the Superfund Amendments and ReauthorizationAct of 1986.''  Three alternatives are considered in the RIA for implementing section 313:<ITAG tagnum="15">Alternative I_Facilities report by letter.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Alternative II_Facilities report on the proposed version of Form R.Users must contact supplier concerning mixtures and trade name products. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Alternative III_Facilities report on the final version of Form R.Supplier notification.</ITAG>The population of facilities that would be required to submit reports undersection 313 is based on three sources: census data for national totalsof facilities engaged in manufacturing, surveys of toxic substances useconducted by 6 States and localities involving a subset of the substancescontained in the list of 329 chemicals convered by section 313, and productionof toxic chemicals reported for the Toxic Substances Control Act Inventory. Section 313 requires annual reports on releases of toxic chemicals froman estimated 31,800 facilities. Overall, the Agency may receive an estimated318,000 reports annually. This equals an average of 10 reports per facility. The total costs per average facility, as well as per chemical report costs,are shown in Table I below.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table I._Total Costs Per Average Reporting Facility and Per ChemicalReport ($/Yr.)</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Regulatory alternative I</H1><H2>First year</H2><H2>Subsequent years</H2><H1>Regulatory alternative II</H1><H2>First year</H2><H2>Subsequent years</H2><H1>Regulatory alternative III</H1><H2>First year</H2><H2>Subsequent years</H2>  <ITAG tagnum="1">Compliance determination<D>1,195.20</D><D>298.80</D><D>1,195.20</D><D>298.80</D><D>1,195.20</D><D>298.80 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Recordkeeping<D>101.76</D><D>41.92</D><D>101.76</D><D>41.92</D><D>101.76</D><D>41.92 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Formatting<D>1,223.12</D><D/><D/><D/><D/><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Report completion (10 chemicals)<D>9,036.69</D><D>6,144.98</D><D>11,295.80</D><D>7,680.60</D><D>11,595.00</D><D>7,884.06 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Identification of mixtures<D>2,222.93</D><D>200.72</D><D>2,222.93</D><D>200.72</D><D>0.00</D><D>96.34-887.76 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Report completion (3 mixtures)<D>232.66</D><D>158.34</D><D>291.22</D><D>197.78</D><D>0.00</D><D>0.00 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mailing<D>6.94</D><D>6.94</D><D>6.94</D><D>6.94</D><D>6.04</D><D>6.04</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total costs per facility<D>14,019.30</D><D>6,851.70</D><D>15,113.85</D><D>8,426.76</D><D>12,898.00</D><D>8,327.16-9,118.58 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total costs per chemical report<D>1,401.93</D><D>685.17</D><D>1,511.39</D><D>842.68</D><D>1,289.80</D><D>832.72-911.86</D><F>Source_RIA 1987.</F></ITAG></ITAG>  The costs represented in Table I are for reporting facilities. The finalrule will cause costs to be incurred by more facilities than will actuallybe subject to reporting. All facilities with 10 or more full time employeesin SIC codes 20 through 39 will incur some costs associated with compliancedeterminations (i.e., becoming familiar with the rule and the form, anddetermining if they meet the threshold requirements for any of the section313 chemicals). An estimated 146,450 facilities will incur the compliancedetermination costs. These costs, which do not vary across the alternatives,are included in the aggregate industry costs shown in Table II below.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table II._Aggregate Costs for Industry: First and Subsequent ReportingYears  </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Million dollars per year]</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1>Regulatory alternative I</H1><H2>First year</H2><H2>Subsequent years</H2><H1>Regulatory alternative II</H1><H2>First year</H2><H2>Subsequent years</H2><H1>Regulatory alternative III</H1><H2>First year</H2><H2>Subsequent years</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Compliance determination<D>137.3</D><D>34.3</D><D>137.3</D><D>34.3</D><D>137.3</D><D>34.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Filing<D>3.2</D><D>1.3</D><D>3.2</D><D>1.3</D><D>3.2</D><D>1.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Formatting<D>38.9</D><D/><D/><D/><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Report completion for chemicals<D>287.6</D><D>195.6</D><D>359.4</D><D>244.4</D><D>359.4</D><D>250.9-253.9</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Users-screening of mixtures<D>27.2</D><D>2.0</D><D>27.2</D><D>2.0</D><D>27.2</D><D>2.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Users-contacting suppliers<D>43.5</D><D>4.4</D><D>43.5</D><D>4.4</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Report completion for mixtures<D>7.4</D><D>5.1</D><D>9.3</D><D>6.3</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Suppliers identification of mixtures<D>0.8</D><D>0.1</D><D>0.8</D><D>0.1</D><D/><D>0.1-0.8</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Suppliers informing users<D>10.3</D><D>1.0</D><D>10.3</D><D>1.0</D><D/><D>0.7-6.9</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>556.2</D><D>243.8</D><D>591.0</D><D>293.9</D><D>527.1</D><D>289.3-299.2</D><F>Source_RIA.</F><F>Range of costs in subsequent years of Alternative III reflects elementsthat are phased-in. That is, the high end of the ranges represents year2, and the low end represents subsequent years.</F></ITAG></ITAG>  The other major costs that will be incurred by non-reporting facilitiesinvolve mixtures and trade name products. The proposed rule would haverequired that processors and users of mixtures and trade name productscontact suppliers and document the information provided by suppliers. Ifinformaiton were not provided by suppliers, processors and users were requiredto submit partial reports for mixtures and trade name products. The finalrule places the burden on the supplier to provide the information to users.Suppliers and users would incur costs under all alternatives, as shownin Table II. Supplier costs are lower for the final rule, because supplierswould be initiating the information, rather than responding to requestsfrom users.   The costs of users will also be lower for the final rule, as the informationon mixtures will be made available to them and consequently there willbe no costs for contacting suppliers and documenting the contacts.  To compare costs of the proposed rule to the final rule it is necessaryfirst to understand that the costs for the proposed rule have been revised.The four major reasons for revisions to the cost estimates are summarizedas follows:  1. The number of chemcial reports per facility increased from 4 to 10.Basis for change: Public comments, section 313 pretest, and data from fiveadditional State and local data bases on chemical use.  2. Costs for compliance determinations increased by 33.0 percent. Basisfor change: Revisions to costs developed in the RIA for the proposed ComprehensiveAssessment Information Rule (CAIR).  3. Estimates for calculating releases in the proposal were based on pretestof CAIR form and contractor estimates. These estimates have been reducedby 30 percent. Basis for change: Revisions to proposed CAIR costs and section313 pretest.  4. Costs for suppliers (screening mixtures and informing users) and users(screening mixtures) were not originally included.  These costs are compared in Table III below.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table III._Summary of Cost Comparison Between Proposed and Final Rule</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[First-year cost)</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1>Proposed</H1><H1>Revised proposed final</H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Costs per facility<D>$12,500</D><D>$15,100, $12,900</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Total number of chemical reports<D>132,340</D><D>318,000, 318,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Total number of partial mixture<D>32,760</D><D>95,400</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Total industry costs<D>$472.7 million, $527.1 million</D><D>$591.0 million</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Reports per facility<D>4 chemical, 1 mixture</D><D>3 chemical, 7 full reports-mixtures, 3 partial reports-mixture</D><D>3 chemical, 7 full reports-mixtures.</D></ITAG></ITAG>The number of chemical reports per facility increased 2.5 times but initialdoubling of CAIR estimates was found to be unnecessary and inclusion ofsupplemental time to estimate releases was also found to be double counting.First year costs per reporting facility increased from about $12,500 inthe June RIA to $15,100 for this same (proposed) version of the form, reflectingthe above factors and an increase from the more thorough accounting forthe responsibilities attributed to mixtures. Phase-in of mixtures and placementof the burden upon suppliers rather than users account for the final rule's(Alternative III) lower cost of $12,900 per facility.EPA has chosen to develop the form and rule in order to provide for uniformreporting, so that a computerized data base of high quality and utilitycan be created and maintained. EPA will incur costs to process, check,store, and make available the data reported under section 313. EPA's costswill vary depending upon its choice of data management systems and policies,but are estimated to range from between $7.7 and $26.4 million per year.States will also have some expenses for processing, storing, and distributingreports sent to them. State costs are estimated to be from $1.7 to $2.2million per year.<ITAG tagnum="84">XII. Duplication of Reporting</ITAG>Under both section 313 of SARA and section 103 of CERCLA, EPA requirescompanies to submit information on chemical releases into the environment.While the two statutory provisions are similar in their reporting requirements,they differ in both scope and purpose.Section 313 requires reporting only by facilities in SIC codes 20 through39. Section 103(f)(2) places no such restrictions on its applicability.Also, some chemicals covered under CERCLA section 103 are not subject toSARA section 313 reporting requirements, and certain additional chemicalsnot subject to CERCLA notification are included in section 313 notificationrequirements.The two statutory provisions also differ in purpose. While the purposeof section 313 of SARA is to create a Federal inventory of the listed chemicals,the purpose of the CERCLA section 103 reporting requirements is to gatherinformation for emergency response.A review of the issue found that significant amounts of duplication donot exist between these two requirements.<ITAG tagnum="84">XIII. Public Data Base</ITAG>Section 313(j) states that the Administrator shall establish and maintainin a computer data base a national toxic chemical inventory based on datasubmitted to the Administrator under section 313. EPA shall make this dataaccessible by computer telecommunications and other means to any personon a cost reimbursable basis.EPA is reviewing potential options through which the toxic chemical inventorycan be made available to the public. There are numerous vehicles and mechanismsunder consideration by EPA for the wide dissemination and accessibilityof the inventory to the public on a cost reimbursement basis with the potentialfor fee reductions or waivers.EPA developed early draft options as examples of potential vehicles andmechanisms for the public availability of a toxic chemical inventory database. This preliminary draft options paper was the subject of a publicmeeting held on April 20, 1987. Comments from this public meeting and subsequentdiscussions with other Federal agencies, industry, States, and environmentalgroups are serving as the basis for further analysis by EPA.After further review of public availability options, EPA will determinewhich set of products and services will provide the most feasible and widestdissemination of the toxic chemical inventory to the public. EPA expectsto be able to make the data base available in the first quarter of 1989.<ITAG tagnum="84">XIV. Rulemaking Record</ITAG>The following documents constitute the rulemaking record for this rule(docket control number OPTS-400002A). All documents, including the indexof this record, are available to the public in the OTS Reading Room from8 a.m. to 4 p.m., Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays. TheOTS Reading Room is located at EPA Headquarters, Rm. NE-G004, 401 M St.,SW., Washington, DC 20460. The record includes the following informationconsidered by the Agency in developing this rule:1. Documents in docket no. 400002 at the date of publication of the proposedrule.2. The proposed rule.3. Transcripts of public meetings held July 24 and 27, and August 4, 1987.4. Written comments received on the proposed rule.5. Summaries of meetings held with representatives of industry, publicinterest groups, and State government officials.6. The document titled ``Regulatory Impact Analysis in Support of the FinalRulemaking Under section 313 of the Superfund Amendments and ReauthorizationAct of 1986'' (1987).<ITAG tagnum="84">XV. Regulatory Assessment Requirements</ITAG>A. Executive Order 12291Under Executive Order 12291, EPA must judge whether a rule is ``major''and therefore requires a RIA. EPA has developed a RIA as described in UnitXI. This RIA shows that the combination of impacts of the statutory provisionsof section 313 and the interpretive provisions of this rule may createa first year impact of $527 million and a second year impact of $299 million.EPA has determined that this rule is ``major'' because it may have an effectof $100 million or more on the economy. EPA does not, however, anticipatethat this rule will have a significant effect on competition, costs, orprices.This rule was submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) forreview as required by Executive Order 12291.B. Regulatory Flexibility ActSection 313 and the final rule exempt certain small businesses from reporting,i.e., those facilities in SIC codes 20 through 39 with fewer than 10 full-timeemployees. The statutory exclusion of facilities with fewer than 10 full-timeemployees exempts 48 percent of all manufacturing facilities in SIC codes20 through 39. After also considering the volume thresholds, EPA estimatesthat section 313 will require reporting from approximately 3.0 percent(9,400 of 277,100) of all small manufacturing facilities with less than50 employees.Analysis to support the proposed rule indicated that for some segmentsof the manufacturing sector the compliance costs of reporting will havea significant impact. Specifically, reporting costs are estimated to bebetween 1.0 and 2.0 percent of median sales for facilities with fewer than50 employees; and between 2.0 and 4.0 percent of median sales for facilitieswith 10 to 19 employees. Subsequent to proposal, the Agency developed andincluded a Regulatory Flexibility Analysis in the RIA to examine optionsthat might reduce the burden to small businesses.The Agency received extensive comments on the impacts of the proposed ruleon small businesses from the small Business Administration (SBA). SBA presentedseveral alternatives designed to reduce the burden to small businesses,based on the premise that small facilities (those with fewer than 100 employees)have nothing significant to report. These alternatives are discussed below.SBA proposed the development of thresholds based on risks posed by variousemission sources. SBA maintains that data exists from the Agency's regionalstudies that would allow the Agency to calculate risks from air and wateremissions, from which the Agency could develop thresholds for reportingbased on specific risks. From its review of the data, SBA concludes that``small firms collectively contribute only a small fraction, generallyless than 10 to 15 percent, of the toxic chemical emissions included inthe local area studies.'' SBA acknowledges that ``there may be a lack ofinformation on toxicity which would make [a risk] analysis infeasible forcertain chemicals.''SBA's second proposed alternative is to combine section 313 with CERCLAsection continuous release reporting, using 10 pounds a day ReportableQuantity (RQ) for any section 313 chemicals not covered under CERCLA. SBAstates that this would ensure that ``facilities of primary concern (thosewith significant emissions) are included.'' SBA believes this approachwould also alleviate the significant economic burden on small businesses.SBA recommends as a third alternative a <T3>de minimis</T3> reporting range of 0 to 1 pound of emissions per dayor 0 to 250 pounds per year. SBA's fourth alternative was a total exemptionof small facilities (defined by SBA as those with fewer than 100 employees)from reporting; and/or an abbreviated or shortened reporting form.The Agency received comments both in support of an in opposition to SBA'sposition. The Agency identified 8 regulatory alternatives as part of theRegulatory flexibility Analysis for this rule. The alternatives, evaluatedon the basis of cost and economic criteria, represent options for reducingthe reporting burden for small businesses. Each alternative is describedand discussed below.<T3>Alternative 1:</T3> Rule as proposed; statutory exclusion of facilitieshaving fewer than 10 employees. This alternative allows complete coverageof reporting on emissions, but provides no reduction in burden to smallfacilities.<T3>Alternative 2</T3>: Exempt all small businesses (defined as facilitieswith fewer than 50 employees). [The RIA analyzes alternative definitionsof small businesses.] This alternative not only reduces the reporting burdenfor small businesses, but eliminates any burden of compliance determinationfrom small facilities. However, this alternative would result in no reportingof emissions from small facilities, which could lead to substantial gapsin the Emissions Inventory, especially at the community level.The costs are summarized in Table IV below.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table IV._Regulatory Flexibility Study Options: Costs Per Facility</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Present Value for 10 Years of Reporting]</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1>Cost (\1\)</H1>Option:<ITAG tagnum="3">1</ITAG><D>$54,320</D><ITAG tagnum="3">2</ITAG><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3</ITAG><D>\2\ $54,320</D><ITAG tagnum="3">4</ITAG><D>$5,100 to $54,320</D><ITAG tagnum="3">5</ITAG><D>$5,100</D><ITAG tagnum="3">6</ITAG><D>$24,680</D><ITAG tagnum="3">7</ITAG><D>$47,130 to \3\ $52,630</D><ITAG tagnum="3">8</ITAG><D>$34,410 to \4\ $50,990</D><F>\1\ In present value 1987 dollars at a 10 percent discount rate foryears 1988-1997.</F><F>\2\ Given the absence of any SIC codes that would meet exemption criteria.</F><F>\3\ Average cost, but this option would offer the benefit of limitingthe extent to which individual facilities would exceed the average.</F><F>\4\ Assumes all 10 chemicals per facility enjoy 10 to 50 percent costsavings for estimates of air and water releases in ranges.</F></ITAG><T3>Alternative 3: </T3>Exempt facilities in specific SIC codes if theyaccount for low aggregate emissions. This alternative would exempt smallbusinesses in particular industries that might trigger the need to reportbased on the volume threshold for use, but have little actual emissions.However, after examining the available data (six State and local data basesthat contain emissions data for some of the section 313 chemicals), noSIC codes were identified that met the criterion.   <T3>Alternative 4: </T3>Require annual reporting by small businesses onlyof Parts I through VI of proposed Form R; Parts VII through X of the proposedform would be due only upon request by EPA. This alternative would eliminatethe most onerous part of the reporting burden (i.e., estimating releases).However, while small facilities would be identified in the data base, themost important information (i.e., emissions) would not be captured. Thereforethe utility to the public of the date base would be reduced. There alsowould be likely increased administrative costs with such an approach whenthe emissions data are requested. These costs would be incurred by thepublic (for requesting information), industry (for having to essentiallyfill out a form for some chemicals twice), and the Agency (for establishingprocedures of how and to whom the request should be made, response times,etc.).   <T3>Alternative 5: </T3>Require annual reporting by small businesses onlyof Parts I through VI of proposed Form R plus data on quantity used orproduced; EPA estimates releases from small business facilities. This alternativewould eliminate the most onerous part of the reporting burden as describedin Alternative 4. EPA would provide emissions estimates in the data basethat were more consistently derived. However, the information that EPAwould have to require to estimate releases may actually increase the informationrequired on the form. For example, EPA would have to require production,processing, or use volume information. This approach would increase Agencycosts for calculating releases. It would also require industry's willingnessto report such potentially confidential or trade secret information asa tradeoff for the lowered burden.   <T3>Alternative 6: </T3>Require reporting by small businesses every thirdyear, rather than annually. This alternative would reduced the burden tosmall facilities over time, while still providing data on small facilitiesand their emissions in the data base. However, the frequency of reportingcannot be changed until 1993 under section 313(i).   <T3>Alternative 7: </T3>Require small businesses to report only up to acertain number of chemicals per year. This alternative would place a capon the number of chemicals that small businesses would report each year.The burden would be reduced for those small facilities with more than theaverage number of chemicals per facility. Data on small facilities andestimates of emissions would still be provided in the data base. However,in the intervening years until facilities have reported on all section313 chemicals, the data base will not be as complete or as accurate.  <T3>Alternative 8: </T3>Allow small businesses to mark ranges check-boxesfor release less than 1,000 pounds per year to any environmental medium.The check boxes would apply to 0, 1 to 499 pounds per year, and 500 to999 pounds per year. The facility would have the option of reporting aspecific figure rather than checking a box. The facility would have toprovide a specific figure estimate for releases of 1,000 pounds or moreper year. The reporting burden would be reduced by not requiring smallfacilities to further refine estimates of these lower level releases. Acertain degree of precision might be lost relative to analyzing the releasesreporting in such ranges. However, the data base would maintain a higherdegree of completeness relative to other options (except option 1) becauseall data required by the form would be reported each year by all facilities.<T3>Conclusions: </T3>The Agency has the authority to establish differentthresholds for a chemical, class of chemicals, or categories of facilities.However, any revised threshold must obtain reporting on a substantial majorityof total releases of the chemicals at all facilities subject to reporting.Based on the limited available data the Agency cannot support any modificationof thresholds based on size of facility, and still be able to maintainthat a substantial majority of the total releases would be captured throughreporting. EPA analyzed certain limited use and release data availableon a subset of the section 313 chemicals from the states of New Jersey,Michigan, and Massachusetts. These data were used to estimate the potentialimpact on coverage of aggregate emissions, coverage of chemical-by-chemicalemissions, and coverage of emissions at the community level. This analysisshows that facilities with fewer than 49 employees account for a least30 percent of the air releases for 12 of 87 chemicals listed in the NewJersey data base. EPA concluded that exempting facilities of this sizerange from reporting may lead to lack of coverage of certain chemicals.Therefore, the Agency is not modifying the thresholds (i.e., the annualpounds of a toxic chemical manufactured, processed, or otherwise used)for small facilities. However, as a result of this analysis and consultation with SBA, the Agencyhas incorporated alternative No. 8, limited range reporting, into the reportingrequirements of the rule. It is difficult from the data available to EPAto estimate exact burden savings associated with this approach. Savingsfor any individual small facility will depend upon the number of chemicalsbeing reported and the number of environmental media to which each chemicalis released. For example, a simple mass balance around a process may beadequate to show that air releases are less than 1,000 pounds. The informationnecessary to complete such a mass balance should be readily available andtabulated, at least partly, to determine whether the reporting thresholdis met. By relying on a rough mass balance calculation, the facility couldavoid calculating releases from individual process points (for example,valve and flanges leaks, or storage tanks vents). Completing these calculationsrequires that additional information be tabulated (e.g., the number ofvalves, or the size of storage tanks). For a release to a single medium, the savings could be as high as 50 percentof the time for completion of the release section of the form (12 of 24hours). For releases of a chemical to several media the savings are likelyto be approximately 10 percent because of the time required to determinehow such releases are apportioned per media. These savings are reflectedin the cost per facility for option 8 in Table IV. SBA believes that EPA'sestimates of savings are conservative and that small facilities would benefitsubstantially from this approach. EPA expects that small facilities will realize the most benefit from theoptional range reporting concept because larger facilities are more likelyto have the technical capabilities to develop more specific estimates.However, EPA believes that this optional range reporting provision couldprovide a burden reducing benefit to any subject facility regardless ofsize. Therefore, EPA has extended the optional range reporting provisionto all subject facilities. EPA believes that it will be necessary to evaluate the relative costs andbenefits of this alternative in light of the first few years of section313 submissions. Therefore, a 3-year limitation has been attached to thisprovision. The limited range reporting option will apply to the 1987, 1988,and 1989 reporting years unless EPA takes action to extend or permanentlyadopt this reporting provision. EPA will publish its analysis prior toallowing the provisions to expire. C. Paperwork Reduction Act OMB has reviewed the information collection requirements contained in thisrule under the provisions of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, 44 U.S.C.3501 <T3>et seq. </T3>and has assigned OMB control number 2070-0093.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 40 CFR Part 372 </ITAG>Environmental protection, Recordkeeping, reporting, and notification requirements,Toxic chemicals.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: February 2, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">A. James Barnes, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Administrator.</ITAG>Therefore, Chapter I of 40 CFR is amended by adding a new Part 372 to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 372_TOXIC CHEMICAL RELEASE REPORTING; COMMUNITY RIGHT-TO-KNOW</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.1 Scope and purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.3 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.5 Persons subject to this Part. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.10 Recordkeeping. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.18 Compliance and enforcement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Reporting Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.22 Covered facilities for toxic chemical release reporting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.25 Thresholds for reporting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.30 Reporting requirements and schedule for reporting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.38 Exemptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Supplier Notification Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.45 Notification about toxic chemicals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Specific Toxic Chemical Listings </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.65 Chemicals and chemical categories to which this Part applies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Forms and Instructions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">372.85 Toxic chemical release reporting form and instructions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 11013, 11028. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope and purpose. </ITAG>This Part sets forth requirements for the submission of information relatingto the release of toxic chemicals under section 313 of Title III of theSuperfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986. The information collectedunder this Part is intended to inform the general public and the communitiessurrounding covered facilities about releases of toxic chemicals, to assistresearch, to aid in the development of regulations, guidelines, and standards,and for other purposes. This Part also sets forth requirements for suppliersto notify persons to whom they distribute mixtures or trade name productscontaining toxic chemicals that they contain such chemicals. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>Terms defined in sections 313(b)(1)(c) and 329 of Title III and not explicitlydefined herein are used with the meaning given in Title III. For the purposeof this Part: ``Acts'' means Title III. ``Article'' means a manufactured item: (1) Which is formed to a specificshape or design during manufacture; (2) which has end use functions dependentin whole or in part upon its shape or design during end use; and (3) whichdoes not release a toxic chemical under normal conditions of processingor use of that item at the facility or establishments. ``Customs territory of the United States'' means the 50 States, the Districtof Columbia, and Puerto Rico. ``EPA'' means the United States Environmental Protection Agency. ``Establishment'' means an economic unit, generally at a single physicallocation, where business is conducted or where services or industrial operationsare performed. ``Facility'' means all buildings, equipment, structures, and other stationaryitems which are located on a single site or on contiguous or adjacent sitesand which are owned or operated by the same person (or by any person whichcontrols, is controlled by, or under common control with such person).A facility may contain more than one establishment. ``Full-time employee'' means 2,000 hours per year of full-time equivalentemployment. A facility would calculate the number of full-time employeesby totaling the hours worked during the calendar year by all employees,including contract employees, and dividing that total by 2,000 hours. ``Import'' means to cause a chemical to be imported into the customs territoryof the United States. For purposes of this definition, ``to cause'' meansto intend that the chemical be imported and to control the identity ofthe imported chemical and the amount to be imported. ``Manufacture'' means to produce, prepare, import, or compound a toxicchemical. Manufacture also applies to a toxic chemical that is producedcoincidentally during the manufacture, processing, use, or disposal ofanother chemical or mixture of chemicals, including a toxic chemical thatis separated from that other chemical or mixture of chemicals as a byproduct,and a toxic chemical that remains in that other chemical or mixture ofchemicals as an impurity. ``Mixture'' means any combination of two or more chemicals, if the combinationis not, in whole or in part, the result of a chemical reaction. However,if the combination was produced by a chemical reaction but could have beenproduced without a chemical reaction, it is also treated as a mixture.A mixture also includes any combination which consists of a chemical andassociated impurities. ``Otherwise use'' or ``use'' means any use of a toxic chemical that isnot covered by the terms ``manufacture'' or ``process'' and includes useof a toxic chemical contained in a mixture or trade name product. Relabelingor redistributing a container of a toxic chemical where no repackagingof the toxic chemical occurs does not constitute use or processing of thetoxic chemical. ``Process'' means the preparation of a toxic chemical, after its manufacture,for distribution in commerce: (1) In the same form or physical state as, or in a different form or physicalstate from, that in which it was received by the person so preparing suchsubstance, or (2) As part of an article containing the toxic chemical. Process also appliesto the processing of a toxic chemical contained in a mixture or trade nameproduct.  ``Release'' means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying,discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing intothe environment (including the abandonment or discarding of barrels, containers,and other closed receptacles) of any toxic chemical.``Senior management official'' means an official with management responsibilityfor the person or persons completing the report, or the manager of environmentalprograms for the facility or establishments, or for the corporation owningor operating the facility or establishments responsible for certifyingsimilar reports under other environmental regulatory requirements.``Title III'' means Title III of the Superfund Amendments and ReauthorizationAct of 1986, also titled the Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-KnowAct of 1986.``Toxic chemical'' means a chemical or chemical category listed in andSection;372.65.``Trade name product'' means a chemical or mixture of chemicals that isdistributed to other persons and that incorporates a toxic chemical componentthat is not identified by the applicable chemical name or Chemical AbstractsService Registry number listed in andSection; 372.65.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Persons subject to this Part.</ITAG>Owners and operators of facilities described in andSection;andSection; 372.22and 372.45 are subject to the requirements of this Part. If the owner andoperator of a facility are different persons, only one need report underandSection; 372.17 or provide a notice under andSection; 372.45 for each toxicchemical in a mixture or trade name product distributed from the facility.However, if no report is submitted or notice provided, EPA will hold boththe owner and the operator liable under section 325(c) of Title III, exceptas provided in andSection;andSection; 372.38(e) and 372.45(g).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Recordkeeping.</ITAG>(a) Each person subject to the reporting requirements of this Part mustretain the following records for a period of 3 years from the date of thesubmission of a report under andSection; 372.30:(1) A copy of each report submitted by the person under andSection; 372.30.(2) All supporting materials and documentation used by the person to makethe compliance determination that the facility or establishments is a coveredfacility under andSection; 372.22 or andSection; 372.45.(3) Documentation supporting the report submitted under andSection; 372.30including:(i) Documentation supporting any determination that a claimed allowableexemption under andSection; 372.38 applies.(ii) Data supporting the determination of whether a threshold under andSection;372.25 applies for each toxic chemical.(iii) Documentation supporting the calculations of the quantity of eachtoxic chemical released to the environment or transferred to an off-sitelocation.(iv) Documentation supporting the use indications and quantity on sitereporting for each toxic chemical, including dates of manufacturing, processing,or use.(v) Documentation supporting the basis of estimate used in developing anyrelease or off-site transfer estimates for each toxic chemical.(vi) Receipts or manifests associated with the transfer of each toxic chemicalin waste to off-site locations.(vii) Documentation supporting reported waste treatment methods, estimatesof treatment efficiencies, ranges of influent concentration to such treatment,the sequential nature of treatment steps, if applicable, and the actualoperating data, if applicable, to support the waste treatment efficiencyestimate for each toxic chemical.(b) Each person subject to the notification requirements of this part mustretain the following records for a period of 3 years from the date of thesubmission of a notification under andSection; 372.45.(1) All supporting materials and documentation used by the person to determinewhether a notice is required under andSection; 372.45.(2) All supporting materials and documentation used in developing eachrequired notice under andSection; 372.45 and a copy of each notice.(c) Records retained under this section must be maintained at the facilityto which the report applies or from which a notification was provided.Such records must be readily available for purposes of inspection by EPA.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.18</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance and enforcement.</ITAG>Violators of the requirements of this Part shall be liable for a civilpenalty in an amount not to exceed $25,000 each day for each violationas provided in section 325(c) of Title III.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Reporting Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Covered facilities for toxic chemical release reporting.</ITAG>A facility that meets all of the following criteria for a calendar yearis a covered facility for that calendar year and must report under andSection;372.30.(a) The facility has 10 or more full-time employees.(b) The facility is in Standard Industrial Classification Codes 20 through39 (as in effect on January 1, 1987) by virtue of the fact that it meetsone of the following criteria:(1) The facility is an establishment with a primary SIC code of 20 through39.(2) The facility is a multi-establishment complex where all establishmentshave a primary SIC code of 20 through 39.(3) The facility is a multi-establishment complex in which one of the followingis true:(i) The sum of the value of products shipped and/or produced from thoseestablishments that have a primary SIC code of 20 through 39 is greaterthan 50 percent of the total value of all products shipped and/or producedfrom all establishments at the facility.(ii) One establishment having a primary SIC code of 20 through 39 contributesmore in terms of value of products shipped and/or produced than any otherestablishment within the facility.(c) The facility manufactured (including imported), processed, or otherwiseused a toxic chemical in excess of an applicable threshold quantity ofthat chemical set forth in andSection; 372.25.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Thresholds for reporting.</ITAG>The threshold amounts for purposes of reporting under andSection; 372.30for toxic chemicals are as follows:(a) With respect to a toxic chemical manufactured (including imported)or processed at a facility during the following calendar years:1987_75,000 pounds of the chemical manufactured or processed for the year.1988_50,000 pounds of the chemical manufactured or processed for the year.1989 and thereafter_25,000 pounds of the chemical manufactured or processedfor the year.(b) With respect to a chemical otherwise used at a facility, 10,000 poundsof the chemical used for the applicable calendar year.(c) With respect to activities involving a toxic chemical at a facility,when more than one threshold applies to the activities, the owner or operatorof the facility must report if it exceeds any applicable threshold andmust report on all activities at the facility involving the chemical, exceptas provided in andSection; 372.38.(d) When a facility manufactures, processes, or otherwise uses more thanone member of a chemical category listed in andSection; 372.65(c), the owneror operator of the facility must report if it exceeds any applicable thresholdfor the total volume of all the members of the category involved in theapplicable activity. Any such report must cover all activities at the facilityinvolving members of the category.(e) A facility may process or otherwise use a toxic chemical in a recycle/reuseoperation. To determine whether the facility has processed or used morethan an applicable threshold of the chemical, the owner or operator ofthe facility shall count the amount of the chemical added to the recycle/reuseoperation during the calendar year. In particular, if the facility startsup such an operation during a calendar year, or in the event that the contentsof the whole recycle/reuse operation are replaced in a calendar year, theowner or operator of the facility shall also count the amount of the chemicalplaced into the system at these times.(f) A toxic chemical may be listed in andSection; 372.65 with the notationthat only persons who manufacture the chemical, or manufacture it by acertain method, are required to report. In that case, only owners or operatorsof facilities that manufacture that chemical as described in andSection;372.65 in excess of the threshold applicable to such manufacture in andSection;372.25 are required to report. In completing the reporting form, the owneror operator is only required to account for the quantity of the chemicalso manufactured and releases associated with such manufacturing, but notreleases associated with subsequent processing or use of the chemical atthat facility. Owners and operators of facilities that solely process oruse such a chemical are not required to report for that chemical.(g) A toxic chemical may be listed in andSection; 372.65 with the notationthat it is in a specific form (e.g., fume or dust, solution, or friable)or of a specific color (e.g., yellow or white). In that case, only ownersor operators of facilities that manufacture, process, or use that chemicalin the form or of the color, specified in andSection; 372.65 in excess ofthe threshold applicable to such activity in andSection; 372.25 are requiredto report. In completing the reporting form, the owner or operator is onlyrequired to account for the quantity of the chemical manufactured, processed,or used in the form or color specified in andSection; 372.65 and for releasesassociated with the chemical in that form or color. Owners or operatorsof facilities that solely manufacture, process, or use such a chemicalin a form or color other than those specified by andSection; 372.65 are notrequired to report for that chemical.(h) Metal compound categories are listed in andSection; 372.65(c). For purposesof determining whether any of the thresholds specified in andSection; 372.25are met for metal compound category, the owner or operator of a facilitymust make the threshold determination based on the total amount of allmembers of the metal compound category manufactured, processed, or usedat the facility. In completing the release portion of the reporting formfor releases of the metal compounds, the owner or operator is only requiredto account for the weight of the parent metal released. Any contributionto the mass of the release attributable to other portions of each compoundin the category is excluded.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting requirements and schedule for reporting.</ITAG>(a) For each toxic chemical known by the owner or operator to be manufactured(including imported), processed, or otherwise used in excess of an applicablethreshold quantity in andSection; 372.25 at its covered facility describedin andSection; 372.22 for a calendar year, the owner or operator must submitto EPA and to the State in which the facility is located a completed EPAForm R (EPA Form 9350-1) in accordance with the instructions in SubpartE.(b)(1) The owner or operator of a covered facility is required to reportas described in paragraph (a) of this section on a toxic chemical thatthe owner or operator knows is present as a component of a mixture or tradename product which the owner or operator receives from another person,if that chemical is imported, processed, or otherwise used by the owneror operator in excess of an applicable threshold quantity in andSection;372.25 at the facility as part of that mixture or trade name product.(2) The owner or operator knows that a toxic chemical is present as a componentof a mixture or trade name product (i) if the owner or operator knows orhas been told the chemical identity or Chemical Abstracts Service RegistryNumber of the chemical and the identity or Number corresponds to an identityor Number in andSection; 372.65, or (ii) if the owner or operator has beentold by the supplier of the mixture or trade name product that the mixtureor trade name product contains a toxic chemical subject to section 313of the Act or this Part.(3) To determine whether a toxic chemical which is a component of a mixtureor trade name product has been imported, processed, or otherwise used inexcess of an applicable threshold in andSection;372.25 at the facility, theowner or operator shall consider only the portion of the mixture or tradename product that consists of the toxic chemical and that is imported,processed, or otherwise used at the facility, together with any other amountsof the same toxic chemical that the owner or operator manufactures, imports,processes, or otherwise uses at the facility as follows:  (i) If the owner or operator knows the specific chemical identity of thetoxic chemical and the specific concentration at which it is present inthe mixture or trade name product, the owner or operator shall determinethe weight of the chemical imported, processed, or otherwise used as partof the mixture or trade name product at the facility and shall combinethat with the weight of the toxic chemical manufactured (including imported)processed, or otherwise used at the facility other than as part of themixture or trade name product. After combining these amounts, if the owneror operator determines that the toxic chemical was manufactured, processed,or otherwise used in excess of an applicable threshold in andSection;372.25,the owner or operator shall report the specific chemical identity and allreleases of the toxic chemical on EPA Form R in accordance with the instructionsin Subpart E.  (ii) If the owner or operator knows the specific chemical identity of thetoxic chemical and does not know the specific concentration at which thechemical is present in the mixture or trade name product, but has beentold the upper bound concentration of the chemical in the mixture or tradename product, the owner or operator shall assume that the toxic chemicalis present in the mixture or trade name product at the upper bound concentration,shall determine whether the chemical has been manufactured, processed,or otherwise used at the facility in excess of an applicable thresholdas provided in paragraph (b)(3)(i) of this section, and shall report asprovided in paragraph (b)(3)(i) of this section.  (iii) If the owner or operator knows the specific chemical identity ofthe toxic chemical, does not know the specific concentration at which thechemical is present in the mixture or trade name product, has not beentold the upper bound concentration of the chemical in the mixture or tradename product, and has not otherwise developed information on the compositionof the chemical in the mixture or trade name product, then the owner oroperator is not required to factor that chemical in that mixture or tradename product into threshold and release calculations for that chemical. (iv) If the owner or operator has been told that a mixture or trade nameproduct contains a toxic chemical, does not know the specific chemicalidentity of the chemical and knows the specific concentration at whichit is present in the mixture or trade name product, the owner or operatorshall determine the weight of the chemical imported, processed, or otherwiseused as part of the mixture or trade name product at the facility. Sincethe owner or operator does not know the specific identity of the toxicchemical, the owner or operator shall make the threshold determinationonly for the weight of the toxic chemical in the mixture or trade nameproduct. If the owner or operator determines that the toxic chemical wasimported, processed, or otherwise used as part of the mixture or tradename product in excess of an applicable threshold in andSection;372.25, theowner or operator shall report the generic chemical name of the toxic chemical,or a trade name if the generic chemical name is not known, and all releasesof the toxic chemical on EPA Form R in accordance with the instructionsin Subpart E.  (v) If the owner or operator has been told that a mixture or trade nameproduct contains a toxic chemical, does not know the specific chemicalidentity of the chemical, and does not know the specific concentrationat which the chemical is present in the mixture or trade name product,but has been told the upper bound concentration of the chemical in themixture or trade name product, the owner or operator shall assume thatthe toxic chemical is present in the mixture or trade name product at theupper bound concentration, shall determine whether the chemical has beenimported, processed, or otherwise used at the facility in excess of anapplicable threshold as provided in paragraph (b)(3)(iv) of this section,and shall report as provided in paragraph (b)(3)(iv) of this section. (vi) If the owner or operator has been told that a mixture or trade nameproduct contains a toxic chemical, does not know the specific chemicalidentity of the chemical, does not know the specific concentration at whichthe chemical is present in the mixture or trade name product, includinginformation they have themselves developed, and has not been told the upperbound concentration of the chemical in the mixture or trade name product,the owner or operator is not required to report with respect to that toxicchemical.  (c) A covered facility may consist of more than one establishment. Theowner or operator of such a facility at which a toxic chemical was manufactured(including imported), processed, or otherwise used in excess of an applicablethreshold may submit a separate Form R for each establishment or for eachgroup of establishments within the facility to report the activities involvingthe toxic chemical at each establishment or group of establishments, providedthat activities involving that toxic chemical at all the establishmentswithin the covered facility are reported. If each establishment or groupof establishments files separate reports then for all other chemicals subjectto reporting at that facility they must also submit separate reports. However,an establishment or group of establishments does not have to submit a reportfor a chemical that is not manufactured (including imported), processed,otherwise used, or released at that establishment or group of establishments. (d) Each report under this section for activities involving a toxic chemicalthat occured during a calendar year at a covered facility must be submittedon or before July 1 of the next year. The first such report for calendaryear 1987 activities must be submitted on of before July 1, 1988.   (e) For reports applicable to activities for calendar years 1987, 1988,and 1989 only, the owner or operator of a covered facility may report releasesof a specific toxic chemical to an environmental medium, or transfers ofwastes containing a specific toxic chemical to an off-site location, ofless than 1,000 pounds using the ranges provided in the form and instructionsin Subpart E. For reports applicable to activities in calendar year 1990and beyond, these ranges may not be used.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;372.38 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exemptions.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>De minimis concentrations of a toxic chemical in a mixture. </T3>Ifa toxic chemical is present in a mixture of chemicals at a covered facilityand the toxic chemical is in a concentration in the mixture which is below1 percent of the mixture, or 0.1 percent of the mixture in the case ofa toxic chemical which is a carcinogen as defined in 29 CFR 1910.1200(d)(4),a person is not required to consider the quantity of the toxic chemicalpresent in such mixture when determining whether an applicable thresholdhas been met under andSection;372.25 or determining the amount of releaseto be reported under andSection;372.30. This exemption applies whether theperson received the mixture from another person or the person producedthe mixture, either by mixing the chemicals involved or by causing a chemicalreaction which resulted in the creation of the toxic chemical in the mixture.However, this exemption applies only to the quantity of the toxic chemicalpresent in the mixture. If the toxic chemical is also manufactured (includingimported), processed, or otherwise used at the covered facility other thanas part of the mixture or in a mixture at higher concentrations, in excessof an applicable threshold quantity set forth in andSection;372.25, the personis required to report under andSection;372.30.(b) <T3>Articles.</T3> If a toxic chemical is present in an article at a coveredfacility, a person is not required to consider the quantity of the toxicchemical present in such article when determining whether an applicablethreshold has been met under andSection; 372.25 or determining the amountof release to be reported under andSection; 372.30. This exemption applieswhether the person received the article from another person or the personproduced the article. However, this exemption applies only to the quantityof the toxic chemical present in the article. If the toxic chemical ismanufactured (including imported), processed, or otherwise used at thecovered facility other than as part of the article, in excess of an applicablethreshold quantity set forth in andSection; 372.25, the person is requiredto report under andSection; 372.30. Persons potentially subject to this exemptionshould carefully review the definitions of ``article'' and ``release''in andSection; 372.3. If a release of a toxic chemical occurs as a resultof the processing or use of an item at the facility, that item does notmeet the definition of ``article.''(c) <T3>Uses.</T3> If a toxic chemical is used at a covered facility for apurpose described in this paragraph (c), a person is not required to considerthe quantity of the toxic chemical used for such purpose when determiningwhether an applicable threshold has been met under andSection; 372.25 ordetermining the amount of releases to be reported under andSection; 372.30.However, this exemption only applies to the quantity of the toxic chemicalused for the purpose described in this paragraph (c). If the toxic chemicalis also manufactured (including imported), processed, or otherwise usedat the covered facility other than as described in this paragraph (c),in excess of an applicable threshold quantity set forth in andSection; 372.25,the person is required to report under andSection; 372.30.(1) Use as a structural component of the facility.(2) Use of products for routine janitorial or facility grounds maintenance.Examples include use of janitorial cleaning supplies, fertilizers, andpesticides similar in type or concentration to consumer products.(3) Personal use by employees or other persons at the facility of foods,drugs, cosmetics, or other personal items containing toxic chemicals, includingsupplies of such products within the facility such as in a facility operatedcafeteria, store, or infirmary.(4) Use of products containing toxic chemicals for the purpose of maintainingmotor vehicles operated by the facility.(5) Use of toxic chemicals present in process water and non-contact coolingwater as drawn from the environment or from municipal sources, or toxicchemicals present in air used either as compressed air or as part of combustion.(d) <T3>Activities in laboratories.</T3> If a toxic chemical is manufactured,processed, or used in a laboratory at a covered facility under the supervisionof a technically qualified individual as defined in andSection; 720.3(ee)of this title, a person is not required to consider the quantity so manufactured,processed, or used when determining whether an applicable threshold hasbeen met under andSection; 372.25 or determining the amount of release tobe reported under andSection; 372.30. This exemption does not apply in thefollowing cases:(1) Specialty chemical production.(2) Manufacture, processing, or use of toxic chemicals in pilot plant scaleoperations.(3) Activities conducted outside the laboratory.(e) <T3>Certain owners of leased property.</T3> The owner of a covered facilityis not subject to reporting under andSection; 372.30 if such owner's onlyinterest in the facility is ownership of the real estate upon which thefacility is operated. This exemption applies to owners of facilities suchas industrial parks, all or part of which are leased to persons who operateestablishments within SIC code 20 through 39 where the owner has no otherbusiness interest in the operation of the covered facility.(f) <T3>Reporting by certain operators of establishments on leased propertysuch as industrial parks.</T3> If two or more persons, who do not haveany common corporate or business interest (including common ownership orcontrol), operate separate establishments within a single facility, eachsuch person shall treat the establishments it operates as a facility forpurposes of this Part. The determinations in andSection; 372.22 and andSection;372.25 shall be made for those establishments. If any such operator determinesthat its establishment is a covered facility under andSection; 372.22 andthat a toxic chemical has been manufactured (including imported), processed,or otherwise used at the establishment in excess of an applicable thresholdin andSection; 372.25 for a calendar year, the operator shall submit a reportin accordance with andSection; 372.30 for the establishment. For purposesof this paragraph (f), a common corporate or business interest includesownership, partnership, joint ventures, ownership of a controlling interestin one person by the other, or ownership of a controlling interest in bothpersons by a third person.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Supplier Notification Requirement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification about toxic chemicals.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (c), (d), and (e) of this sectionand andSection; 372.65, a person who owns or operates a facility or establishmentwhich:(1) Is in Standard Industrial Classification codes 20 through 39 as setforth in paragraph (b) of andSection; 372.22,(2) Manufactures (including imports) or processes a toxic chemical, and(3) Sells or otherwise distributes a mixture or trade name product containingthe toxic chemical, to (i) a facility described in andSection; 372.22, or(ii) to a person who in turn may sell or otherwise distributes such mixtureor trade name product to a facility described in andSection; 372.22(b), mustnotify each person to whom the mixture or trade name product is sold orotherwise distributed from the facility or establishment in accordancewith paragraph (b) of this section.(b) The notification required in paragraph (a) of this section shall bein writing and shall include:(1) A statement that the mixture or trade name product contains a toxicchemical or chemicals subject to the reporting requirements of section313 of Title III of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of1986 and 40 CFR Part 372.(2) The name of each toxic chemical, and the associated Chemical AbstractsService registry number of each chemical if applicable, as set forth inandSection; 372.65. (3) The percent by weight of each toxic chemical in the mixture or tradename product. (c) Notification under this section shall be provided as follows:(1) For a mixture or trade name product containing a toxic chemical listedin andSection; 373.65 with an effective date of January 1, 1987, the personshall provide the written notice described in paragraph (b) of this sectionto each recipient of the mixture or trade name product with at least thefirst shipment of each mixture or trade name product to each recipientin each calendar year beginning January 1, 1989. (2) For a mixture or trade name product containing a toxic chemical listedin andSection; 372.65 with an effective date of January 1, 1989 or later,the person shall provide the written notice described in paragraph (b)of this section to each recipient of the mixture or trade name productwith at least the first shipment of the mixture or trade name product toeach recipient in each calendar year beginning with the applicable effectivedate. (3) If a person changes a mixture or trade name product for which notificationwas previously provided under paragraph (b) of this section by adding atoxic chemical, removing a toxic chemical, or changing the percent by weightof a toxic chemical in the mixture or trade name product, the person shallprovide each recipient of the changed mixture or trade name product a revisednotification reflecting the change with the first shipment of the changedmixture or trade name product to the recipient. (4) If a person discovers (i) that a mixture or trade name product previosulysold or otherwise distributed to another person during the calendar yearof the discovery contains one or more toxic chemicals and (ii), that anynotification providied to such other persons in that calendar year forthe mixture or trade name product either did not properly identify anyof the toxic chemicals or did not accurately present the percent by weightof any of the toxic chemicals in the mixture or trade name product, theperson shall provide a new notification to the recipient within 30 daysof the discovery which contains the information described in paragraph(b) of this section and identifies the prior shipments of the mixture orproduct in that calendar year to which the new notification applies. (5) If a Material Safety Data Sheet (MSDS) is required to be prepared anddistributed for the mixture or trade name product in accordance with 29CFR 1910.1200, the notification must be attached to or otherwise incorporatedinto such MSDS. When the notification is attached to the MSDS, the noticemust contain clear instructions that the notifications must not be detachedfrom the MSDS and that any copying and redistribution of the MSDS shallinclude copying and redistribution of the notice attached to copies ofthe MSDS subsequently redistributed. (d) Notifications are not required in the following instances:(1) If a mixture or trade name product contains no toxic chemical in excessof the applicable de minimis concentration as specified in andSection; 372.38(a).(2) If a mixture or trade name product is one of the following:(i) An ``article'' as defined in andSection; 372.3 (ii) Foods, drugs, cosmetics, alcoholic beverages, tobacco, or tobaccoproducts packaged for distribution to the general public. (iii) Any consumer product as the term is defined in the Consumer ProductSafety Act (15 U.S.C. 1251 <T3>et seq.</T3>) packaged for distribution to the general public. (e) If the person considers the specific identity of a toxic chemical ina mixture or trade name product to be a trade secret under provisions of29 CFR 1910.1200, the notice shall contain a generic chemical name thatis descriptive of that toxic chemical. (f) If the person considers the specific percent by weight compositionof a toxic chemical in the mixture or trade name product to be a tradesecret under applicable State law or under the Restatement of Torts section757, comment b, the notice must contain a statement that the chemical ispresent at a concentration that does not exceed a specified upper boundconcentration value. For example, a mixture contains 12 percent of a toxicchemical. However, the supplier considers the specific concentration ofthe toxic chemical in the product to be a trade secret. The notice wouldindicate that the toxic chemical is present in the mixture in a concentrationof no more than 15 percent by weight. The upper bound value chosen mustbe no larger than necessary to adequately protect the trade secret. (g) A person is not subject to the requirements of this section to theextent the person does not know that the facility or establishment(s) isselling or otherwise distributing a toxic chemical to another person ina mixture or trade name product. However, for purposes of this section,a person has such knowledge if the person receives a notice under thissection from a supplier of a mixture or trade name product and the personin turn sells or otherwise distributes that mixture or trade name productto another person. (h) If two or more persons, who do not have any common corporate or businessinterest (including common ownership or control), as described in andSection;372.38(f), operate separate establishments within a single facility, eachsuch persons shall treat the establishment(s) it operates as a facilityfor purposes of this section. The determination under paragraph (a) ofthis section shall be made for those establishments. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Specific Toxic Chemical Listings </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Chemicals and chemical categories to which this Part applies. </ITAG>The requirements of this Part apply to the following chemicals and chemicalcategories. This section contains three listings. Paragraph (a) of thissection is an alphabetical order listing of those chemicals that have anassociated Chemical Abstracts Service (CAS) Registry number. Paragraph(b) of this section contains a CAS number order list of the same chemicalslisted in paragraph (a) of this section. Paragraph (c) of this sectioncontains the chemical categories for which reporting is required. Thesechemical categories are listed in alphabetical order and do not have CASnumbers. Each listing identifies the effective date for reporting underandSection; 372.30.(a) <T3>Alphabetical listing.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s350,12,10</C> <H1>Chemical name</H1><H1>CAS No.</H1><H1>Effective date</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Acetaldehyde <D>75-07-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acetamide <D>60-35-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acetone <D>67-64-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acetonitrile <D>75-05-8 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-Acetylaminofluorene <D>53-96-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acrolein <D>107-02-8 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acrylamide <D>79-06-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acrylic acid <D>79-10-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acrylonitrile <D>107-13-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Aldrin[1,4:5,8-Dimethanonaphthalene,1,2,3,4,10,10-hexachloro-1,4,4a,5,8,8a-hexahydro-(1.alpha.,4.alpha.,4a.beta.,5.alpha.,8.alpha.,8a.beta.)-] <D>309-00-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Allyl chloride <D>107-05-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Aluminum (fume or dust) <D>7429-90-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Aluminum oxide <D>1344-28-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-Aminoanthraquinone <D>117-79-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4-Aminoazobenzene <D>60-09-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4-Aminobiphenyl <D>92-67-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1-Amino-2-methylanthraquinone <D>82-28-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ammonia <D>7664-41-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ammonium nitrate (solution) <D>6484-52-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ammonium sulfate (solution) <D>7783-20-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Aniline <D>62-53-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>o</T3>-Anisidine <D>90-04-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>p</T3>-Anisidine <D>104-94-9 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>o</T3>-Anisidine hydrochloride <D>134-29-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Anthracene <D>120-12-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Antimony <D>7440-36-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arsenic <D>7440-38-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Asbestos (friable) <D>1332-21-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Barium <D>7440-39-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Benzal Chloride <D>98-87-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Benzamide <D>55-21-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Benzene <D>71-43-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Benzidine <D>92-87-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Benzoic trichloride (Benzotrichloride) <D>98-07-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Benzoyl chloride <D>98-88-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Benzoyl peroxide <D>94-36-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Benzyl chloride <D>100-44-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Beryllium <D>7440-41-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Biphenyl <D>92-52-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bis(2-chloroethyl)ether <D>111-44-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bis(chloromethyl)ether <D>542-88-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bis(2-chloro-1-methylethyl)ether <D>108-60-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bis(2-ethylhexyl)adipate <D>103-23-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bromoform (Tribromomethane) <D>75-25-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Bromomethane (Methyl bromide) <D>74-83-9 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,3,Butadiene <D>106-99-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Butyl acrylate <D>141-32-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>n</T3>-Butyl alcohol <D>71-36-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>sec</T3>-Butyl alcohol<D>78-92-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>tert</T3>-Butyl alcohol<D>75-65-0</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Butyl benzyl phthalate<D>85-68-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2-Butylene oxide<D>106-88-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Butyraldehyde<D>123-72-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Acid Blue 9, diammonium salt<D>2650-18-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Acid Blue 9, disodium salt<D>3844-45-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Acid Green 3<D>4680-78-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Basic Green 4<D>569-64-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Basic Red 1<D>989-38-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Direct Black 38<D>1937-37-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Direct Blue 6<D>2602-46-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Direct Brown 95<D>16071-86-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Disperse Yellow 3<D>2832-40-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Food Red 5<D>3761-53-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Food Red 15<D>81-88-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Solvent Orange 7<D>3118-97-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Solvent Yellow 3<D>97-56-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Solvent Yellow 14<D>842-07-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Solvent Yellow 34 (Aurimine)<D>492-80-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">C.I. Vat Yellow 4<D>128-66-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cadmium<D>7440-43-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Calcium cyanamide<D>156-62-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Captan[1H-Isoindole-1,3(2H)-dione,3a,4,7,7a-tetrahydro-2-[(trichloromethyl)thio]-]<D>133-06-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Carbaryl[1-Naphthalenol, methylcarbamate]<D>63-25-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Carbon disulfide<D>75-15-0</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Carbon tetrachloride<D>56-23-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Carbonyl sulfide<D>463-58-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Catechol<D>120-80-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chloramben [Benzoic acid,3-amino-2,5-dichloro-]<D>133-90-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chlordane[4,7-Methanoindan,1,2,4,5,6,7,8,8-octachloro-2,3,3a,4,7,7a-hexahydro-]<D>57-74-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chlorine<D>7782-50-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chlorine dioxide<D>10049-04-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chloroacetic acid<D>79-11-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-Chloroacetophenone<D>532-27-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chlorobenzene<D>108-90-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chlorobenzilate [Benzeneacetic acid, 4-chloro-.alpha.-(4-.chlorophenyl)-.alpha.-hydroxy-,ethyl ester]<D>510-15-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chloroethane (Ethyl chloride)<D>75-00-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chloroform<D>67-66-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chloromethane (Methyl chloride)<D>74-87-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chloromethyl methyl ether<D>107-30-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chloroprene<D>126-99-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chlorothalonil[1,3-Benzenedicarbonitrile,2,4,5,6-tetrachloro-]<D>1897-45-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chromium<D>7440-47-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cobalt<D>7440-48-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Copper<D>7440-50-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>p</T3>-Cresidine<D>120-71-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cresol (mixed isomers)<D>1319-77-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>m</T3>-Cresol<D>108-39-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>o</T3>-Cresol<D>95-48-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>p</T3>-Cresol<D>106-44-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cumene<D>98-82-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cumene hydroperoxide<D>80-15-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cupferron[Benzeneamine, N-hydroxy-N-nitroso, ammonium salt]<D>135-20-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cyclohexane<D>110-82-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4-D [Acetic acid, (2,4-dichlorophenoxy)-1]<D>94-75-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Decabromodiphenyl oxide<D>1163-19-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diallate [Carbamothioic acid, bis(1-methylethyl)-, S-(2,3-dichloro-2-propenyl)ester]<D>2303-16-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4-Diaminoanisole<D>615-05-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4-Diaminoanisole sulfate<D>39156-41-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4,4andmin172;-Diaminodiphenyl ether<D>101-80-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diaminotoluene (mixed isomers)<D>25376-45-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4-Diaminotoluene<D>95-80-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diazomethane<D>334-88-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dibenzofuran<D>132-64-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2-Dibromo-3-chloropropane (DBCP)<D>96-12-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2-Dibromoethane (Ethylene dibromide)<D>106-93-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dibutyl phthalate<D>84-74-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dichlorobenzene (mixed isomers)<D>25321-22-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2-Dichlorobenzene<D>95-50-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,3-Dichlorobenzene<D>541-73-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,4-Dichlorobenzene<D>106-46-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3,3andmin172;-Dichlorobenzidine<D>91-94-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dichlorobromomethane<D>75-27-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2-Dichloroethane (Ethylene dichloride)<D>107-06-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2-Dichlorethylene<D>540-59-0</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dichloromethane (Methylene chloride)<D>75-09-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4-Dichlorophenol<D>120-83-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2-Dichloropropane<D>78-87-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,3-Dichloropropylene<D>542-75-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dichlorvos [Phosphoric acid, 2,2-dichloroethenyl dimethyl ester] <D>62-73-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dicofol [Benzenemethanol,4-chloro-.alpha.-(4-chlorophenyl)-.alpha.-(trichloromethyl)-]<D>115-32-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diepoxybutane <D>1464-53-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diethanolamine <D>111-42-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Di-(2-ethylhexyl)phthalate (DEHP) <D>177-81-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diethyl phthalate <D>84-66-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diethyl sulfate <D>64-67-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3,3andmin172;-Dimethoxybenzidine <D>119-90-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4-Dimethylaminoazobenzene <D>60-11-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3,3andmin172;-Dimethylbenzidine (<T3>o</T3>-Tolidine) <D>119-93-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dimethylcarbamyl chloride <D>79-44-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,1-Dimethyl hydrazine <D>57-14-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4-Dimethylphenol <D>105-67-9 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dimethyl phthalate <D>131-11-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dimethyl sulfate <D>77-78-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4,6-Dinitro-<T3>o</T3>-cresol <D>534-52-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4-Dinitrophenol <D>51-28-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4-Dinitrotoluene <D>121-14-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,6-Dinitrotoluene <D>606-20-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>n</T3>-Dioctyl phthalate <D>117-84-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,4-Dioxane <D>123-91-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2-Diphenylhydrazine (Hydrazobenzene) <D>122-66-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Epichlorohydrin <D>106-89-8 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-Ethoxyethanol <D>110-80-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethyl acrylate <D>140-88-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethylbenzene <D>100-41-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethyl chloroformate <D>541-41-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethylene <D>74-85-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethylene glycol <D>107-21-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethyleneimine(Aziridine) <D>151-56-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethylene oxide <D>75-21-8 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ethylene thiourea <D>96-45-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fluometuron [Urea, N,N-dimethyl-Nandmin172;-[3-(trifluoromethyl)phenyl]-]<D>2164-17-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Formaldehyde <D>50-00-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Freon 113 [Ethane, 1,1,2-trichloro-1,2,2-trifluoro-] <D>76-13-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Heptachlor[1,4,5,6,7,8,8-Heptachloro-3a,4,7,7a-tetrahydro-4,7-methano-1H-indene]<D>76-44-8 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hexachlorobenzene <D>118-74-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hexachloro-1,3-butadiene <D>87-68-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hexachlorocyclopentadiene <D>77-47-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hexachloroethane <D>67-72-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hexachloronaphthalene<D>1335-87-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hexamethylphosphoramide<D>680-31-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hydrazine<D>302-01-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hydrazine sulfate<D>10034-93-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hydrochloric acid<D>7647-01-0</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hydrogen cyanide<D>74-90-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hydrogen fluoride<D>7664-39-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hydroquinone<D>123-31-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Isobutyraldehyde<D>78-84-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Isopropyl alcohol (Only persons who manufacture by the strong acidprocess are subject, no supplier notifiction.)<D>67-63-0</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4,4andmin172;-Isopropylidenediphenol<D>80-05-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lead<D>7439-92-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lindane [Cyclohexane, 1,2,3,4,5,6-hexachloro-(1.alpha.,2.alpha.,3.beta.,4.alpha.,5.alpha.,6.beta.)-]<D>58-89-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maleic anhydride<D>108-31-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maneb [Carbamodithioic acid, 1,2-ethanediylbis-, manganese complex]<D>12427-38-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Manganese<D>7439-96-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Melamine<D>108-78-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mercury<D>7439-97-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methanol<D>67-56-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methoxychlor [Benzene, 1,1andmin172;-(2,2,2-trichloroethylidene)bis[4-methoxy-]<D>72-43-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-Methoxyethanol<D>109-86-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methyl acrylate<D>96-33-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methyl <T3>tert</T3>-butyl ether<D>1634-04-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4,4andmin172;-Methylenebis(2-chloro aniline) (MBOCA)<D>101-14-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4,4andmin172;-Methylenebis(<T3>N</T3>,<T3>N</T3>-dimethyl) benzenamine<D>101-61-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methylenebis(phenylisocyanate) (MBI)<D>101-68-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methylene bromide<D>74-95-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4,4andmin172;-Methylenedianiline<D>101-77-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methyl ethyl ketone<D>78-93-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methyl hydrazine<D>60-34-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methyl iodide<D>74-88-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methyl isobutyl ketone<D>108-10-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methyl isocyanate<D>624-83-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Methyl methacrylate<D>80-62-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Michler's ketone<D>90-94-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Molybdenum trioxide<D>1313-27-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mustard gas [Ethane, 1,1andmin172;-thiobis[2-chloro-]<D>505-60-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Naphthalene<D>91-20-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>alpha</T3>-Naphthylamine<D>134-32-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>beta</T3>-Naphthylamine <D>91-59-8 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nickel <D>7440-02-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitric acid <D>7697-37-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrilotriacetic acid <D>139-13-9 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5-Nitro-<T3>o</T3>-anisidine <D>99-59-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrobenzene <D>98-95-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4-Nitrobiphenyl <D>92-93-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrofen [Benzene, 2,4-dichloro-1-(4-nitrophenoxy)-] <D>1836-75-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrogen mustard [2-Chloro-N-(2-chloroethyl)-N-methylethanamine] <D>51-75-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitroglycerin <D>55-63-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-Nitrophenol <D>88-75-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4-Nitrophenol <D>100-02-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-Nitropropane <D>79-46-9 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">p-Nitrosodiphenylamine <D>156-10-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>,<T3>N</T3>-Dimethylaniline <D>121-69-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodi-<T3>n</T3>-butylamine <D>924-16-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodiethylamine <D>55-18-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodimethylamine <D>62-75-9 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodiphenylamine <D>86-30-6 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodi-<T3>n</T3>-propylamine <D>621-64-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosomethylvinylamine <D>4549-40-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosomorpholine <D>59-89-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitroso-<T3>N</T3>-ethylurea <D>759-73-9 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitroso-<T3>N</T3>-methylurea <D>684-93-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosonornicotine <D>16543-55-8 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosopiperidine <D>100-75-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Octachloronaphthalene <D>2234-13-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Osmium tetroxide <D>20816-12-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Parathion [Phosphorothioic acid, O,O-diethyl-O-(4-nitrophenyl) ester]<D>56-38-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pentachlorophenol (PCP) <D>87-86-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Peracetic acid <D>79-21-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Phenol <D>108-95-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>p</T3>-Phenylenediamine <D>106-50-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-Phenylphenol <D>90-43-7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Phosgene <D>75-44-5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Phosphoric acid <D>7664-38-2 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Phosphorus (yellow or white) <D>7723-14-0 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Phthalic anhydride <D>85-44-9 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Picric acid <D>88-89-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) <D>1336-36-3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Propane sultone <D>1120-71-4 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>beta</T3>-Propiolactone <D>57-57-8 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Propionaldehyde <D>123-38-6 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Propoxur [Phenol, 2-(1-methylethoxy)-, methylcarbamate] <D>114-26-1 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Propylene (Propene)<D>115-07-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Propyleneimine<D>75-55-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Propylene oxide<D>75-56-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pyridine<D>110-86-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Quinoline<D>91-22-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Quinone<D>106-51-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Quintozene [Pentachloronitrobenzene]<D>82-68-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Saccharin (only persons who manufacture are subject, no supplier notification)[1,2-Benzisothiazol-3(2H)-one,1,1-dioxide]<D>81-07-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Safrole<D>94-59-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Selenium<D>7782-49-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Silver<D>7440-22-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sodium hydroxide (solution)<D>1310-73-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sodium sulfate (solution)<D>7757-82-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Styrene<D>100-42-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Styrene oxide<D>96-09-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Sulfuric acid<D>7664-93-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Terephthalic acid<D>100-21-0</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,1,2,2-Tetrachloroethane<D>79-34-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tetrachloroethylene (Perchloroethylene)<D>127-18-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tetrachlorvinphos [Phosphoric acid, 2-chloro-1-(2,4,5-trichlorophenyl)ethenyldimethyl ester]<D>961-11-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thallium<D>7440-28-0</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thioacetamide<D>62-55-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4,4andmin172;-Thiodianiline<D>139-65-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thiourea<D>62-55-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thorium dioxide<D>1314-20-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Titanium dioxide<D>13463-67-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Titanium tetrachloride<D>7550-45-0</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Toluene<D>108-88-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Toluene-2,4-diisocyanate<D>584-84-9</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Toluene-2,6-diisocyanate<D>91-08-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>o</T3>-Toluidine<D>95-53-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>o</T3>-Toluidine hydrochloride<D>636-21-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Toxaphene<D>8001-35-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Triaziquone [2,5-Cyclohexadiene-1,4-dione,2,3,5-tris(1-aziridinyl)-]<D>68-76-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Trichlorfon [Phosphonic acid, (2,2,2-trichloro-1-hydroxyethyl)-, dimethylester]<D>52-68-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2,4-Trichlorobenzene<D>120-82-1</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,1,1-Trichloroethane (Methyl chloroform)<D>71-55-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,1,2-Trichloroethane<D>79-00-5</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Trichloroethylene<D>79-01-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4,5-Trichlorophenol<D>95-95-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,4,6-Trichlorophenol<D>88-06-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Trifluralin [Benzeneamine, 2,6-dinitro-N,N-dipropyl-4-(trifluoromethyl)-1]<D>1582-09-8</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1,2,4-Trimethylbenzene<D>95-63-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tris(2,3-dibromopropyl)phosphate<D>126-72-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Urethane (Ethyl carbamate)<D>51-79-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vanadium (fume or dust)<D>7440-62-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vinyl acetate<D>108-05-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vinyl bromide<D>593-60-2</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vinyl chloride<D>75-01-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vinylidene chloride<D>75-35-4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Xylene (mixed isomers)<D>1330-20-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>m</T3>-Xylene<D>108-38-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>o</T3>-Xylene<D>95-47-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>p</T3>-Xylene<D>106-42-3</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2,6-Xylidine<D>87-62-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Zinc (fume or dust)<D>7440-66-6</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Zineb [Carbamodithioic acid, 1,2-ethanediylbis-, zinc complex]<D>12122-67-7</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG></ITAG>(b) <T3>CAS Number listing.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,12,r350,10</C> <H1>CAS No.</H1><H1>Chemical name</H1><H1>Effective date</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">50-00-0 <D>Formaldehyde </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">51-28-5 <D>2,4-Dinitrophenol </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">51-75-2 <D>Nitrogen mustard [2-Chloro-N-(2-chloroethyl)-N-methylethanamine] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">51-79-6 <D>Urethane (Ethyl carbamate) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">52-68-6 <D>Trichlorfon [Phosphonic acid, (2,2,2-trichloro-1-hydroxyethyl)-dimethylester] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">53-96-3 <D>2-Acetylaminofluorene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">55-18-5 <D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodiethylamine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">55-21-0 <D>Benzamide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">55-63-0 <D>Nitroglycerin </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">56-23-5 <D>Carbon tetrachloride </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">56-38-2 <D>Parathion [Phosphorothioic acid, 0,0-diethyl-0-(4-nitrophenyl)ester]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">57-14-7 <D>1,1-Dimethyl hydrazine </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">57-57-8 <D/><T3>beta</T3>-Propiolactone <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">57-74-9 <D>Chlordane [4,7-Methanoindan, 1,2,4,5,6,7,8,8-octachloro-2,3,3a,4,7,7a-hexahydro-]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">58-89-9 <D>Lindane [Cyclohexane, 1,2,3,4,5,6-hexachloro-(1.alpha.,2.alpha.,3.beta.,4.alpha.,5.alpha.,6.beta.)-]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">59-89-2 <D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosomorpholine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">60-09-3 <D>4-Aminoazobenzene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">60-11-7 <D>4-Dimethylaminoazobenzene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">60-34-4 <D>Methyl hydrazine </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">60-35-5 <D>Acetamide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">62-53-3 <D>Aniline </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">62-55-5 <D>Thioacetamide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">62-56-6 <D>Thiourea </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">62-73-7 <D>Dichlorvos [Phosphoric acid, 2,2-dichloroethenyl dimethyl ester] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">62-75-9 <D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodimethylamine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">63-25-2 <D>Carbaryl [1-Naphthalenol, methylcarbamate] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">64-67-5 <D>Diethyl sulfate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">67-56-1 <D>Methanol </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">67-63-0 <D>Isopropyl alcohol (only persons who manufacture by the strong acid processare subject, supplier notification not required.) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">67-64-1 <D>Acetone </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">67-66-3 <D>Chloroform </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">67-72-1 <D>Hexachloroethane </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">68-76-8 <D>Triaziquone [2,5-Cyclohexadiene-1,4-dione,2,3,5-tris(1-aziridinyl)-]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">71-36-3 <D/><T3>n-</T3>Butyl alcohol <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">71-43-2 <D>Benzene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">71-55-6 <D>1,1,1-Trichloroethane (Methyl chloroform) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">72-43-5 <D>Methoxychlor [Benzene, 1,1</D>andmin172;-(2,2,2,-trichloroethylidene)bis[4-methoxy-] <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">74-83-9 <D>Bromomethane (Methyl bromide) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">74-85-1 <D>Ethylene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">74-87-3 <D>Chloromethane (Methyl chloride) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">74-88-4 <D>Methyl iodide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">74-90-8 <D>Hydrogen cyanide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">74-95-3 <D>Methylene bromide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-00-3 <D>Chloroethane (Ethyl chloride) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-01-4 <D>Vinyl chloride </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-05-8 <D>Acetonitrile </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-07-0 <D>Acetaldehyde </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-09-2 <D>Dichloromethane (Methylene chloride) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-15-0 <D>Carbon disulfide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-21-8 <D>Ethylene oxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-25-2 <D>Bromoform (Tribromomethane) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-27-4 <D>Dichlorobromomethane </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-35-4 <D>Vinylidene chloride </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-44-5 <D>Phosgene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-55-8 <D>Propyleneimine </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-56-9 <D>Propylene oxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75-65-0 <D/><T3>tert</T3>-Butyl alcohol <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">77-13-1 <D>Freon 113 [Ethane, 1,1,2-trichloro-1,2,2-trifluoro-] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">76-44-8 <D>Heptachlor [1,4,5,6,7,8,8-Heptachloro-3a,4,7,7a-tetrahydro-4,7-methano-1H-indene]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">77-47-4 <D>Hexachlorocyclopentadiene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">77-78-1 <D>Dimethyl sulfate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">78-84-2 <D>Isobutyraldehyde </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">78-87-5 <D>1,2-Dichloropropane </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">78-92-2 <D/><T3>sec-</T3>Butyl alcohol <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">78-93-3 <D>Methyl ethyl ketone </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-00-5 <D>1,1,2-Trichloroethane </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-01-6 <D>Trichloroethylene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-06-1 <D>Acrylamide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-10-7 <D>Acrylic acid </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-11-8 <D>Chloroacetic acid </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-21-0 <D>Peracetic acid </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-34-5 <D>1,1,2,2-Tetrachloroethane </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-44-7 <D>Dimethylcarbamyl chloride </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">79-46-9 <D>2-Nitropropane </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">80-05-7 <D>4,4</D>andmin172;-Isopropylidenediphenol <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">80-15-9 <D>Cumene hydroperoxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">80-62-6 <D>Methyl methacrylate </D><D>01/01/87 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">81-07-2 <D>Saccharin (only persons who manufacture are subject, no supplier notification)[1,2-Benzisothiazol-3(2H)-one,1,1-dioxide] </D><D>01/01/87 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">81-88-9 <D>C.I. Food Red 15 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">82-28-0 <D>1-Amino-2-methylanthraquinone </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">82-68-8 <D>Quintozene [Pentachloronitrobenzene] </D><D>C12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">84-66-2 <D>Diethyl phthalate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">84-74-2 <D>Dibutyl phthalate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">85-44-9 <D>Phthalic anhydride </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">85-68-7 <D>Butyl benzyl phthalate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">86-30-6 <D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodiphenylamine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">87-62-7 <D>2,6-Xylidine </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">87-68-3 <D>Hexachloro-1,3-butadiene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">87-86-5 <D>Pentachlorophenol (PCP) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">88-06-2 <D>2,4,6-Trichlorophenol </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">88-75-5 <D>2-Nitrophenol </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">88-89-1 <D>Picric acid </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">90-04-0 <D/><T3>o</T3>-Anisidine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">90-43-7 <D>2-Phenylphenol </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">90-94-8 <D>Michler's ketone </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">91-08-7 <D>Toluene-2,6-diisocyanate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">91-20-3 <D>Naphthalene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">91-22-5 <D>Quinoline </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">91-59-8 <D/><T3>beta</T3>-Naphthylamine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">91-94-1 <D>3,3</D>andmin172;-Dichlorobenzidine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">92-52-4 <D>Biphenyl </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">92-67-1 <D>4-Aminobiphenyl </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">92-87-5 <D>Benzidine </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">92-93-3 <D>4-Nitrobiphenyl </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">94-36-0 <D>Benzoyl peroxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">94-59-7 <D>Safrole </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">94-75-7 <D>2,4-D [Acetic acid, (2,4-dichlorophenoxy)-] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">95-47-6 <D/><T3>o</T3>-Xylene <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">95-48-7 <D/><T3>o</T3>-Cresol <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">95-50-1 <D>1,2-Dichlorobenzene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">95-53-4 <D/><T3>o</T3>-Toluidine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">95-63-6 <D>1,2,4-Trimethylbenzene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">95-80-7 <D>2,4-Diaminotoluene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">95-95-4 <D>2,4,5-Trichlorophenol </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">96-09-3 <D>Styrene oxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">96-12-8 <D>1,2-Dibromo-3-chloropropane (DBCP) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">96-33-3 <D>Methyl acrylate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">96-45-7 <D>Ethylene thiourea </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">97-56-3 <D>C.I. Solvent Yellow 3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">98-07-7 <D>Benzoic trichloride (Benzotrichloride) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">98-82-8 <D>Cumene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">98-87-3<D>Benzal chloride</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">98-88-4<D>Benzoyl chloride</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">98-95-3<D>Nitrobenzene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">99-59-2<D>5-Nitro-</D><T3>o</T3>-anisidine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100-02-7<D>4-Nitrophenol</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100-21-0<D>Terephthalic acid</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100-41-4<D>Ethylbenzene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100-42-5<D>Styrene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100-44-7<D>Benzyl chloride</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100-75-4<D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosopiperidine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">101-14-4<D>4,4</D>andmin172;-Methylenebis(2-chloroaniline) (MBOCA)<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">101-61-1<D>4,4</D>andmin172;-Methylenebis(<T3>N</T3>,<T3>N</T3>-dimethyl)benzenamine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">101-68-8<D>Methylenebis(phenylisocyanate) (MBI)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">101-77-9<D>4,4</D>andmin172;-Methylenedianiline<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">101-80-4<D>4,4</D>andmin172;-Diaminodiphenyl ether<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">103-23-1<D>Bis(2-ethylhexyl) adipate</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">104-94-9<D/><T3>p</T3>-Anisidine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">105-67-9<D>2,4-Dimethylphenol</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-42-3<D/><T3>p</T3>-Xylene<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-44-5<D/><T3>p</T3>-Cresol<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-46-7<D>1,4-Dichlorobenzene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-50-3<D/><T3>p</T3>-Phenylenediamine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-51-4<D>Quinone</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-88-7<D>1,2-Butylene oxide</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-89-8<D>Epichlorohydrin</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-93-4<D>1,2-Dibromoethane (Ethylene dibromide)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">106-99-0<D>1,3-Butadiene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">107-02-8<D>Acrolein</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">107-05-1<D>Allyl chloride</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">107-06-2<D>1,2-Dichloroethane (Ethylene dichloride)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">107-13-1<D>Acrylonitrile</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">107-21-1<D>Ethylene glycol</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">107-30-2<D>Chloromethyl methyl ether</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-05-4<D>Vinyl acetate</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-10-1<D>Methyl isobutyl ketone</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-31-6<D>Maleic anhydride</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-38-3<D/><T3>m</T3>-Xylene<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-39-4<D/><T3>m</T3>-Cresol<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-60-1<D>Bis(2-chloro-1-methylethyl)ether</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-78-1<D>Melamine</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-88-3<D>Toluene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-90-7<D>Chlorobenzene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">108-95-2<D>Phenol</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">109-86-4<D>2-Methoxyethanol</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">110-80-5<D>2-Ethoxyethanol</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">110-82-7<D>Cyclohexane</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">110-86-1<D>Pyridine</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">111-42-2<D>Diethanolamine</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">111-44-4<D>Bis(2-chloroethyl) ether</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">114-26-1<D>Propoxur [Phenol, 2-(1-methylethoxy)-, methylcarbamate]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">115-07-1<D>Propylene (Propene) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">115-32-2<D>Dicofol [Benzenemethanol, 4-chloro-.alpha.-(4-chlorophenyl)-.alpha.-(trichloromethyl)-]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">117-79-3<D>2-Aminoanthraquinone</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">117-81-7<D>Di(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate (DEHP)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">117-84-0<D/><T3>n</T3>-Dioctyl phthalate<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">118-74-1<D>Hexachlorobenzene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">119-90-4<D>3,3'-Dimethoxybenzidine</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">119-93-7<D>3,3'-Dimethylbenzidine (</D><T3>o</T3>-Tolidine)<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">120-12-7<D>Anthracene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">120-71-8<D/><T3>p</T3>-Cresidine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">120-80-9<D>Catechol</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">120-82-1<D>1,2,4-Trichlorobenzene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">120-83-2<D>2,4-Dichlorophenol</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">121-14-2<D>2,4-Dinitrotoluene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">121-69-7<D/><T3>N,N</T3>-Dimethylaniline<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">122-66-7<D>1,2-Diphenylhydrazine (Hydrazobenzene)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">123-31-9<D>Hydroquinone</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">123-38-6<D>Propionaldehyde</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">123-72-8<D>Butyraldehyde</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">123-91-1<D>1,4-Dioxane</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">126-72-7<D>Tris-2,3-dibromopropyl) phosphate</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">126-99-8<D>Chloroprene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">127-18-4<D>Tetrachloroethylene (Perchloroethylene)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">128-66-5<D>C.I. Vat Yellow 4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">131-11-3<D>Dimethyl phthalate</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">132-64-9<D>Dibenzofuran</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">133-06-2<D>Captan [1H-Isoindole-1,3(2H)-dione,3a,4,7,7a-tetrahydro-2-[(trichloromethyl)thio]-]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">133-90-4<D>Chloramben [Benzoic acid, 3-amino-2,5-dichloro-]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">134-29-2<D/><T3>o</T3>-Anisidine hydrochloride <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">134-32-7<D/><T3>alpha</T3>-Naphthylamine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">135-20-6<D>Cupferron [Benzeneamine, N-hydroxy-N-nitroso, ammonium salt]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">139-13-9<D>Nitrilotriacetic acid</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">139-65-1<D>4,4'-Thiodianiline</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">140-88-5<D>Ethyl acrylate</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">141-32-2<D>Butyl acrylate</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">151-56-4<D>Ethyleneimine (Aziridine)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">156-10-5<D/><T3>p</T3>-Nitrosodiphenylamine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">156-62-7<D>Calcium Cyanamide</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">302-01-2<D>Hydrazine</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">309-00-2<D>Aldrin[1,4:5,8-Dimethanonaphthalene,1,2,3,4,10,10-hexachloro-1,4,4a,5,8,8a-hexahydro-(1.alpha.,4.alpha.,4a.beta.,5.alpha.,8.alpha.,8a.beta.)-]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">334-88-3<D>Diazomethane</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">463-58-1<D>Carbonyl sulfide</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">492-80-8<D>C.I. Solvent Yellow 34 (Aurimine)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">505-60-2<D>Mustard gas [Ethane, 1,1</D>andmin172;-thiobis[2-chloro-]<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">510-15-6<D>Chlorobenzilate[Benezeneacetic acid, 4-chloro-.alpha.-(4-chlorophenyl)-.alpha,-hydroxy-,ethyl ester]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">532-27-4<D>2-Chloroacetophenone</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">534-52-1<D>4,6-Dinitro-</D><T3>o</T3>-cresol<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">540-59-0<D>1,2-Dichloroethylene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">541-41-3<D>Ethyl chloroformate</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">541-73-1<D>1,3-Dichlorobenzene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">542-75-6<D>1,3-Dichloropropylene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">542-88-1<D>Bis(chloromethyl) ether</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">569-64-2<D>C.I. Basic Green 4</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">606-20-2<D>2,6-Dinitrotoluene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">615-05-4<D>2,4-Diaminoanisole</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">621-64-7<D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodi-<T3>n</T3>-propylamine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">624-83-9<D>Methyl isocyanate</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">636-21-5<D/><T3>o</T3>-Toluidine hydrochloride<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">680-31-9<D>Hexamethylphosphoramide</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">684-93-5<D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitroso-<T3>N</T3>-methylurea<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">759-73-9<D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitroso-<T3>N</T3>-ethylurea<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">842-07-9<D>C.I. Solvent Yellow 14</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">924-16-3<D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosodi-<T3>n</T3>-butylamine<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">961-11-5<D>Tetrachlorvinphos[Phosphoric acid, 2-chloro-1-(2,4,5-trichlorophenyl)ethenyldimethyl ester]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">989-38-8<D>C.I. Basic Red l</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1120-71-4<D>Propane sultone</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1163-19-5<D>Decabromodiphenyl oxide</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1310-73-2<D>Sodium hydroxide (solution)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1313-27-5<D>Molybdenum trioxide</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1314-20-1<D>Throium dioxide</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1319-77-3<D>Cresol (mixed isomers)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1330-20-7<D>Xylene (mixed isomers)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1332-21-4<D>Asbestos (friable)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1335-87-1<D>Hexachloronaphthalene</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1336-36-3<D>Polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs)</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1344-28-1 <D>Aluminum oxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1464-53-5 <D>Diepoxybutane </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1582-09-8 <D>Trifluralin [Benzeneamine, 2,6-dinitro-N,N-dipropyl-4-(trifluoromethyl)-]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1634-04-4 <D>Methyl </D><T3>tert</T3>-butyl ether <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1836-75-5 <D>Nitrofen [Benzene, 2,4-dichloro-1-(4-nitrophenoxy)-] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1897-45-6 <D>Chlorothalonil [1-3-Benzenedicarbonitrile,2,4,5,6-tetrachloro-] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1937-37-7 <D>C.I. Direct Black 38 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2164-17-2 <D>Fluometuron [Urea, N,N-dimethyl-N</D>andmin172;-[3-(trifluoromethyl)phenyl]-]<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2234-13-1 <D>Octachloronaphthalene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2303-16-4 <D>Diallate [Carbamothioic acid, bis(1-methylethyl)-, S-(2,3-dichloro-2-propenyl)ester]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2602-46-2 <D>C.I. Direct Blue 6 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2650-18-2 <D>C.I. Acid Blue 9, diammonium salt </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2832-40-8 <D>C.I. Disperse Yellow 3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3118-97-6 <D>C.I. Solvent Orange 7 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3761-53-3 <D>C.I. Food Red 5 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3844-45-9 <D>C.I. Acid Blue 9, disodium salt </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4549-40-0 <D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosomethylvinylamine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4680-78-8 <D>C.I. Acid Green 3 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6484-52-2 <D>Ammonium nitrate (solution) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7429-90-5 <D>Aluminum (fume or dust) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7439-92-1 <D>Lead </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7439-96-5 <D>Manganese </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7439-97-6 <D>Mercury </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-02-0 <D>Nickel </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-22-4 <D>Silver </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-28-0 <D>Thallium </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-36-0 <D>Antimony </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-38-2 <D>Arsenic </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-39-3 <D>Barium </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-41-7 <D>Beryllium </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-43-9 <D>Cadmium </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-47-3 <D>Chromium </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-48-4 <D>Cobalt </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-50-8 <D>Copper </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-62-2 <D>Vanadium (fume or dust) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7440-66-6 <D>Zinc (fume or dust) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7550-45-0 <D>Titanium tetrachloride </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7647-01-0 <D>Hydrochloric acid </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7664-38-2 <D>Phosphoric acid </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7664-39-3 <D>Hydrogen fluoride </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7664-41-7 <D>Ammonia </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7664-93-9 <D>Sulfuric acid </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7697-37-2 <D>Nitric acid </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7723-14-0 <D>Phosphorus (yellow or white) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7757-82-6 <D>Sodium sulfate (solution) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7782-49-2 <D>Selenium </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7782-50-5 <D>Chlorine </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7783-20-2 <D>Ammonium sulfate (solution) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8001-35-2 <D>Toxaphene </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10034-93-2 <D>Hydrazine sulfate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10049-04-4 <D>Chlorine dioxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12122-67-7 <D>Zineb [Carbamodithioic acid, 1,2-ethanediylbis-, zinc complex] </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12427-38-2 <D>Maneb [Carbamodithioic acid, 1,2-ethanediylbis-, manganese complex]</D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">13463-67-7 <D>Titanium dioxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">16071-86-6 <D>C.I. Direct Brown 95 </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">16543-55-8 <D/><T3>N</T3>-Nitrosonornicotine <D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">20816-12-0 <D>Osmium tetroxide </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">25321-22-6 <D>Dichlorobenzene (mixed isomers) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">25376-45-8 <D>Diaminotoluene (mixed isomers) </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">39156-41-7 <D>2,4-Diaminoanisole sulfate </D><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG></ITAG>(c) <T3>Chemical categories in alphabetical order.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s360,10</C> <H1>Category name</H1><H1>Effective date.</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Antimony Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsantimony as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arsenic Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsarsenic as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Barium Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsbarium as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Beryllium Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsberyllium as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cadmium Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containscadmium as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chlorophenols<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG></ITAG><G/><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illus 0186A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Where x=1 to 5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Category name</H1><H1>Effective date.</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Chromium Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containschromium as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cobalt Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containscobolt as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Copper Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containscopper as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cyanide Compounds: X+ CN^ where X = H^ or any other group where a formaldissociation can be made. For example KCN, or Ca(CN)<T2>2</T2><D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Glycol Ethers: Includes mono- and di- ethers of ethylene glycol, diethyleneglycol, and triethylene glycol<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">R^(OCH<T2>2</T2>CH<T2>2</T2>)n^ORandmin172;</ITAG>Where:<ITAG tagnum="3">n</ITAG>=1, 2, or 3<ITAG tagnum="3">R</ITAG>=alkyl or aryl groups.<ITAG tagnum="3">R</ITAG>=Randmin172; H, or groups which, when removed, yield glycol etherswith the structure:<ITAG tagnum="21">R^(OCH)<T2>2CH</T2>)<T2>n^OH</T2></ITAG>Polymers are excluded from this category.<ITAG tagnum="1">Lead Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containslead as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Manganese Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsmanganese as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mercury Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsmercury as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nickel Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsnickel as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Polybrominated Biphenyls (PBBs)<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG></ITAG><G/><ITAG tagnum="7">insert illus 0186A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Where x=1 to 10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Category name</H1><H1>Effective date.</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Selenium Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsselenium as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Silver Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containssilver as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Thallium Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containsthallium as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Zinc Compounds: Includes any unique chemical substance that containszinc as part of that chemical's infrastructure<D>01/01/87</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Forms and Instructions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 372.85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Toxic chemical release reporting form and instructions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Reporting form.</T3><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M015</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-3027 Filed 2-12-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-C</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>